President Jose Sarney declare "a quarter" inflation government watch cent expenditure. Sarney address cabinet live television reiterate intend remain five 1990. There long-running political debate mandate be. Brazil currently suffer bad inflation history. In April monthly inflation reach 21 pct. Reuter 

Sales single-family home rise 7.6 pct April March seasonally adjust annual rate 777000 unit Commerce Department said. The department revise March sale show 2.7 pct decrease previous month 722000 unit instead previously report 3.6 pct drop March. The April increase brought sale 12.0 pct below April 1986 level 883000 units. The April increase brought sale high level April's 883000 units. The Commerce Department seasonal adjustment home actually sell April 76000 71000 March 84000 April 1986. The average price 118800 dlrs April 121200 dlrs March 110300 dlrs ago. The median price unchanged March 99000 dlrs 92500 dlrs April 1986 department said. Reuter 

Brixton Estate Plc establish sterling commercial paper unlimited amount J. Henry Schroder Wagg Co Ltd arranger. Dealers Schroder Wagg S.G. Warburg Co Ltd County Natwest Capital Markets Ltd. The paper issue denomination 500000 mln stg maturity seven 364 days. REUTER 

President Reagan Paul Volcker decline serve term chairman Federal Reserve Board U.S. central bank. Reagan nominate economist Alan Greenspan place. Volcker's term expires August. Reagan brief announcement White House briefing accepted Volcker's decision "with reluctance regret." Volcker appoint Fed post President Jimmy Carter 1979 "there leave ... I feel I pushed." Volcker appear Reagan Greenspan Treasury Secretary James Baker briefing remain job Greenspan's nomination approve Senate. In tribute smile Volcker stand beside Greenspan told reporter depart chairman's great achievement reduce inflation. "It follow hard won gain lost. Assuring primary goals" Greenspan said. Financial market react dismay departure Volcker widely credit hold line inflation seek maintain stability currency values. Immediately follow Reagan's announcement U.S. dollar weaken sharply major currency bond stock market declined. But Greenspan told reporter dollar fall sharply past reach low point. "There certainly evidence direction" Greenspan reporter dollar bottom out. The market reaction probably exaggerated surprise announcement follow publish report White House decide reappoint Volcker. Volcker's tenure Fed cloud major inflation Carter consumer price rise 10 cent annually prime rate exceed 20 cent. With Reagan's backing Volcker pursue tight money policy cut inflation cent annually reduce rate low level nearly decade. The tight money policy blame produce deep recession 1981 1982 cause major political problem Reagan. Reagan reappointed Volcker chairmanship 1983. Greenspan head Wall Street consult firm chairman President Ford's Council Economic Advisers September 1974 January 1977. Greenspan Republican consider traditional conservative economist adviser presidents. Reuter 

Belgium's expenditure deficit fell sharply 59.5 billion franc May 96.7 billion month major sign effect government's spending curb Budget Ministry said. During five month net government financing requirement 44.1 billion franc ago level 345.8 billion franc statement. The government aim cut year's financing requirement below 420 billion franc 560 billion 1986. The Ministry expect half project cut achieve July. Ministry source note technical reason financing requirement high month year. REUTER 

Norway's Christiania Bank CHBO.OL> increase size 2-1/2 pct seven bond issue gold call warrant 75 mln Swiss franc 50 mln lead manager Bank Gutzwiller Kurz Bungener Ltd said. The issue price par. Each 5000 franc bond carry 18 month call warrant strike price 490 dlrs warrant strike price 420 dlrs. Subscriptions close June 22 payment date July 8. REUTER 

New order manufacture good rise 401 mln dlrs 0.2 pct April seasonally adjust 199.8 billion dlrs Commerce Department said. The slight April gain follow revise order increase March 2.6 pct. The department originally report March increase 2.3 pct. Excluding defense factory order fell 0.2 pct April rise 1.1 pct March. Orders durable good virtually unchanged April 13 mln dlrs 106.2 billion dlrs. The department estimate May 22 April durable good order rise 0.1 pct. The department defense capital good order 808 mln dlrs 8.1 pct April 10.8 billion dlrs. Defense order risen 43.2 pct March. New order non-durable good 388 mln dlrs 0.4 pct April 93.6 billion dlrs. These figure compare March increase 4.2 pct durables order 0.8 pct rise non-durables orders. Orders non-defense capital good 0.8 pct April rise 2.0 pct March. Within major industry category order transportation equipment fell 7.6 pct April rise 10.8 pct March. Primary metal gain 5.4 pct April 6.8 pct March order increase. Orders non-electrical machinery 0.9 pct April rise 2.3 pct March. Electrical machinery order rise April 19.3 pct fall March 3.4 pct. Reuter 

Pakistan say economy continued recent outstanding performance financial 1986/87 end June 30 area balance payment investment energy cause concern. GDP grow line average growth rate 1980 inflation rate low 1969/70 accord government economic survey. The reform economic regulation gather momentum impressive performance five government rural uplift education poverty alleviation survey. Ministry Economic Adviser Qazi Alimullah told news conference recent unseasonal rain hailstorm damage wheat crop GDP growth calculate 7.04 pct compare 7.25 pct 1985/86.He figure slide little 6.8 6.9 pct. The survey monetary expansion estimate nine pct date rise 12 pct year-end. Alimullah export rise 18 pct 3.5 billion dlrs 2.9 billion dlrs 1985/86. But remittance Pakistanis abroad drop 2.3 billion dlrs 1985/86 level 2.595 billion. More export improvement balance payment situation require overcome decline trend remittance said. The survey trade deficit expect fall 2.4 billion dlrs billion dlrs 1985/86 boost exports. He investment continued poor rate saving 14 pct GDP. He saving require maintain possibly step growth rate finance country's seventh five-year development plan launch July 1988. REUTER 

Newly-nominated Federal Reserve Board chairman Alan Greenspan evidence dollar finally bottom out. In White House briefing Greenspan reporter dollar bottom out. "There certainly evidence direction" replied. Reuter 

The International Cocoa Organization (ICCO) buffer stock manager bought 5000 tonne cocoa buffer stock trader said. The cocoa believe entirely material added. Such purchase bring cumulative buffer stock purchase 26000 tonnes. Reuter 

Yankee Cos Inc work holder substantially 12-5/8 pct senior secure notres due 1996 develop overall debt asset restructuring step noteholder agree deferral June One payment note June 30. Yankee paid noteholders yesterday. The company plan meet party include holder debt issue federal banking authority week formulate implement restructuring plan. Reuter 

Q-Med Inc preliminary result show quarter end May 31 revenue exceed 4.2 mln dlrs. A earlier revenue nearly 1.4 mln dlrs. The company appoint Coopers Lybrand auditors. Chairman Michael Cox decline comment appointment. The company preliminary quarter revenue consistent management's expectation represent great 40 pct increase sale report quarter. Earnings show similar growth pattern company added. Reuter 

Acme Precision Products Inc management withdrawn six dlr share leveraged buyout offer. Acme management drop bid due continued weakness machine tool industry Acme Precision's operating result inability management obtain modification term financing commitment. It "The effect factor lead management conclude six dlr share price excessive current conditions." Reuter 

Virginia Electric Power Co unit Dominion Resources Inc raise 100 mln dlrs via offering refund mortgage bond due 2017 yield 9.89 pct sole manager E.F. Hutton Co Inc. Hutton lead won bond competitive bidding. It bid 99.376 represent net charge company 9.94 pct. The underwriter 9-7/8 pct coupon reoffering price 99.85 yield 123 basis point comparable Treasury securities. Non-refundable five bond rat A-1 Moody's A-plus Standard Poor's. The gross spread dlrs reallowance 2.50 dlrs bookrunner Hutton Virginia Electric deal. Virginia Electric visit domestic debt market October 1986 sell 100 mln dlrs same-rated same-maturity 9-1/4 pct bonds. That issue price yield 9.27 pct 141 basis point Treasuries. Reuter 

General Signal Corp General Railway Signal Co unit apparent low bidder 32.5 mln dlrs transit radio contract Southern California Rapid Transit District Los Angeles. The company General Farebox Inc subsidiary receive 3.1 mln dlr farebox contract Greater Cleveland Regional Transit Authority. Reuter 

Williams Cos reincorporated Delaware Williams Cos Inc follow approval shareholder annual meeting month. Reuter 

Noble Affiliates Inc raise 100 mln dlrs via offering convertible subordinate debenture due 2012 7-1/4 pct coupon par pricing lead underwriter Morgan Stanley Co Inc. The debenture convert company's common stock 19.625 dlrs share represent premium 25.6 pct stock price term debt set. Non-callable issue rat Baa-3 Moody's BBB-plus Standard Poor's. Noble Affiliates offering 125 mln dlrs 10-1/8 pct note due 1997 lead Morgan Stanley. Reuter 

Meridian Insurance Group Inc common stock include NASDAQ National Market System effective today. Reuter 

Canon Sales Co Inc issue 100 mln dlr equity warrant bond due June 30 1992 indicate coupon 1-5/8 pct par pricing lead manager Yamaichi International (Europe) Ltd said. The issue guaranteed Fuji Bank Ltd final term June 9. The sell concession 1-1/2 pct management underwriting combine pay 3/4 pct. The deal available denomination 5000 dlrs list Luxembourg. The warrant exercisable July 15 June 23 1992. The payment date June 30. REUTER 

Italy's barley crop generally condition harvest expect begin shortly agricultural marketing information research board Irvam said. First consignment expect available mid-June. Excellent weather characterise alternate period sunshine rain encourage growth except Sardinia expect lose barley crop extreme dryness. Irvam yield expect high year's low level favourable weather continue weeks. Given average yield 3.5 tonne hectare production pct high previous season above 1.6 mln tonne said. If yield reach record 3.78 tonne hectare achieve 1984 production 1.75 mln tonne increase 11 pct compare 1986. Reuter 

The Asian Development Bank issue 50 mln stg eurobond due July 1 1997 pay 9-1/2 pct price 101-7/8 pct lead manager County Natwest Capital Markets Ltd said. The non-callable bond available denomination 1000 10000 stg list Luxembourg. The sell concession 1-3/8 pct management underwriting combine pay 5/8 pct. Payment date July 1. REUTER 

Data General Corp introduce hardware software product link International Business Machines Corp IBM> IBM-compatible personal computer mainframe minicomputer systems. Data General product include local network conform industry standards. It offering Starlan network originally introduce American telephone Telegraph Co t> thin Ethernet PC interface standard Ethernet. In addition Data General offer software package PC network include MS Net product developed Microsoft Corp MSFT.O> allows PCs share printer data file peripherals. The company introduce PC version popular CEO office automation software. Data General product allow computer user divide collection PCs large computers. "Data General vendor offer local network personal computer integration" Colin Crook senior vice president company's communication system group. "We're really give user freedom choice industry standard products" add J. David Lyons vice president marketing. In addition product expect Data General announce joint product development agreement Gold Hill Computers> Cambridge Mass.-based artificial intelligence software company. The company announce formation network service customer plan design computer networks. The provide service maintenance Data General vendors' equipment company said. Reuter 

Perpetual Savings Bank board approve formation hold company incorporate Virginia subject Federal Home Loan Bank Board shareholder approval. It common prefer share exchange one-for-one basis share hold company Perpetual Financial corp. Reuter 

May Two net Shr 11 ct v eight ct Net 5895000 v 3896000 Sales 127.3 mln v 110.5 mln NOTE: Share adjust three-for-one stock split payable July 27 holder record July One. Reuter 

Elders IXL Ltd ELXA.S> say happy leave preference share brewer Carling O'Keefe Ltd outstanding undisclosed bidder offer acquire Carling's outstanding prefer stock. Elders own 100 pct Carling's outstanding common share previously propose redeem 433745 Carling series A prefer share 33.50 Canadian dlrs redeem 386662 series B preferreds 40 dlrs share. The series A B prefer share carry vote dividend paid. Elders say neither nor Carling know identity bidder Carling's prefer shares. On May 29 bidder offer acquire Carling prefer 36 dlrs series A 40.50 dlrs series B share. Elders leave Carling prefer share outstanding affect ongoing plan company. Series B prefer shareholder previously reject Carling's proposal redeem share series A prefer shareholder meeting adjourn June 12. Reuter 

Plans provide direct income aid European Community (EC) farmer deep cut guaranteed crop price receive mixed reception EC agriculture minister EC official said. The plan discuss informal meeting minister host village Genval Council Ministers' current chairman Belgium's Paul de Keersmaeker. The EC Executive Commission propose richer member allow direct payment farmer special difficulty EC finance similar scheme poorer EC countries. However EC official Netherlands Luxembourg support idea today's meeting France Denmark Belgium show marked hostility it. French minister Francois Guillaume told reporter "Farmers recipient assistance -- survival assure price mechanism market." The official minister sought resolve urgent difference guaranteed farm price 1987/88 meeting. The minister resume talk price fix issue Luxembourg June 15. Reuter 

Sara Lee Corp 500 worker Kitchens Sara Lee bakery operation Deerfield Ill. return week ratify contract. A company spokesman Local Two Bakery Confectionery Tobacco Workers walk May 10 reach "mutually agreeable terms" two-year contract. Meanwhile 100 Teamster driver warehouse employee whose contract expire May 16 remain company said. No talk schedule Sara Lee said. Details contract immediately available company spokesman "maintained benefit call sacrifice current employees." Union source report contract freeze wage introduces sharply low start rate hires. They give Sara Lee concession workplace issue involve excuse absences. Reuter 

Cray Research Inc Aerospatiale French aerospace company order Cray X-MP/14se computer value 3.6 mln dlrs. It lease instal fourth quarter pending export license approval. Reuter 

Portugal contract six-year 150 mln ECU loan foreign bank lead Daiwa Europe Ltd finance investment project finance ministry said. Interest 7.75 pct paid annual instalment start 1988 ministry spokesman Luis Vilhena de Cunha said. The loan form temporary global note replace subscription 1000 10000 ECUs. The issue price 101.75 pct. Banque Generale du Luxembourg SA act listing agent fiscal agent spokesman added. REUTER 

A representative poultry industry statistic show chicken frequently cause salmonella poison beef dairy product salad mixed foods. Kenneth May President Holly Farms Poultry Industries director National Broiler Council told House Agriculture subcommittee incidence salmonella chicken increase recent chicken neither major source bacterial poison nor cause increase outbreak disease. May Center Disease Control figure show 1978 1982 chicken involve pct U.S. salmonellosis outbreak beef account ten pct outbreak dairy product six pct. May remain outbreak cause salad mixed food turkey seafood pork egg foods. May chicken industry favor move bird-by-bird inspection procedure risk assessment able identify microbial bacterial contamination poultry. However Ellen Haas executive director Public Voice Food Health Policy bird-by-bird inspection retain label attach ready-to-cook chicken remind consumer preparation procedure necessary avoid illness. Haas call review chicken industry inspection method worsen poultry hazards. Reuter 

The House Agriculture Committee vote approximately 2.8 billion dlrs feedgrains deficiency payment immediately instead late fall. A similar measure decisively defeat Senate floor week. The bill pass voice vote allow so-called Findley payment immediately late year. Payments 1987-90 feedgrains crop changed. Because bill move 2.8 billion dlrs spending fiscal 1987 fiscal 1988 measure expect meet stiff resistance full House. Reuter 

Jones Vining Inc start tender offer share five dlrs share. The company hold special meeting July 10 vote approval merger tender price. It price paid tender merger reduce fee expense court award counsel plaintiff class action suit brought Delaware Chancery Court Ronda Inc. The plaintfiffs' counsel seek fee 10 ct share Jones Vining said. The company court schedule hearing propose settlement suit July Eight. The company start tender offer call special meeting condition settlement completion tender merger condition final approval settlement. Reuter 

HEALTHSOUTH Rehabilitation Corp acquire Pine Island Sports Medicine Center Fort Lauderdale Fla. incorporate facility HEALTHSOUTH Rehabilitation Center Fort Lauderdale construction operation mid-summer. Terms disclosed. Reuter 

Banc One Corp complete acquisition First National Bank Bloomington Ind asset 271 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Pentland Industries PLC shareholder annual meeting approve increase authorize share capital 36 mln stg 12 mln stg creation 240 mln ordinary share allow three-for-one stock split. It dealing share expect start June 15. Reuter 

Orion Broadcast Group Inc majority-owned Orion Financial Services Corp subsidiary agree purchase FN Realty Services Inc Ford Motor Co 1200000 1500000 dlrs cash notes. It closing expect 45 day receipt regulatory approvals. FN provide loan collection accounting data processing administrative service real estate industry. Reuter 

A plea extra cash bail European Community (EC) late financial crisis likely reject meeting EC budget minister diplomat said. The minister meeting EC Executive Commission unveiled emergency budget 1987 aim plug deficit cause soar farm spending fall revenues. The emergency package include demand member pay extra 1.5 billion European currency unit (Ecus) meet deficit. Officials Britain West Germany expect lead opposition contribute extra cash U.K insist instead clampdown runaway farm spending. The Commission say shortfall five billion Ecus 1/8 total spending. It hope shortfall one-time accounting exercise pay member arrears advance spending Community farm policies. But member rest gap Commission warn spending regional project slash half. Reuter 

Orbit Instrument Corp unit Orbit Semiconductor Inc receive order total 2.5 mln dlrs put backlog record level 4.7 mln dlrs. Additionally company offer Micron CMOS process withstand Megarad total dose radiation. Applications process include product manufacture military medical industry market company said. Reuter 

South Africa detain trial drop 1500 few previous official figure past emergency rule. A government spokesman late name present parliament include current detainee held month. Previous list name 8500 people. The official figure support civil right group detainee freed recent week possibly empty cell government crackdown. Reuter 

Thousands farmer gather central Tokyo urge government stand firm foreign pressure far opening Japan's market foreign agricultural product union official said. Officials Central Union Agricultural Cooperatives 5000 representative 4200 farm group join demonstration. The organiser farmer demand government avoid easy compromise liberalise agricultural import week's economic summit Venice. The United States European Community Japan remove tariff quota cut trade deficit Japan. Under banner reading "The government parliament sacrifice farmers" demonstrator adopt declaration say fight unreasonable move Japanese market foreign agricultural products. An agriculture ministry official Japan United States expect hold talk Japanese import ceiling U.S. Beef citrus fruit September. Reuter 

European Community official welcome Norway's recent move renew debate Community membership Norway expect special trade advantage stay outside EC. Belgian Willy de Clercq EC Commissioner external affair trade policy level talk week Norway's minority Labour government help clarify misconception lead Norway's narrow rejection EC membership 1972 referendum. "But (Norway) cannot club remain outside club. You expect equal footing club it" de Clercq add refer Norway's attempt adapt EC trade tie Community move launch internal trade market 1992. The government worried internal market hamper trade EC take two-thirds Norway's export month sent report parliament ask political party reassess country's relationship EC. Reuter 

Shr 71 ct v 47 ct Net 12.1 mln v 7.8 mln Revs 369.8 mln v 307.9 mln 12 mths Shr 2.35 dlrs v 2.33 dlrs Net 39.5 mln v 39 mln Revs 1.36 billion v 1.24 billion NOTE: Prior restate reflect result current acquisitions. Reuter 

Following full text Federal Reserve Board Chairman Paul Volcker's letter President Reagan decline reappointment Fed: Dear Mr. President As term chairman Federal Reserve Board approach naturally consider appropriate appointment. In connection recall reappointment chairman 1983 I unable firm commitment Congress remain office full four-year term. Despite reservation term finished. However I eight chairman natural return private soon reasonably convenient consistent orderly transition. Consequently I desire reappointment chairman I plan resign governor chairman prepared assume office. I leave appreciation unfailing courtesy personally. More broadly consistent support Federal Reserve particularly challenge period financial economy critical whatever success had. Without doubt strong challenge remain involve economic policy. In effort I believe nation continue serve strong Federal Reserve System -- firmly dedicate foster economic financial strength stability able bring effort combination sound independent professional judgement continuity beyond partisan considerations. May I add personal wish remainder term office restore confidence self-reliance American people. Faithfully yours Paul A Volcker Reuter 

The scale foreign exchange intervention Bank England carry recently clear proof Britain's determination stabilise exchange rate agree Group Seven industrialise country Paris February Chancellor Exchequer Nigel Lawson said. Saying "content" sterling's current value Lawson told reporter want "to maintain exchange rate stability sign for." He decline favour rise fall sterling levels. May currency reserve show record 4.8 billion stg rise point massive currency intervention. In April reserve rise hefty 2.9 billion stg. Pointing reserve data Lawson "We play full ourselves" meeting commitment exchange rate stability agree Paris. "We wish (stability) continuing" added. Asked technique available preserve stability Lawson central bank intervention rate change tackle "the market pressure time." "Interest rate stability objective sense...Rates move times" added. Lawson expect intervention "sterilised" drain excess sterling liquidity market issue government security foreign currency sale market allowed. This limit inflationary impact intervention said. "Sterilisation dictate market tactics...Not necessarily month intervention occurs" Lawson said. "I be confident sterilise scale." REUTER 

The Federal Reserve expect intervene government security market add drain reserve usual intervention morning economist said. With Federal fund rate trading comfortably 6-9/16 pct yesterday's 6.74 pct average economist Fed reserve management action today. Reuter 

Shr 86 ct v 73 ct Net 52.7 mln v 45.7 mln Revs 989.9 mln v 863.9 mln Six mths Shr 1.97 dlrs v 1.28 dlrs Net 122 mln v 79.9 mln Revs 2.078 billion v 1.726 billion Reuter 

The decision Paul Volcker serve third term chairman U.S. Federal Reserve Board shock financial market economy Hans Mast senior economic adviser Credit Suisse First Boston said. "The market believe pressure expansive policy (in United States)" said. "I quite shock economy" added. "He stood anti-inflationary policy tight fiscal discipline. He central banker America had." Mast market try ass sort direction Fed take Alan Greenspan designate succeed Volcker. "Greenspan politician academician little experience banking" Mast said. Greenspan's comment name dollar appear bottom Mast conviction back policy. "How dollar bottom level current account deficits?" said. "I sceptical." REUTER 

Alan Sinai chief economist Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc news Federal Reserve Chairman Paul Volcker decline accept reappointment short-term effect financial markets. "The market panic" Sinai told fixed-income conference New York sponsor Institute International Research. Sinai Volcker Fed governor country's history. Still predict market calm today's tremors. Alan Greenspan nominate replace Volcker. Reuter 

Perry Drug Stores Inc elect David Schwartz president chief executive officer effective immediately. Perry Schwartz serve board replace Donald Fox resign January 12. Previously Schwartz vice president drug merchandise Kroger Co KR> Perry said. Reuter 

Zenith Electronics Corp computer subsidiary sign agreement Micro D Inc market Zenith Data Systems monitor us flat tension mask color video display. The monitor offer 50 pct great brightness contrast performance conventional high-revolution computer monitor Zenith said. It compatible IBM Personal System/2 computer available summer. Reuter 

Turkey's trade deficit widen 382 mln dlrs April 275 mln March 273 mln April 1986 State Statistics Institute said. The deficit quarter 1987 widen 1.23 billion dlrs 1.20 billion earlier. April export total 702 mln dlrs compare import 1.08 billion. Exports month worth 2.69 billion dlrs compare import 3.92 billion. REUTER 

Shr ct v 21 ct Net 29862 v 152826 NOTE: Full name United Financial Banking Cos Inc. Net include loan loss provision nil v 40000 dlrs. Reuter 

Dreyfus Corp introduce stock index mutual fund design primarily bank trust department manage corporate pension accounts. Dreyfus fund keyed match performance Standard Poor's 500 Composite Stock Price Index addition purchasing stock S P index fund deal index futures. The company fund manage Wells Fargo Investment Advisors>. Minimum investment requirement mln dlrs company said. Reuter 

Senate Republican Leader Robert Dole Kansas Alan Greenspan replacement Paul Volcker Federal Reserve Chairman. "While Paul Volcker's retirement real loss country fortunate Alan Greenspan's caliber place" Dole statement. "Alan's knowledge economy couple experience top level government mean leadership Federal Reserve Board hands. Alan literally shoe fill. But I haven't doubt he's equal task" Dole said. Reuter 

Shr 56 ct v 42 ct Net 10030000 v 7833000 Sales 392.1 mln v 339.6 mln Avg shrs 17966000 v 18709000 Reuter 

Energy Secretary Donald Hodel expect oil price rise significantly 2000 probably 33 dlrs barrel current dollars. "I anticipate significant increase (by 2000). Thirty-three dlrs barrel unreasonable" Hodel told Senate Energy Committee. Hodel loss domestic oil production shutdown stripper (10 barrel less) well low price probably permanent. He concerned decline domestic oil exploration. Hodel urge Congress approve oil exploration section 1002 Arctic National Wildlife Refuge Alaska. He geologic condtions favorable discovery oil field equal nearby Prudhoe Bay. Reuter 

Qtly div 36 ct v 36 ct prior Payable July 1 Record June 12 Reuter 

Shr 15 ct v 16 ct Net 239034 v 264485 Sales 2932782 v 2664853 Year Shr 57 ct v 45 ct Net 929524 v 741121 Sales 10.9 mln v 9708792 Reuter 

U.S. District Court Judge Eugene A. Gordon decide "in days" whether grant Burlington Industries Inc's request stop takeover Samjens Acquisition Corp. "I I preliminary injunction" Gordon listen argument attorney 1-1/2 days. "It's I deluge information I been. I consider what's present issue opinion this. Both side cannot winners" said. Burlington request injunction stop takeover effort Samjens claim partnership illegally obtain confidential information company offer. It alleges anti-trust violation Samjens form Asher Edelman Dominion Textiles Inc Canada succeed. Samjens week topped 76 dlr share offer Burlington Morgan Stanley Group MS> dlr share. Morgan Stanley 2.44 billion dlr bid Samjens bid 72 dlrs share Burlington. Burlington lawyer told court injunction grant Samjens win control Burlington. A Samjens lawyer argue judge grant injunction "kill offer" Jay Greenfield attorney Samjens partnership suffer irreparable harm injunction granted. "There's Burlington" said. "If cannot amount money compensate us." Greenfield Samjens sell holding Burlington 95 mln dlrs. "We don't that. We're money" said. Irving Nathan Burlington lawyer reiterate information provide James Ammeen former Burlington executive crucial Dominion's decision attempt o takeover Burlington. "Dominion rely information provide insider Jim Ammeen" Nathan said. An attorney Ammeen name defendant court dismiss lawsuit client. The judge rule request today. Reuter 

Strandard Poor's Corp cut CCC-plus B-minus Coleco Industries Inc's 300 mln dlrs subordinate debt. The company's imply senior debt rating B. S/P action reflect significant deterioration capital structure financial flexibility follow Coleco's 111 mln dlr net loss fiscal 1986. The agency attribute loss falloff sale Cabbage Patch Kids dolls. Coleco negative equity 7.7 mln dlrs year-end 1986 S/P noted. Future operating performance depends product untested earnings potential. Reuter 

Allegis Corp create limited partnership sell select hotel Canada public. It offering expect raise excess 350 mln Canadian dlrs complete September. The limited partnership similar Westin Hotels limited partnership complete Allegis sell Westin hotel San Francisco Chicago. Allegis report pretax gain 80.6 mln dlrs result partnership. An Allegis spokesman offering planning stage unrelated recent corporate development firm's recapitalization plan threaten takeover investor lead Coniston Partners pilot United Airlines unit. The spokesman company yet identify Canadian hotel offer sale. Allegis 100 pct ownership Westin hotel Vancouver Calgary Ottawa Toronto 100 pct Hilton International hotel Toronto Montreal. It own 60 pct Westin Edmonton. Richard Ferris chairman Allegis statement hotel limited partnership allow company convert unrecognized asset appreciation cash. As proceeds earlier limited partnership money corporate need spokesman said. Merrill Lynch Capital Markets Wood Gundy lead underwriter offering. The limited partnership offer outside U.S Allegis said. Reuter 

American Micro Technology Co> sign three-year installation service agreement TRW Inc TRW>. Under agreement TRW initially provide on-site installation service AMT's full line PC compatible product 100-mile radius 12 major city represent two-thirds PC market American Micro said. The company pact allows pursue government bid require installation service support. Reuter 

Raycomm Transworld Industries Inc agree principle subject board approval acquire Spiridellis Consulting Group Inc privately-held computer service consult firm common share determine base pretax earnings Spiridellis five-year period. The company gaurantee issue share attain price level range five nine dlrs issuance. It Spiridellis revenue 3500000 dlrs calendar 1986. Reuter 

Minnesota Mining Manufacturing acquire computerize hospital information system Control Data Corp. Terms disclosed. The 145 employee supply computer software hospital information system integrate 3M's hospital software business. Control Data divestiture strategy focus narrower markets. Reuter 

Mellon Bank Corp sign contract 21 financial institution Mellon's network service division process electronic fund transfer transactions. Mellon provide institution base New England automate teller machines. Reuter 

Pharmacia Inc's Pharmacia Develpoment Co Inc establish Pharmacia Ventures Inc investment U.S. growth companies. It investment firm produce in-vitro diagnostics biotechnology ophthalmology health care. Reuter 

Qtly div 25 ct v 25 ct prior Pay August 31 Record August Three Reuter 

Gulf Western Inc chairman Martin Davis company report record result current fiscal year. In fiscal end October 31 company earn 228.7 mln dlrs 3.66 dlrs share revenue 2.093 billion dlrs. Earlier company quarter net rise 86 ct share 73 ct ago. Davis company's Paramount Pictures Corp strong momentum substantial contribution anticipate company's publishing operation third fourth quarter. Davis steady growth expect financial service operation bolster acquisition May Fruehauf's truck trailer financing lease business. He company's entertainment operation benefit significantly Paramount's major summer motion picture "Beverly Hills Cop II" gross 65 mln dlrs 12 day North American distribution "The Untouchables" open June 3. Reuter 

The current crude oil price 18 20 dlrs barrel remain stable couple rise dlrs barrel annum keep inflation OPEC President Rilwanu Lukman said. Lukman speak talk Swedish trade official stable price depend output restraint OPEC non-OPEC oil producer Swedish government official said. They Lukman Nigerian oil minister remark whilst talk connection Third World debt industrialise nations. Crude oil output control necessarily mean high energy bill world's industrial nation Lukman said. Although low oil price see begin appear beneficial industrial country depend import energy lead wastage overdependence fuel term said. This turn bring swing extremely price added. Sweden heavily dependent import oil suffer major crisis mid-1970s oil price spiralled. REUTER 

The Bundesbank unlikely change credit policy central bank council meet Thursday session Venice summit banking economist money market dealer said. The Bundesbank steer money market rate low month cut rate security repurchase pact unlikely cap move cut lead rate near future said. The council meet Saarbruecken meeting follow news conference 1030 GMT. But Bundesbank official note news conference usually call council meet outside Frankfurt necessarily herald policy moves. Bundesbank Vice-President Helmut Schlesinger reason cut rate money supply growth show sign slow May dollar stable mark. Schlesinger told Reuters Tokyo Bundesbank open representative office West German economy pick contract seasonally adjust 1/2 pct quarter. Money market dealer call money likely hold 3.50/70 pct range month Bundesbank switch month tender rate minimum bid rate 3.50 pct allocate fund 3.55 pct. "They signal indicate maybe low market rate far discount Lombard" Winfried Hutmann chief economist Schroeder Munchmeyer Hengst Investment GmbH said. Werner Chrobok manage partner Bethmann Bank German rate low industrial country historical low West Germany. A far cut rate little impact economy bank reporting slack credit demand company swim liquidity Chrobok said. The Bundesbank therefore reluctant move rate held reserve. "The Bundesbank frighten use powder" said. A cut discount Lombard rate bring line structure money market rate month little practical significance dealer said. The Bundesbank therefore act want diplomatic gesture week's Venice summit. But Bundesbank President Karl Otto Poehl clear past opposes gesture mere "eyewash." Economists really Bonn government cut tax Bundesbank ease monetary policy meet pressure West Germany Venice summit. But Bonn struggle finance already announce tax cut fall tax revenue widen federal budget deficit hard Bonn cut tax further. "The Bonn government weak position Venice can't risk increase deficit further" Schroeder Muenchmeyer Hengst's Hutmann. Bethmann's Chrobok anything happen Venice fiscal monetary policy. "But I don't expect convincing measures" said. Money market dealer note call money continued normalize fall 3.60/70 pct 3.75/85 yesterday five pct Friday push month-end distortions. Call money upwards pressure month major round tax payment bank behalf customer start week begin June 15. Two holiday week distort market. Dealers expect Bundesbank allocate fund tomorrow late repurchase pact unchanged 3.55 pct set unchanged minimum bid rate 3.50 pct fully replace 5.5 billion mark outgo pact. But dealer Bundesbank allocate fund 3.6 pct 3.55. That represent tighten policy however. Because Bundesbank scale bid allocates minimum accepted rate bank try full allocation bidding heavily 3.6 pct dealer said. On issue Poehl Bundesbank likely lift restriction private European Currency Unit (ECU) meeting soon. Saarbruecken suitable announcement gesture European unity capital Saarland bordering France twice French occupation century. But dealer ECU announcement unlikely week technical legal matter resolve instance German ECU account treat minimum reserve purposes. REUTER 

A Ugandan goodwill mission lead minister presidency Balaki Kirya visit Kenya tomorrow talk improve strain relation country diplomatic source said. If talk Ugandan President Yoweri Museveni likely meeting Kenyan leader Daniel arap Moi pay two-day visit Nairobi attend U.N ceremony Friday Saturday added. Relations show sign recovery yesterday month steady deterioration. The Kenyan President told military parade border tension Uganda Kenyan border fully cargo movements. Reuter 

New York Life Insurance Co> offering global mutual fund wholly-owned subsidiary MacKay-Shields Financial Corp. The fund call MacKay-Shields Global Fund company said. Its portfolio contains foreign U.S. security company said. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp affirm Societe Generale's 1.4 billion dlrs debt. It Societe Generale major step restructure organization improve capital position past years. The bank due offer June 15. Affirmed bank's AA-plus senior debt AA-minus perpetual subordinate debt AA-plus debt back long-term letter credit Societe Generale (Australia) Ltd's senior debt. Also A-1-plus commercial paper Societe Generale North America Inc Societe Generale (Canada) Europaper Societe General Acceptance NV. Reuter 

The Bundesbank note regret Paul Volcker available far term Federal Reserve chairman Bundesbank source said. Cooperation Volcker trust successful source said. On Bundesbank confident cooperation Bundesbank Fed continue chairmanship Alan Greenspan source said. REUTER 

Treasury Secretary James Baker finance minister seven industrial country agree process economic coordination. He decline specific. Meeting reporter discus upcoming economic summit Venice Baker finance minister unveil process development head meeting. Baker cooperation country detail public. Baker United States hop committment industrial country reduce trade friction agricultural product major trade issue face global economy. He expect specific meetings. Reuter 

The Vancouver Stock Exchange list common stock DiaEm Resources Ltd DAE.V> interest emerald property North Carolina diamond property Indonesia. Reuter 

Alcan Aluminium Ltd cut expect cost plan Laterriere Quebec smelter use enhance Grande Baie reduction technology. The company decision prebaked anode technolgy Grande Baie Quebec Sebree Ky. smelter take primarily cost reasons. As result estimate total cost plan smelter held 450 mln U.S. dlrs low range estimate mid-May cost phase cut 150 mln dlrs project 175-225 mln dlrs. Reuter 

ZIM Energy Corp revise loss end January 31 4.7 mln dlrs loss 3.1 mln dlrs report March. A spokesman large loss report company's 10K filing Securities Exchange Commission reflect management's decision write 1.5 mln dlrs cost mainly associate unsuccessful merger attempt. ZIM tentative agreement "a major independent company farm interest" acreage locate near currently produce area Buccaneer Field locate Gulf Mexico offshore Galveston Texas. Reuter 

The West German government's independent council economic expert believe far stimulation economy inappropriate government spokesman Friedhelm Ost said. A statement release Ost meeting Chancellor Helmut Kohl senior government official council expert believe 1987 ecomomic growth 1-1/2 pct achievable. It add council believe "an intensification already expansionary stimulation monetary financial policy call for." Ost's statement expert believe far pressure West Germany adapt external economic factor increase. The government regularly us term "changed external economic factors" refer fall dollar severely damage West German exports. Bonn official expect export pick fall below 1986 level. Along lead industrial country West Germany agree package measure meeting Paris February aim stem fall dollar. The stance take expert back official position West German government ahead week's seven nation summit Venice Bonn expect press U.S. And partner boost economy. West German government official stress Bonn position stimulate growth far tax cut due 1990 already stretch budget. The Bundesbank rule quick cut official rate see market rate continue low. The experts' prediction economic growth 1-1/2 pct slight downward revision forecast November pct growth forecast. Many independent forecaster revise 1987 prediction downturn exports. The government expect growth pct compare 2.4 pct expansion 1986. REUTER 

Shr basic 83 ct v 1.05 dlrs Shr dilute 80 ct v 96 ct Net 116157000 v 125146000 Six mths Shr basic 1.71 dlrs v 2.27 dlrs Shr dilute 1.63 dlrs v 2.06 dlrs Net 230265000 v 265535000 Loans 67.93 billion v 65.50 billion Deposits 83.71 billion v 84.25 billion Assets 100.00 billion v 97.50 billion Avg shrs 116.4 mln v 102.1 mln Reuter 

Dutch Finance Minister Onno Ruding welcome President Reagan's decision name economist Alan Greenspan successor Federal Reserve Board Chairman Paul Volcker serve term. "The minister feel choice Alan Greenspan excellent one" spokesman Ruding chair IMF policy make interim committee. He elaborate. But Ruding express regret Volcker's departure say "great appreciation years" spokesman said. REUTER 

Synercom Technology Inc vice president Charles W. Ryle leave company personal reasons. Reuter 

A former U.S. Agriculture Department official urge department require package chicken label handle cooking instruction protect disease. Carol Tucker Foreman President Foreman Heidepriem former assistant secretary agriculture food consumer service told House Agriculture subcommittee "every hour 22 Americans victim chicken contaminate salmonella." She half week American dy salmonellosis complication arise incidence poison poultry increase steadily past years. Foreman USDA follow National Academy Sciences recommendation label chicken package remind consumer preparation procedure necessary avoid illness. She urge USDA require bird wash thoroughly defeathered defeathering machine clean time bird condemn intestine puncture visible fecal contamination chiller change often. Kenneth Blaylock President American Federation Government Employees poultry industry recommendation move current bird-by-bird inspection prove "disastrous." He strengthen bird-by-bird inspection slow line speed foundation inspection technique overlaid. Reuter 

Senate Banking Committee chairman William Proxmire D-Wis Paul Volcker's decision leave Federal Reserve Board loss country. "I serious loss country" Proxmire Senate speech. He comment nomination Alan Greespan replace Volcker. Proxmire's committee hold confirmation hearing Greenspan date scheduled. "Mr Volcker superb chairman Federal Reserve Board. He confidence community. He confidence country. And I confidence Administration. We miss much." Reuter 

Century Communications Corp enter agreement acquire asset Community Cable Vision Puerto Rico Associates> associate company 12 mln dlrs. Century anticipates ML Media Partners LP> jointly own Century company call Cable Television Co> great San Juan join acquisition management Community Cable. Century Community Cable locate San Juan Puerto Rico. Reuter 

House Banking Committee chairman Fernand St. Germain Rhode Island Democrat regret Federal Reserve Board chairman Paul Volcker decide accept term. "Paul Volcker island strength stability" St. Germain statement. "I deeply regret decision" added. "This nation extremely fortunate have giant scene time crisis. Thank God Paul Volcker available period domestic economic turmoil" St. Germain said. Reuter 

The British Broadcasting Corporation decline comment rumour circulate London Stock Exchange release opinion poll tonight show Conservative Labour party run level marginal seats. The election June 11. The rumour cite market dealer factor contribute afternoon's slide share prices. The FTSE 100 share index late afternoon 7.4 point 2220.7 have earlier touch record 2248.8. Nationally poll Conservatives nine 10 point ahead comfortable election victory REUTER 

The White House complete review Japanese semiconductor trading practice yet decide whether trade sanction levy Japan April lift U.S. official said. They president's Economic Policy Council look Japan's adherence 1986 U.S.-Japanese semiconductor pact yesterday announcement shortly. But hint announcement be. Officials 100 pct tariff 300 mln dlrs Japanese export modify Japan found honor portion semiconductor pact. But note White House unlikely tariff lift meeting world's seven major economic power Venice June 8-10. The official add curb complicate U.S.-Japanese economic cooperation serve blunt Congressional criticism Reagan Administrtation take tough action reduce U.S. trade deficit. Reagan impose sanction April 17 retaliation Japan's failure honor commitment dump semiconductor market production cost market U.S. goods. The sanction levy Japanese television set personal computer hand-held tools. Reagan impose curb lift soon evidence pattern Japan adhere pact. reuter 

The decision Paul Volcker serve third term chairman U.S. Federal Reserve Board shock financial market economy Hans Mast senior economic adviser Credit Suisse First Boston said. "The market believe pressure expansive policy (in United States)" said. "I quite shock economy" added. "He stood anti-inflationary policy tight fiscal discipline. He central banker America had." Mast market try ass sort direction Fed take Alan Greenspan designate succeed Volcker. "Greenspan politician academician little experience banking" Mast said. Greenspan's comment name dollar appear bottom Mast conviction back policy. "How dollar bottom level current account deficits?" said. "I sceptical." Reuter 

U.K. Chancellor Exchequer Nigel Lawson Paul Volcker outstanding Chairman Federal Reserve greatly miss spokesman U.K. Treasury said. The spokesman relay Lawson's reaction news Volcker seek third term chairman. Lawson campaign London ahead June 11 election. Lawson Alan Greenspan excellent choice Volcker's successor see reason expect change policy. Reuter 

Energy Secretary Donald Hodel expect oil price rise significantly 2000 probably 33 dlrs barrel current dollars. "I anticipate significant increase (by 2000). Thirty-three dlrs barrel unreasonable" Hodel told Senate Energy Committee. Hodel loss domestic oil production shutdown stripper (10 barrel less) well low price probably permanent. He concerned decline domestic oil exploration. Hodel urge Congress approve oil exploration section 1002 Arctic National Wildlife Refuge Alaska. He geologic condtions favorable discovery oil field equal nearby Prudhoe Bay. "The contain potentially recoverable oil resource 9.2 billion barrel amount nearly equal Prudhoe Bay oil field currently provide one-fifth U.S. domestic production" Hodel said. He production section begin Prudhoe Bay production begin decline 2000 endanger caribou wildlife area. Reuter 

Denmark's net official reserve rise 60.629 billion crown May 48.380 billion April 39.481 billion May 1986 Central Bank monthly balance sheet report. Total net reserve include reserve held commercial major saving bank correct exchange rate adjustment rise 58.373 billion crown May 47.835 billion April 32.443 billion May 1986. The Bank statement loan transaction account net capital import 0.1 billion crown May net register private capital import 9.1 billion. "Of net sale Danish crown bond country total 2.5 billion crowns. There balance purchase sale foreign securities" statement added. The Central Bank figure private bank reserve register capital movement provisional estimate yet unregistered movements. "It therefore basis draw conclusion development external current account" statement added. REUTER 

The African Development Bank (ADB) seek broad-based cooperation agreement 25-member Inter African Coffee Organisation (IACO) base Abidjan. ADB secretary Koffi Dei-Anang told news conference hop bank's governor approve agreement ADB annual meeting week Cairo. The bank seek cooperative agreement various international organisation include IACO said. Dei-Anang ADB IACO cooperate front exchange information enable identify area bank coffee industry. Reuter 

Stewart Sandwiches Inc sell coffee roast plant Sara Lee Corp's Superior Coffee Foods subsidiary undisclosed terms. The company Superior exclusive packer Squire label coffee product market Stewart Stewart provide equipment service distribution suppoort Superior coffee accounts. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc upgrade Tandy Corp's 175 mln dlrs long-term debt. The agency review focus Tandy's capacity sustain current earnings recovery company's ability far improve cash flow performance great operating efficiencies. Moody's evaluate Tandy's capital structure. That structure change significantly result retirement 250 mln dlrs debt past year. Under review Tandy's A-3 senior debt Baa-1 subordinate debt. Reuter 

Gateway Communications Inc reduce price G/NET network adapter card 25 pct 395 dlrs 525 dlrs. Gateway local network (LAN) market popular computer industry LAN supplier find user receptive demand LAN technology. Reuter 

Security Bancorp Inc merge Security Bank Almont unit Security Bank Northeast unit. Reuter 

Lopat Industries Inc profitable month operation May earn 47900 dlrs revenue 162200 dlrs. Lopat "The May result signal start profitable operation grow revenue balance year." Reuter 

Spartech Corp repurchase 10 pct 2.6 mln common share outstanding. The company believe common stock undervalue current prices. Reuter 

Gulf Western Inc name Pennzoil Co PZL> chairman chief executive officer J. Hugh Liedtke board expand director 14 15. It outside board appointment Liedtke whose company involve 10.3 billion dlr legal dispute Texaco Inc TX>. "Mr Liedtke outstanding addition board" Gulf Western chairman Martin Davis. "He demonstated broad judgment insight direct success company look forward advice counsel." Reuter 

Immunomedics Inc developed technology make join chemical molecule antibody selective manner possible. It file patent application expect issue shortly patent technology. Reuter 

Wharf Resources Ltd reach verbal agreement Nevada Packard> joint venture explore evaluate produce Nevada precious metal property near Lovelock Nev. Wharf wil receive exclusive option update exist feasibility study evaluate production decision. Subject completion necessary documentation Wharf expect Nevada property begin immediately. Reuter 

Shr 21 ct v 11 ct Net 638000 v 340000 Sales 16.9 mln v 14.7 mln Avg shrs 3007048 v 3006250 1st half Shr 41 ct v 41 ct Net 1224000 v 1142000 Sales 31.1 mln v 29.8 mln Avg shrs 3006704 v 2757631 NOTE: Current net period include nonrecurring gain 213000 dlrs. Reuter 

Hadron Inc receive three-year mln dlr contract U.S. Customs Service provide technical managerial support Customs' research development division. Reuter 

Mthly div 10-1/4 ct v 10-1/4 ct prior Pay June 26 Record June 12 Reuter 

Qtrly 35 ct v 35 ct Pay July One Record June 15 Note: payment base pre- five-for-four stock split basis distribute July 12 stockholder record June 15. Reuter 

Semi div 20 ct v 20 ct prior Pay July One Record June 17 Reuter 

Qtly div 30 ct v 30 ct Pay July Record June 12 Reuter 

Leading Italian economist regret Paul Volcker's decision serve term chairman Federal Reserve Board. Luigi Spaventa Professor Economics Rome University told Reuters decision loss world's financial markets. "He (Volcker) element reliability stability financial market experience balance equilibrium" Spaventa said. Spaventa difficult gauge immediately Volcker's decision mean dollar note market Volcker. Mario Monti Director Institute Economics Milan's Bocconi University told Reuters "whoever succeed Volcker formidable task central banker credibility monetary policy fight inflation." Monti Alan Greenspan nominate Volcker likely pursue "a rigorous monetary policy demonstrate market loss credibility." Officials Bank Italy Italian Treasury comment Volcker's decision. REUTER 

Tracor Inc chief executive officer Frank McBee 1987 earnings signficantly 18.8 mln dlrs 97 ct share achieve 1986. McBee told Reuters analyst meeting comfortable estimate analysts' share earnings rise 1.55 dlrs 1.60 dlrs share 1987. He result quarter end June 30 ahead year. First quarter net income fell 7.3 mln dlrs 37 ct share 7.4 mln dlrs 38 ct share ago. Chief operating officer Bud Baird Tracor expect announce contract quarter. Reuter 

The Far Eastern sugar market hit tighten available nearby freight space need move raw sugar various destination notably Thailand trader said. This result harden freight rate areas. These quote 12.5 17.5 dlrs tonne depend shipment destination recent fixing below 12 dlrs tonne. Charterers consider combine contract shipment inadequate space shipping source note 13 raw cargo await shipment various ports. A cargo Thai raw sugar report trade basis July New York future 25 point June/July 15 shipment trader said. But business. Reuter 

Scientists report AZT compound found useful fight AIDS suppress wide range disease include type leukemia. A paper AZT present Third International Conference Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome Cancer Institute researcher Hiroaki Mitsuya "we report dideoxynucleosides include AZT suppress wide range human animal retrovirus vitro (in test tubes)." Among cite human T-cell leukemia virus-I cause disease include leukemia immunodeficiency neuorological disorders. AIDS cause retrovirus. AZT Burroughs Wellcome Co U.S. subsidiary British Wellcome Plc WELL.L>. Mitsuya member team American Japanese researcher National Cancer Institute original discovery AZT prolong die AIDS patients. Reuter 

U.S. House Speaker Jim Wright concerned appointment Alan Greenspan succeed Paul Volcker Federal Reserve Board mean rate rise. Speaking reporter Texas Democrat base Greenspan's tenure chairman President Nixon's Council Economic Advisers policy mean high rates. "His previous service indicates economic policy base trickle theory percolate theory. This theory tends high rates" Wright said. Wright told reporter chosen Greenspan Fed decline name preference. "It someone whose primary keep rate low. That interest" said. His main concern rate slow economic growth held jobs. The United States need "to reduce level rate economy oxygen breathe" Wright said. Wright talk Greenspan appointment. Asked rate Volcker's tenure reply "Long." Reuter 

Chancellor Exchequer Nigel Lawson satisfactory progress talk Japan lead membership Tokyo Stock Exchange British merchant bank year. Following weekend talk Japanese British official Lawson told reporter "we achieve objective." The applicant Baring Brothers Co Ltd> J.Henry Wagg Co Ltd> Kleinwort Benson Lonsdale Plc KSLL.L> join "when Stock Exchange extended" said. The TSE complete May 1988. It repeatedly cannot accommodate limited space trading floor. During visit Tokyo April U.K. Corporate Affairs Minister Michael Howard present Japanese official call non-negotiable timetable grant British security company TSE membership. Howard Britain expect favourable response weekend's meeting want firm May. If Tokyo fail act Britain ready retaliate Japanese financial group London added. Last month Tokyo Stock Exchange announce plan special committee study membership question. The committee due produce report autumn. This allow TSE announce formally grant membership company chosen able start trading May. REUTER 

Finance Minster Gerhard Stoltenberg praise excellent leadership Federal Reserve Board Chairman Paul Volcker whom White House stand third term current period office expires. "Paul Volcker U.S. History chairman Federal Reserve Board. By excellent leadership won respect" Stoltenberg Finance Ministry statement. The minister described Volcker's successor economist Alan Greenspan experienced capable wish role. REUTER 

Moody's Investors Service Inc raise Aaa Aa-1 1.4 billion dlrs senior unsecured debenture New Jersey Bell Telephone Co unit Bell Atlantic Corp. The agency believe New Jersey Bell sustain strong earnings coverage. The company continue benefit constructive regulatory treatment state's healthy economy. Moody's note unemployment rate New Jersey low country. The move rapidly high growth service industry base economy added. Reuter 

The stock HF Ahmanson Co fell sharply analyst Robert Hottensen Goldman Sachs Co cut earnings estimate saving loan trader said. Ahmanson's stock fell 1-1/8 20-1/8 active trading. Hottensen unavailable comment spokeswoman Goldman Sachs reason reduction earnings estimate decline demand mortgage loan rate move higher. Mortgage rate move double digit april summer. The Goldman spokeswoman sale adjustable rate mortgage significant factor Hottensen's original earnings estimates. Last company's net income 3.22 dlrs share Ahmanson generate half 541 mln dlrs pretax income gain loan sale spokeswoman said. She reduction earnings estimate 2.60 dlrs share 1987 previous estimate 3.30 dlrs reflect optimism mortgage loan environment. In environment mortgage spokeswoman Ahmanson's quarter earnings drop 45 ct share year's 80 ct share. Hottnesen expect saving loan earn 2.90 dlrs 3.10 dlrs share 1988. previously estimate earnings 3.30 dlrs share 1988. Reuter 

NCNB Corp board governor Federal Reserve System approve application merge (CentraBank Inc) Baltimore expect complete July 1. The company board's approval include dismissal protest Baltimore-based Maryland Alliance Responsible Investing NCNB's performance Community Reinvestment Act. The company Maryland Alliance want merger block ground NCNB inadequately serve credit financial need low-income minority community markets. The company deny claim. Reuter 

Fritz Leutwiler chairman BBC AG Brown Boveri und Cie former Swiss National Bank president urge National Bank declare intent achieve rise rate mark Swiss franc. In speech shareholder Leutwiler "A gradually rise rate mark relation franc desirable standpoint industrial export regard sustain Swiss industry." "Simply appropriate declaration intent bank issue (Swiss National Bank) positive effect" said. Leutwiler serve 10 Swiss central bank step contradict National Bank's target monetary stability. "Bringing franc close mark course step step watchful eye monetary policy" told shareholders. "Realistically persuasive reason German currency quote 20 pct low Swiss." A National Bank spokesman relation mark Swiss franc example stable currency parity period time. The spokesman exchange rate market central bank impossible influence individual parity separately. Leutwiler Swiss National Bank support value dollar conjunction central bank put monetary stability jeopardy. "I recommend that. The key strong dollar lie United States itself" Leutwiler said. REUTER 

Tenneco Inc Tenngasco Corp subsidiary start deliver 40 mln cubic foot natural gas PPG Industries Inc Lake Charles Louisiana 10-year firm supply contract. Reuter 

Spectra-Physics Inc consider possibility recapitalizing restructuring seek buyer company follow rejection unsolicitied 32 dlr share bid Ciba-Geigy Corp. In filing Securities Exchange Commission San Jose Calif. gas laser accessory company board Sunday agree plan give 52 top executive bonus range 20 50 pct base salary stay company August 29. In reject takeover proposal U.S. subsidiary Swiss-based Ciba-Geigy AG company unfair. The Spectra-Physics board vote unanimously Ciba-Geigy representative participate reject Swiss-based chemical pharmaceutical company's takeover bid cite opinion financial advsior Morgan Stanley Co Inc "inadequate unfair financial view holder shares" company said. The board authorize special committee Morgan Stanley "vigorously investigate pursue authorize alternative maximize value shareholders' investment company" company said. Among alternative special committee consider sale company third party 32 dlrs share recapitalization restructuring include self tender offer and/or asset disposition dividend Spectra-Physics said. The "retention plan" 52 top officer pay average bonus percentage 28 pct salary said. Spectra-Physics board approve plan "in encourage key operating personnel remain company period turmoil uncertainty engender (Ciba-Geigy) offer." Under plan executive entitle cash bonus stay company August 29 receive earlier fire reason gross willful misconduct leave company salary sharply cut. Spectra-Physics file suit Ciba-Geigy yesterday U.S. District Court Wilmington Del. charge make takeover bid false mislead violation security law violate intent July 9 1985 standstill agreement. Spectra-Physics Ciba-Geigy indicate standstill agreement unsolicited takeover proposal company intent agreement Ciba-Geigy acquire 20 pct company unless takeover threat. Ciba-Geigy 18.8 pct Spectra-Physics Reliance Group Holdings REL> control New York investor Saul Steinberg control 12.8 pct. Spectra-Physics agreement prevents Ciba-Geigy raise stake beyond 20 pct Jan 1 1992 unless person 10 pct voting power. Reuter 

Magma Power Co discontinue talk joint ownership Niland geothermal plant Imperial Valley California Southern California Edison Co. The company retain J.P. Morgan Co JPM> act financial advisor arrange equity debt financing geothermal plant Imperial Valley. It move bring significant financial benefit shareholders. Reuter 

Kroger Co's King Soopers Supermarkets unit employee United Food Commercial Workers Union reject late contract proposal 58 pct 42 pct margin. The company employee strike May 8 kept store fully staffed. Reuter 

Integrated Generics Inc ANDA Development Corp subsidiary file Securities Exchange Commission initial offering 600000 unit consist share common stock common purchase warrant. The company unit offer "best efforts" none basis S.J. Bayern Co Inc R.F. Lafferty Co Inc. It unit expect offer five dlrs. Reuter 

Paul Volcker's decision third term Federal Reserve Chairman nomination Alan Greenspan replace revive deep concern U.S.' ability prevent far dollar decline stem rise inflation financial market analyst said. Although Greenspan know commit anti-inflation fighter Volcker mould doubt already surface U.S. financial market whether political clout monetary experience wage tough campaign inflation two. "The critical issue (Greenspan) deal inflation" Stephen Axilrod Vice Chairman Nikko Securities Co International Inc former staff director monetary financial policy Fed. "A lot question raise Volcker's departure. Until Greenspan answer market remain nervous" add Stephen Slifer money market economist Shearson Lehman Government Securities Inc. This morning's announcement sent dollar tailspin halt concert central bank intervention currency market. Reuter 

Air Canada own Canadian Government record net profit 16.3 mln dlrs quarter compare 36.3 mln dlr loss quarter year. The company turnaround due improve passenger yield reduce unit cost control capacity levels. It overall operating revenue rise eight pct compare earlier level total passenger revenue rise nine pct. Reuter 

Royal Bank Canada classify 1.3 billion dlrs medium long-term loan Brazil non-accrual lead seven pct drop quarter profit. "The designation loan non-accrual reduce bank's earnings 22 mln dlrs tax" chairman Allan Taylor statement. "Without reduction second-quarter earnings 138 mln dlrs" 10 pct increase year's profit Taylor said. The bank earlier report quarter profit fell 116.2 mln dlrs 125.1 mln dlrs ago. The bank domestic earnings rise record 125 mln dlrs quarter 52 mln dlr increase due high volume security gain yield domestic non-accrual loan portfolio. It international operation report net after-tax loss nine mln dlrs compare 52 mln dlr profit year. The decline largely reflect impact Brazil's suspend payment result 40 mln dlr reduction net income Royal Bank said. Royal Bank keep 1987 loan loss experience estimate unchanged quarter billion dlrs. It commit building provision loan loss 20 pct total outstanding loan troubled sovereign borrower 1989. The bank non-accrual loan total 3.3 billion dlrs April 30--1.5 billion domestic loan 1.8 billion international loans. Excluding 1.3 billion dlrs loan Brazil net non-accrual loan quarter decline 200 mln dlrs 1987 quarter said. 

Atlantic Richfield Co acquire exclusive worldwide right methyl methacrylate technology Texas Eastern Corp's Halcon SD Group affiliate undisclosed terms. The company technology allow introduce cleaner efficient make methyl methacrylate liquid monomer resin acrylic sheet coating mold part product plastic impact modifiers. ARCO review option commercialization technology. Reuter 

U.S. analyst expect American Petroleum Institute's weekly report oil inventory show slight build U.S. stock gasoline week end May 29 oil trader analyst said. While consensus increase rule possibility decline. Traders bar surprise tonight's report expect report neutral bearish oil prices. Heating oil stock likely build run steady slightly high add pressure oil price analyst said. Crude oil see likely build assume import continue relatively levels. Analysts expect gasoline stock rise 500000 mln barrel above 234 mln report May 22. Peter Beutel oil analyst Elders Futures inc look build "We five week gasoline demand 7.3 mln bpd likely taper 6.7-7.0 mln bpd stock build. Demand stay above 7.0 mln bpd draw" added. Rising demand oil trader analyst expect draw stock mln barrels. The U.S. Energy Information Administration late report week end 22 gasoline demand 4.4 pct 7.3 mln bpd previous year. But analyst hope reduce stock likely founder increase run refinery 0.3 pct above May 22's 81.2 pct capacity operated. Such increase raise run 100000 bpd add U.S. stocks. But analyst refiner held refinery runs. Heating oil stock expect build 700000 barrel mln 96 mln barrel level report week rise distillate stock discount have market impact time. "A build seasonal line year" future analyst said. Analysts expect crude oil stock build 1.5 mln barrel mln 325 mln barrel report API week 22. The consensus appear mln barrel add nation's inventory. Reuter 

Privately-held Piper Aircraft Corp decide resume production Piper model face suspension soon exist order filled. The company decision resume production reflect improve demand Piper product mainly due currency factor reduce inventories. It immediately resume production PA-28-161 Warrior PA-28-181 Archer PA-28R Arrow PA-28-236 Dakota PA-32 PA-32R Saratoga Pa-34 Seneca number depend market demand. The company continue PA-46 Mailbu resume production Cheyenne IIIA Pa-42-400 Cheyenne late year. Reuter 

U.S. Secretary State George Shultz 6000 billion yen economic package announce Tokyo week far U.S. Had expected. But U.S. Would lift selective economic sanction impose Japanese import April Tokyo change sale policy concern computer microchips. Speaking televise news conference link European capital Shultz hearten Japanese confront stimulate domestic global demand. "There great amount stimulus originally thought" Shultz speak Washington. "It lot nothing. It talk (Prime Minister Yasuhiro) Nakasone here. "It involves major reduction tax rate believe get tax burden stimulate economy" added. But Japanese reporter link news conference whether positive reaction meant U.S. Might decide week's Venice summit lift sanction Japanese electronic good Shultz replied: "These sanction undertaken basis agreement reach United States Japan various sale practice price relate chip market. "They lift fact change Japan agreement evident." He U.S. Officials able monitor situation month impossible determine trend month's data. The U.S. Imposed 100 pct import duty personal computer colour television tool allege Japan violate September's bilateral agreement sell computer chip below fair market value. Shultz West Germany nation look stimulate demand. Asked whether U.S. Could reasonably ask ally action stimulate economy bold American initiative reduce size federal budget deficit Shultz move already underway tackle problem. He current fiscal deficit probably reduce 35 billion dlrs budget work contain major reduction. REUTER 

Champion Home Builders Inc sell Commerce Meadows 600-site manufacture housing rental community Commerce Township Michigan pre-tax gain 900000 dlrs Heron Cay 610-site adult community Vero Beach Florida nominal pre-tax gain. The company sale proceeds partly reduce debt. It shift focus development community require significant equity have lengthy project cycles. The company local landowner investor acquire 33-acre tract Northtowne Meadows Toledo Ohio development 160 site acre commercial land. Terms transaction party involve disclosed. Reuter 

Developing country European Community (EC) breach international agreement ahead plan oil fat tax. Ambassadors EC African Caribbean Pacific (ACP) told press conference tax hit export 26 ACP countries. They EC fail follow consultation procedure laid Lome Convention regulates relation ACP bloc move affect trade sides. They EC breach undertaking bring protectionist measure current Punta del Este round trade negotiation held GATT (General Agreement Tariffs Trade) auspices. The EC Commission propose tax 330 European currency unit (Ecus) tonne import EC-produced vegetable marine fat human consumption raise billion Ecus year. EC farm minister approve tax split issue expect decide marathon meeting EC farm price begin Luxembourg June 15. Jamaican ambassador Leslie Wilson ACP country convince lead EC industry substitute product bloc oil fat imports. The ACP estimate result fall 160 185 mln Ecus member country exports. "We can't believe EC willingly measure undermine country impact measures" Wilson said. The U.S. Malaysia export hit propose tax retaliatory action approved. Wilson ACP step "as resort" add ACP touch country oppose plan. Wilson chair news conference clear Jamaica hit tax export oil fats. Among bad hit country Ivory Coast Senegal Nigeria Papua New Guinea ACP says. Reuter 

Salomon Brothers Inc announce formation global stock index design easy portfolio money manager invest world. "This money Pacific Europe quickly" Laszlo Birinyi Salomon vice president Laszlo Birinyi told news conference. The stock index product developed cooperation Frank Russell Co pension fund consult firm. Birinyi surprised exchange create future option indexes. "Somebody - If don't will" said. Reuter 

quarter end May 2 Shr 20 ct v 17 ct Net 2319000 v 1950000 Sales 92.4 mln v 72.2 mln Six mths Shr 1.60 dlrs v 1.27 dlrs Net 18.7 mln v 14.8 mln Sales 285.9 mln v 227.1 mln NOTE: Full name Burlington Coat Factory Warehouse Corp. Reuter 

Valley Capital Corp common stock list NASDAQ's National Market System effective today. Reuter 

West German official comment remark U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker Group Seven (G-7) finance minister agree process economic coordination. At year's G-7 summit Tokyo senior government official request study economic data coordinate result present week's summit Venice. West Germany government oblige economic step purely reaction economic data. The U.S. Position data coordination government react accordingly economic indicator fall short expectations. The West German stance coordination data share British government potential threat joint stance G-7 topic. At news conference Washington Baker specific agreement reach data coordination seven finance ministers. REUTER 

qtr end May 2 Shr 29 ct v 22 ct Net 1975000 v 1403000 Revs 68.1 mln v 54.0 mln Avg shrs 6722527 v 6597492 Nine mths Shr 1.17 dlrs v 92 ct Net 7847000 v 6017000 Revs 209.7 mln v 175.7 mln Avg shrs 6687138 v 6549197 Reuter 

The New York Stock Exchange Sterling Bancorp decline comment whether corporate development explain unusual activity stock. Sterling whose stock 3/8 14-7/8 policy comment unusual market activity rumor Exchange said. Reuter 

Ball Corp complete acquisition privately held Verac Inc. Terms disclosed. The company San Diego-based defense system software development company sale 23 mln dlrs 1986 operate Ball's technical product group. Reuter 

qtr end April 30 Shr seven ct v 10 ct Net 158294 v 234829 Revs 8727242 v 8152478 Reuter 

United Automobile Workers union president Owen Bieber pleased Paul Volcker leave chairman Federal Reserve Board encourage Alan Greenspan's nomination succeed him. "When Greenspan view trouble me" UAW leader told reporter news conference. Bieber whose union 1.1 mln Greenspan head Fed "I'm afraid mean continuation policy we've I don't policies." Reuter 

Secretary State George Shultz boost allied force Mideast Gulf vital protect shipping attack allied contribution examined. Asked great military presence ally gulf Shultz told reporter "Not necessarily particularly so." But adequate force need deter attack note British French United States maintain naval contingent there. "We look do" said. Reuter 

Rep. Jack Kemp conservative Republican New York praise Federal Reserve Board chairman-designate Alan Greenspan's call international monetary reform. "Alan Greenspan call fundamental reform international monetary overdue. The challenge face Mr Greenspan combine commitment monetary reform policy economic growth" Kemp statement. However Kemp disappointed Fed vice-chairman Manuel Johnson succeed Fed chief Paul Volcker. Reuter 

Chicago Pacific Corp achieve 1987 estimate analyst sharp increase sale fully dilute share earnings extraordinary item 1987. The company estimate range 3.10 dlrs 3.40 dlrs share sale 1.35 billion dlrs. It earn 2.30 dlrs share 1986 sale 954.9 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Finance Minister Edouard Balladur undecided future office Spring's presidential election spokesman said. "He (Balladur) take definitive decision activity year's time" spokesman answer Reuters question. He respond question comment Balladur close political associate wing Prime Minister Jacques Chirac radio interview. Balladur told Radio Monte Carlo interviewer "From I shall rediscover freedom private life." France due hold presidential election April May year. Under French political prime minister cabinet tender resignation incoming President give freedom appoint government. Chirac leader two-party coalition government widely assume presidential candidate incumbent Socialist President Francois Mitterrand tipped opinion poll win decides stand again. Balladur's stringent economic policy increase criticism inside outside coalition party recent month official statistic forecast show slow growth prospect rise inflation. But spokesman Balladur have thought direction policies. "The Minister State (Balladur) current ambition achieve mission economic recovery" said. "He refuse prejudge future now." REUTER 

Qtly div 12 ct v 12 ct prior Pay June 26 Record June Five Reuter 

Qtly div 10 ct v 10 ct prior Pay September Record August 13 Reuter 

Shr profit ct v loss 47 ct Net profit 209000 v loss 2164000 Sales 4849000 v 3682000 Year Shr loss 10 ct v loss 52 ct Net loss 451000 v loss 2378000 Sales 18.0 mln v 15.8 mln Reuter 

Alan Greenspan nominate replace Paul Volcker Chairman Federal Reserve Board regard financial analyst conservative economist strong stand inflation. "He'll strong fighter inflation" Martin Regalia director research economics National Council Savings Institutions. Greenspan broad experience run private economic consult firm - Townsend-Greenspan - government service. He President Ford's top economic adviser serve chairman Council Economic Advisers September 1974 January 1977. During inflation rise above 10 percent major political concern Ford's administration. "He's lot experience inflation inflation fighter" Richard Medley partner Smick-Medley Associates Greenspan. "He sear memory period" Medley added. Reuter 

Putnam Financial Services Inc new fund offering Putnam Global Governmental Income Trust global fund investment objective current income portfolio mainly government bonds. Putnam claimed trust allows investor money yield found worldwide yet investor assurance governmental obligations. Reuter 

Intelligent Systems Corp's Asher Technologies Inc introduce facsimile product portable unit internal card IBM personal computer compatibles. The JT facsimile product design IBM PC XT AT compatibles send receive III transmissioins company said. Asher product eliminate printing hard copy manually send sheet transmitted. The internal unit retail 395 dlrs portable unit sell 495 dlrs company said. Reuter 

Barnes Group Inc build 3.7 mn dlrs manufacturing plant Saline Mich. Associated Spriung unit's high-tech valve torque converter clutch spring operations. Reuter 

Neotech Industries Inc form joint venture Texas Instruments Inc develop low-cost digital pressure measurement technologies. The company Texas Instruments cooperate development application-specific integrate circuit Neotech pressure measurement device Britain. Reuter 

American Superstores Inc unit American Stores Co ASC> elect Jonathan Scott chairman board chief executive officer effective immediately. Scott replaces Thomas Sunday former chairman pass May 25 compnay said. The food retailer chain previously Scott serve vice chairman chief executive officer. Reuter 

American Telephone Telegraph Co introduce Overview Scanner work conjunction personal computer. The company Overview Scanner lends meeting environment discussion call graphic point annotated. The work ATT PC 6300 series MS-DOS-compatible personal computer company said. The company customer personal computer augment scanner 3000 dlrs. Reuter 

Bromon Aircraft Co privately held final design phase twin turboprop schedule complete production prototype aircraft fall 1988. It expect certification Federal Aviation Administration 1988. The turboprop BR-2000 carry 46 passenger six ton cargo accord company. Reuter 

ElectroSound Group Inc Richard Meixner resign senior vice president company. The company expect board appoint Robert Barone presently president Electro Sound Inc unit ElectroSound Group vice president operation ElectroSound Group. ElectroSound Meixner left company explore opportunity private company record music industry. Reuter 

Skyline Explorations Ltd expect construction begin month gold mine Johnny Mountain Camp locate 600 mile north Vancouver. The company contract 200 400 ton mill company receive cooperation provincial federal agency stage report "approval principal" require actual construction begin. Skyline optimistic approval principal receive late June expect confirm threshold tonnage grade target construction begin July. Skyline 1987 exploration drift 16 vien east Johnny Mountain advanced 320 feet. The vein continuous average foot thick plus alter mineralize hang wall. It periodic sample indicate average grade 1.05 ounce ton ore range low 0.78 ounce ton 55.8 ounce ton. Reuter 

Nearby month soybean soymeal future post short-term rally tighten supply livestock feed favorable grow condition keep crop outlook bearish trader said. "A lot soymeal dealer get worried processor soybean Summer" Illinois soyproduct dealer said. Processors compete vigorously river dealer soybean offer country elevator Decatur Illinois processor raise spot soybean basis bid cent 10 July futures. Farmer marketing crop soybean continue flat price apparently below level willing sell dealer said. Some terminal elevator operator come belief future rally month's high country movement remain farmer area sell crop soybean particularly eastern half Midwest. Soybean processor continue seasonal downtime maintenance soybean remain difficult buy reduce weekly soybean crush rate far keep spot soymeal basis strong dealer said. Futures trader tight cash supply July soybean soymeal gain deferreds. July soymeal already move premium August October month crop July/new crop November soybean move July premium month added. Reuter 

Manor Care Inc's Quality Inn International receive franchise application May month chain's history. Quality receive 51 application month. Reuter 

Robinson Nugent Inc fire start electroplate operation damage Delemont Switzerland plant. The company cleanup operation progress serve customer requirments plant period cleanup equipment repair replacement. Reuter 

Shr 33 ct v 26 ct Net 489351 v 430143 Revs 6961091 v 6009026 Avg shrs 1.5 mln v 1.6 mln Reuter 

Munson Transportation Inc propose initial offering postpone due recent weakness price comparable trucking stocks. Reuter 

An investor lead Technology Growth Fund Ltd Aspen Colo. investment firm acquire 129000 share Distributed Logic Corp 5.2 pct total try influence company. In filing Securities Exchange Commission include individual investor non-profit foundation bought stake 884414 dlrs investment Anaheim Calif. company. But "investigating possibility seek influence composition management" company increase stake. Reuter 

General Motors Corp corporate statement executive "no person qualified" Alan Greenspan replace Paul Volcker chairman Federal Reserve Board. "Greenspan posse understand American international economy interaction them" company statement. "He posse enormous judgement." No replacement Paul Volcker likely steady influence receive financial market overseas Alan Greenspan said. GM U.S. owes Volcker "a debt gratitiude" wring inflation U.S. economy." Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc likely underwriting loss persist mortgage insurance industry years. In annual report mortgage insurance industry Moody's 1986 incur loss increase 21 pct dismal record post before. Moody's underwriting loss mainly reflect major economic force structural complication risk makeup industry. The rating agency mortgage insurance industry risk remains slow improvement appear likely. Reuter 

Henry Kaufman manage director Salomon Brothers Inc nomination economist Alan Greenspan replace Federal Reserve Board Chairman Paul Volcker bearish near term fix income currency markets. "The basic direction rate changed. The fundamental direction rate continue upward interrupt intermittent rallies" Kaufman statement. He implication equity market neutral bullish. Kaufman "Unlike Paul Volcker enter office Federal Reserve chairman strong credibility domestically internationally Mr Greenspan demonstrate competence policy independence gain full confidence financial markets." Greenspan knowledgeable behavior U.S. economy professional skill international limited Kaufman noted. "Consequently know abroad view issue Less Developed Country Debt initially carry weight Mr Volcker." Reuter 

The operator major U.S. crude oil pipeline shutdown flood damage day repair function again. Dan Stevens manager government affair Texaco Inc TX> operator pipeline subsidiary Texaco Pipeline Co company hope repair begin five day expect day complete. "At line job done" Stevens add timing repair depend damage pipeline difficult ass flood Red River. The pipeline shipping roughly 225000 barrel crude oil 55 pct capacity 30 day precede shutdown Saturday Stevens said. The pipeline shut Cushing Okla Witchita Falls Kan Saturday due undetermined leak Red River cross near Oklahoma/Texas border severe rain spokesman Texaco said. Stevens reasonable suggest pipeline operate full capacity reopens shortfull caution talk customer determine requirements. Oil analyst trader sure shutdown continue raise U.S. oil prices. Monday Texaco confirm pipeline close West Texas Intermediate crude spot market New York Mercantile Exchange's energy future complex rise 20 ct barrel. Stevens reasonable suggest pipeline operate full capacity reopens shortfull caution talk customer determine requirements. Oil analyst trader sure shutdown continue raise U.S. oil prices. Monday Texaco confirm pipeline close West Texas Intermediate crude spot market New York Mercantile Exchange's energy future complex rise 20 ct barrel. Reuter 

Neti Technologies Inc sell mln dlrs U.S. cash note assumption liability Huron Leasing Inc subsidiary investor head former Huron executive. The company transaction yield mln dlrs cash Huron sell lease service computer hardware. The transaction subject approval Montreal Vancouver Stock Exchange arrangement financing June 15. Reuter 

PacifiCorp acquire Thomas Nationwide Computer Corp 25 mln dlrs cash 15 mln dlrs defer consideration depend future performance company. Thomas Nationwide lease re-markets International Business Machines Corp equipment PacifiCorp said. It Thomas Nationwide combine Systems Leasing Corp unit MacLean Va. Reuter 

K-Tron International Inc board elect John C. Tucker president fill position vacant July 30 1985. Tucker join K-Tron 1981 vice president chief financial officer treasurer. In 1986 promote executive vice president chief operating officer. Reuter 

FMC Corp enter equally own joint venture Indo-Thai Synthetics call Thai Peroxide Co Ltd build hydrogen peroxide plant initial capacity 5000 metric tonne 100 pct peroxide north Bangkok. The company plant expect starft operating fourth quarter 1988. It venture receive grant incentive government Thailand. Reuter 

Alternacare Corp Wallace Reed step duty chairman board name chairman emeritus. Reed continue serve board Alternacare add company immediate plan fill position. The company Reed re-elected board president chief executive Paul Dinkel. Reuter 

Consolidated Oil Gas Inc exercise price Oil Indexed Common Stock Purchase Warrants Series 1900 CGS.WS.P> remain dlrs share six month period July December 31. The warrant exercise price base average price West Texas Intermediate Crude Oil report trading month May. For month average price 20 dlrs barrel index above change exercise price warrants. Reuter 

Lac Minerals Ltd reiterate expect substantially high 1987 profit revenue year's earnings 19.1 mln dlrs 250.2 mln dlrs revenues. The 1986 result include dispute Page-Williams mine Hemlo Ontario. A decision imminent Lac's appeal 1986 Ontario court decision order Lac mine International Corona Resources Ltd ICR.TO>. Lac chief executive Peter Allen told institutional investor anticipate strong performance strong operating result active revenue management program. Lac year-to-date gold production exclude dispute Page-Williams mine 134000 ounce line target 1987 production 300000 ounces. It expect average realize price 450 U.S. dlrs ounce full-year 1987. It outstanding forward contract May 29 220000 ounce gold average price 439 U.S. dlrs ounce include 135000 ounce mature 1987 482 U.S. dlrs ounce. Reuter 

Disc Technology Corp receive 1500000 dlrs order hard disc MiniScribe Corp's MiniScribe Ltd Singapore affiliate. It shipment complete September 30. Reuter 

Hoffmann-La Roche Inc licensee Hormone Research Foundation patent synthetic version human growth hormone enter license agreement Eli Lilly Co involve Lilly's Humatrope hormone treat dwarfism children. Details license agreement disclose company official unavailable comment. A statement company "Lilly Roche enter license agreement alternative litigation." South San Francisco-based Genetech Inc GENE> market genetically engineer human growth hormone call Protropin. Lilly receive approval Food Drug Administration market human growth hormone earlier year. A Lilly spokesperson company effect license patent hormone Hoffman-LaRoche. She refuse comment term license agreement. Last September Hoffman-LaRoche Foundation sue Genetech Federal court California allege product infringe Hoffman's patent synthetic hormone. Reuter 

United Services Advisors Inc sell investor 75760 share prefer stock 3.25 dlrs equal warrant five ct agreement sell 454546 prefer share warrant investor terminated. The warrant exercisable seven dlrs share five years. It sale 2033733 prefer share outstanding. Reuter 

Chicago Pacific Corp chairman Harvey Kapnick told analyst expect repurchase 25 mln dlrs company's 200 mln dlr issue 14 pct subordinate notes. To date company repurchase 60 mln notes. "This beneficial effect net income effect 1987 already anticipate estimate 1987" Kapnick said. Earlier Kapnick analysts' 1987 projection 31 35 mln dlrs 3.10 dlrs 3.40 dlrs earnings operation reasonable. These compare 2.30 dlrs 22 mln dlrs 1986. Since November 1985 Chicago Pacific acquire Hoover Co> Rowenta> appliance company furniture company Kippinger/Pennsylvania House Group Inc> McGuire Co>. The company spent total 724.8 mln dlrs acquisitions. "We believe balance sheet provide 300 mln dlrs future acquisitions" Kapnick said. Kapnick expect sale company's appliance division increase 17 pct 915.7 mln dlrs report 1986. Kapnick far 67 mln dlrs trademark patent reduce 40 mln dlrs due net loss carryforwards acquire company offset asset require current accounting principles. Reuter 

The Federal National Mortgage Association 8.55 pct coupon rate yield 8.55 four-year 900 mln dlr issue 9.20 pct coupon rate yield 9.22 10-year 600 mln dlr issue tomorrow's 1.5 billion dlr debenture offer. Prices par 99.875 respectively. FNMA previously 900 mln dlr issue matures June 10 1991 600 mln dlr issue matures June 10 1997. First payment occur Dec 10 1987 said. FNMA proceeds redeem 300 mln dlrs 7.65 pct debenture 1.05 billion dlrs 11.2 pct debenture mature June 10 1987 finance operations. The debenture issue book entry form minimum purchase amount 10000 dlrs multiple 5000 dlrs thereafter. The debenture free trade 0930 hr EDT tomorrow FNMA said. Reuter 

Amoco Corp's wholly own Amoco Canada Petroleum Co Ltd yet detail regard amount timing previously report share offering Canada do talk Investment Canada come weeks. An earlier report publish report base interview Amoco Canada president T. Don Stacy Amoco's stock offering total billion Canadian dlrs company succeed 5.22 billion Canadian dlr bid Dome Petroleum Ltd DMP>. Reuter 

Lead underwriter Kidder Peabody Co Inc sand initial offering mln common share Designs Inc underway 13 dlrs share. The company sell 1125000 share shareholder rest underwriter grant option buy 300000 share cover overallotments. Reuter 

RCM Technologies Inc Securities Exchange Commission declare post-effective amendment registration statement effective make warrant exercisable. Reuter 

Noranda Forest Inc company control Noranda Inc NOR.TO> net earnings 165 mln dlrs 1987 profit likely continue grow Noranda Forest chairman Adam Zimmerman told Reuters interview. "I earnings peaked" Zimmerman Noranda Forest Canada's large forest product company. Noranda previously spin vast forest product holding company make initial offering Noranda Forest shares. Zimmerman told Reuters agrees forest industry analyst's prediction Noranda Forest earn 165 mln dlrs 1987. Noranda Forest's preliminary share prospectus release show company 1986 pro forma earnings 80.2 mln dlrs exclude 22.5 mln dlr extraordinary gain. Asked comment analyst's forecast Noranda earn 200 mln dlrs Zimmerman "I directionally correct." He Noranda Forest consolidate financial result 50 pct-owned MacMillan Bloedel Ltd MB.TO>. Zimmerman Noranda Forest expect raise 350 mln dlrs share issue make Canada's large initial offerings. Noranda Forest intend issue 15 pct common share parent company Noranda Inc "is prepared 49 pct hands" added. Noranda Inc hold 79.9 mln outstanding share Noranda Forest. Zimmerman decline future secondary share offering occur "as soon it's right" either cash securities. Proceeds share issue mainly reduce Noranda Forest's term debt list pro forma 1.36 billion dlrs quarter 1987 chairman Zimmerman said. Noranda Forest's priority continue cut debt "a comfortable manageable level likely future circumstances" 30 pct capital said. "I learn asset support level debt earnings can't support associate time rates" Zimmerman commented. Noranda Forest pro forma operating loss 8.6 mln dlrs 1985 2.9 mln dlrs 1984 period high rates. The company's pro forma 1987 quarter result show net profit 42.2 mln dlrs 49 ct share earnings 4.7 mln dlrs ct share exclude 22.5 mln dlr extraordinary gain prior year. Zimmerman company concentrate maintain quality earnings exist operation increase operating volumes. "We likely spend money enhance operation ahead expand them" said. Noranda Forest interested buying 50 pct already Northwood Pulp Timber Ltd Mead Corp MEA> 150 mln 200 mln dlrs Zimmerman said. Noranda Forest Mead refusal other's Northwood hold Mead likely anxious sell added. Noranda Forest's initial dividend policy pay 10 cent share quarterly. When Zimmerman agree dividend compare cash flow add company "establish typical sensible dividend policy." Reuter 

VBI Corp British West Indies investment firm told Securities Exchange Commission raise stake France Fund Inc 1075700 share 14.3 pct total 896500 share 11.9 pct. VBI bought 179200 France Fund common share April 24 June 2 price range 13.000 14.125 dlrs share. Reuter 

Lead underwriter PaineWebber Group Inc PWJ> offering mln share Class A prefer stock Southern Co's Georgia Power Co subsidiary underway 25 dlrs share. It underwriter won issue competitive sale bid 23.812 dlrs share. The share redeemable refund operation June 1 1992 sinking fund start retire issue. Reuter 

Scott Paper Co S.D. Warren Co subsidiary undertake 60 mln dlr modernization increase capacity Muskegon Mich. paper plant. The company plant nation's large producer premium quality coat printing paper. It modernization expect complete fall 1988. Reuter 

Citizens Savings Bank FSB incur expense 393000 dlrs 20 ct share six month end June 30. Citizens expense due recent decision Federal Home Loan Bank Board eliminate FSLIC secondary reserrve December 31 1986. According Citizens FHLBB action take cover future loss financially troubled institutions. Citizens secondary reserve balance December 31 1986 694000 dlrs. Reuter 

International Cablecasting Technologies Inc introduce proprietary technology broadcast compact disk-quality digital sound home. The company technology call digital modulation permit noise-free undistorted transmission 10 channel pure digital sound data via satellite cable subscribers' home single video channel. According company consumer service offer International via technology SuperSound package eight 24-hour commercial-free digital uninterrupted music channel subscribers. International SuperSound service expect launch late 1987 generally available 1988. Reuter 

Lynch Corp offer 10.50 dlrs share cash 4.50 dlrs subordinate debenture 1/4 share company Becor Western Inc share outstanding. Lynch propose offer "substantially improves" offer 10.45 dlrs share cash 4.00 dlrs senior sinking fund debenture BCW Acquisition Inc form Becor's management. Lynch Chairman Mario Gabelli head own 12.35 pct Becor's 16.5 mln outstanding share Lynch bid "is dlr offer." Gabelli previously filing Securities Exchange Commission Becor managment buyout unfar. The Lynch officer invite Becor shareholder offer. Following sale Becor's aerospace subsidiary February management lead President William Winter announce plan 238.1 mln dlr leveraged buyout. planning Becor 238.1 mln dlrs. A shareholder vote buyout offer schedule June four. Reuter 

Munson Transportation Inc postpone propose initial offering due weakness price truck stocks. Munson trucking company transport food product commodity primarily Midwestern Central Northeastern section U.S. Reuter 

Southern California Edison Co SCE> Chairman Howard Allen company plan major construction project eight years. "We plan major plant addition mid-1990s maybe longer" Allen told renewable energy conference here. He Southern California Edison peak reserve margin great 20 pct year. Allen expect renewable alternate energy source solar geothermal contribute 26 pct company's electricity 10 years. Reuter 

Overseas Shipholding Group Inc president Morton Hyman oil production OPEC rise half 1987 freight rate tanker rise accordingly. Hyman deliver speech annual shareholder meeting international tanker market generally weak throughout quarter March OPEC oil production picked up. The result modest improvement tanker rates. Overseas 73 pct fleet handle liquid cargo. He tanker requirement decrease September 1986 OPEC production quota drop level oil stock rose. For quarter 1987 company report net income 10.3 mln dlrs 40 ct share compare 9.3 mln dlrs 36 ct share comparable quarter ago. The company report net income 1986 37.3 mln dlrs 1.45 dlrs share. "The improvement company's 1986 result decline earnings reflect sharp albeit temporary rise freight rate international tanker market summer" Hyman said. He Alaskan oil trade continue principal source employment U.S. flag tanker fleet represent approximately 15 pct company's tonnage. Overseas own operates 67 vessels. Reuter 

Qtrly div 12.5 ct share v 12.5 ct prior Pay Aug 25 Record Aug Three NOTER: full name company overseas shipholding inc. Reuter 

Qtly div 11 ct v 10 ct prior Pay July 31 Record July 17 Reuter 

The Quebec government join B.F. Goodrich Canada Inc study feasability building vinyl chloride monomer plant Montreal. The plant supply manufacturer PVC construction material Eastern Canada Northeastern U.S. government official said. Theys plant cost 125 mln Canadian dlrs production begin 1991 economic condition right. The Quebec government want project proceed provide future demand Petromont Inc petrochemical products. Petromont jointly own Union Carbide Canada Ltd UCC.TO> Quebec government's SGF industrial development group. Its Montreal plant provide ethylene raw material project. Quebec want Interprovincial Pipe Line Ltd IPIPF.O> adapt pipeline Sarnia Ont. Montreal carry natural gas liquid decision federal National Energy Board. It pipeline provide Petromont feedstock one-third cost move rail. Reuter 

Chicago Pacific Corp chairman Harvey Kapnick told analyst expect whithin repurchase 25 mln dlrs company's 200 mln dlr issue 14 pct subordinate notes. To date company repurchase 60 mln notes. "This beneficial effect net income effect 1987 already anticipate estimate 1987" Kapnik said. reuter 

Qtly div 45 ct v 45 ct prior Pay July One Record June 15 Reuter 

Newbery Corp Fireman's Fund Corp FFC> United Bank Arizona continue meet explore alternative company believe irrespective outcome force file bankruptcy week. On May Newbery receive supplemental funding 30-day arrangement Fireman's Fund United Bank allow continue operate decision company's request long-term financing. The company announce able July payment 12 pct subordinate convertible debentures. Reuter 

The buffer stock manager International Cocoa Organization (ICCO) tender 3000 tonne cocoa bean Wednesday June 3 ICCO statement. It condition remain unchanged previous announcement. These condition offer register company pound sterling cocoa bean standard differential ICCO's buffer stock rule cocoa afloat December shipment spot December arrival/delivery. The basis position afloat May/July shipment June arrival/delivery. For position appropriate carry cost take account. The deadline receipt offer manager shall 1330 hr london (1230 gmt) offer emanate secondhand market 1400 hour offer emanate origins. The competitiveness offer assess take account standard differential cost take cocoa store (currently 23.00 pound sterling "cif landed" 38.00 pound sterling "cif shipping weights" "in store") cost carry currently 12.00 pound sterling month ICCO said. No offer consider offering party added. Reuter 

A foreign investment told Securities Exchange Commission raise stake Scandinavia Fund Inc 3040600 share 46.6 pct total outstanding 2829300 share 43.2 pct. The include Ingemar Rydin Industritillbehor AB Swedish firm VBI Corp British West Indies investment firm Norwegian investor Erik Vik bought 211300 Scandinavia common share April 30 price range 10.000 10.625 dlrs share. Reuter 

Lowe's Cos Inc sale week end May 29 11 pct 221.0 mln dlrs 199.5 mln dlrs same-store sale five pct. Reuter 

Mueller Brass Co effective shipment adjust price brass mill product except free-cutting brass rod related alloy copper tube related product reflect contain copper value 73 cent pound cents. Reuter 

Mercantile Stores Co Inc stockholder approve 2-1/2-for-1 common stock split. Mercantile record date split June expect mail additional share result split June 15. Reuter 

AMR Corp parent company American Airlines complete private placement 150 mln dlrs prefer auction rate stock Bankers Trust Co NY BT>. AMR prefer stock sell series 50 mln dlrs each. Each series perpetual pay dividend rate determine seven week Dutch Auction process AMR added. The company add proceeds issue work capital capital expenditure corporate purposes. Reuter 

Two miss six injured tank contain thousand cubic metre fuel burst flame Shell storage unit Lyon rescue worker said. The blaze broke explosion 1330 local (1130 GMT). Shell subsidiary Royal Dutch/Shell Group RD>. Some 200 fireman fought flame gasoline storage unit Edouard Herriot riverside port complex appear blaze control fell. The entire southern section Lyon cordoned off. The fire destroyed five giant tank threaten Shell spokesman said. He company estimate six seven thousand cubic metre domestic fuel oil gasoline additive burned. The total capacity burning tank 10000 cubic metre empty explosion start today's fire added. Reuter 

Pay 'N Pak Stores Inc receive revision previously disclose proposal buy company. Pay 'N Pak proposal leveraged buyout firm amend increase dividend rate cumulative prefer stock receive PNP shareholder 13.5 pct 17.5 pct. As previoiusly announce proposal call transaction PNP shareholder receive combination 17.50 dlrs cash 2.50 dlrs liquidation value cumulative prefer stock common share. Under proposal receive Paul Bilzerian PNP shareholder receive blend basis 16.67 dlrs cash 3.33 dlrs liquidation value cumulative redeemable prefer stock common share company said. Under Bilzerian proposal dividend rate prefer stock joint opinion financial advisor Bilzerian financial advisor Pay 'N Pak prefer stock trade liquidation value fully distribute basis company said. Reuter 

First Tennessee National Corp offering 75 mln dlrs subordinate capital note due 1999 yield 10.43 pct lead manager Goldman Sachs Co. The note 10-3/8 pct coupon price 99.65 yield 175 basis point comparable Treasury securities. Non-callable maturity debt rat Baa-2 Moody's BBB-plus Standard Poor's. The gross spread seven dlrs sell concession dlrs reallowance 2.50 dlrs. Salomon Brothers co-managed deal. Reuter 

U.S. military force Mideast Gulf order protect American flag vessel occasional U.S. arm delivery ship "non-belligerent" Pentagon today. "No state support policy protect shipping waters" Pentagon spokesman Bob Sims Reagan Administration drew plan increase protective U.S. military presence gulf. Sims deny publish report U.S. Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger sought air cover protect neutral shipping western gulf attack Iran Iraq. "As repeatedly American flag vessel protection exception limited case-by-case basis ship carry Foreign Military Sales equipment friendly non-belligerent region" Sims said. U.S. warship gulf week ago protect Kuwaiti ship sail Bahrain U.S. arm Bahrain Kuwait. But Sims Washington receive assurance arm elsewhere. He Kuwait turn 11 oil tanker U.S. firm fly American flag protect U.S. warship consider belligerent despite Iranian charge Kuwait support Iraq gulf war. Kuwaiti tanker repeat Iranian attack. Sims refuse United States beef seven-ship Middle East Task Force gulf protect 11 Kuaiti tankers. But Pentagon official additional ship air cover consideration. Reuter 

Qtly div five ct v five ct prior Pay July 10 Record June 24 Reuter 

Asamera Inc wholly own Asamera Oil (U.S.) Inc conclude 25.25 mln U.S. dlr sale Denver refinery Total Petroleum North America Ltd. In addition Total purchasing crude oil refine product inventory market value Asamera said. Reuter 

Viacom International Inc U.S. District Court Southern District New York deny motion Carsey-Werner Co> temporary injunction block propose merger Viacom subsidiary National Amusements Inc>. Carsey-Werner producer Cosby Show. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp downgrade Hospital Corp America's 1.8 billion dlrs debt. S P cite uncertainty company's major restructuring. It note Hospital Corp agree sell 104 acute care hospital company own employee stock ownership plan. The sale 1.8 billion dlrs cash. If proceeds primarily share repurchase weaker asset cash flow protection result S P said. Hospital Corp currently carry A-rated senior debt A-minus subordinate debt. Reuter 

AEGON U.S. Holding Corp unit AEGON N.V. Netherlands Life Investors Inc LINV.O> purchase 451000 share Life Investors common stock 51.61 dlrs share cash. The purchase agreement company November 1981 say April 30 1983 1987 company offer buy one-sixth Life Investors' common stock outstanding Dec. 31 1982 already own AEGON. On Dec. 31 1988 offer buy remain shares. Reuter 

Wesbanco Inc board execute merger agreement Bank Sissonville>. When merger complete 50000 share Bank Sissonville common stock outstanding convert 2.75 share Wesbanco common stock company said. The Bank Sissonville total asset 25.5 mln dlrs Dec 31 1986 company said. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc affirm Ba-3 rat convertible subordinate debenture Computer Associates International Inc due 2012 UCCEL Corp due 1995. About 113 mln dlrs debt affected. Computer Associates plan acquire UCCEL exchange stock Moody's noted. The result merger create large independent software company yet. Moody's believe merge company experience short-term pressure margin consolidate operations. In long-term agency outlook positive anticipates greatly improve market position. Reuter 

Nuclear Data Inc auditor Ernst Whinney quaified opinion financial statement fiscal end February 28. As previously report Nuclear Data's bank debt matures June 30 1987 lender require obtain replacement financing then. It auditor qualify opinion company yet commitment replacement financing. Nuclear Data expect financing shortly. Reuter 

Period end April 30 Shr 71 ct v 42 ct Shr dilute 62 ct v 38 ct Net 2629704 v 1721384 Revs 39.5 mln v 32.0 mln Reuter 

Qtr end April 30 Shr 32 ct v 20 ct Net 1981681 dlrs v 1022451 dlrs Avg shrs 6220000 v 5120000 12 mths Shr 1.22 dlrs v 59 ct Net 7005000 dlrs v 3030000 dlrs Avg shrs 5737808 v 5120000 NOTE: full name company commonwealth mortgage co inc. Reuter 

Rep. Norman Lent R-N.Y. Dennis Levine's conviction insider trading show tougher enforcement insider trading law government security industry. Lent's comment start close testimony Levine House Oversight Investigations subcommittee. Levine's testimony released. "Why didn't Dennis Levine's superior investment banking house question source 'uncanny' information corporate takeovers?" Lent asked. "Why Securities Exchange Commission historically unable prosecute insider trading case outside evidence illegal behavior take place?" Lent added. Lent Levine told subcommittee staff associate major bank told insider trading accepted practice. Levine worry caught SEC. "The security industry stop put morality ethic behind proift. The SEC exercise tougher control supervision industry" Lent said. Reuter 

Harcourt Brace Jovanovich Inc manager special cash dividend buy additional stock demonstrate confidence company chairman William Jovanovich said. In write statement Jovanovich company's recapitalization pay dividend 40 dlrs share cash prefer stock worth 10 dlrs share leveraged buyout. He management Harcourt receive share recapitalization legal employee stock ownership program. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp downgrade 160 mln dlrs debt Norstar Bancorp. Cut company's senior debt AA-minus AA subordinate debt A-plus AA-minus prefer stock A A-plus. S/P affirm A-1-plus commercial paper. The downgrade reflect modest increase Norstar's risk profile combine low financial performance. Norstar's recent purchase 1.2 billion dlr Syracuse Savings Bank require substantial management financial resource bring unit's performance line bank's operation agency said. Reuter 

General Motors Corp's negotiation contract cover 370000 U.S. worker belong United Automobile Workers union July 27 UAW president Owen Bieber said. He opening talk contract cover 110000 union Ford Motor Co F> follow day. Current contract company expire 2359 EDT September 14. Reuter 

North American Ventures Inc sell nine mln dlrs company's restrict common share newly create Butler International Inc> Employee Stock Option Plan. North American nine mln dlrs payment result excess fund Butler's pension plan. The transaction 1.5 mln North American common share approximate 5.1 pct company's outstanding share North American said. North American proceeds stock sale increase company's stockholders' equity 85 mln dlrs pay aquisition financing Butler purchase complete January. Reuter 

end March 31 Shr 91 ct v 1.08 dlrs Net 4800000 v 5800000 Rev 118.7 mln v 110.3 mln Reuter 

U.K. Bankers laud outgo U.S. Federal Reserve Chairman Paul Volcker achievement past eight express uncertainty economist Alan Greenspan nominate President Reagan succeed him. "One Volcker's great achievement continuity stability give international markets" Carlos Santistevan executive director Libra Bank Plc. However uncertain Greenspan fill role degree said. Greenspan head financial consult firm Townesend Greenspan Associates Inc Chairman Council Economic Advisers Ford Administration. "He prominent know figure U.S." David Lomax Group Economics Adviser National Westminster Bank Plc described Greenspan "orthodox Republican economist" suit get U.S. Economy track Volcker. But banker London unfamiliar Greenspan's view domestic international economics international debt crisis. "I sad Volcker go. He central banker repute protect U.S. And international banking system" Libra's Santistevan. Volcker know understands problem face indebted country add unlikely Greenspan familiar personality involved. For reason expect little change Fed's approach debt crisis U.S. Commercial bank harder line deal add billion dollar reserve loss third debt. Another senior banker deal Latin American debt doubt change post-Volcker reasons. He despite U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker's debt initiative call great contribution bank government multilateral organization government's little try improve situation leave bulk responsibility hand bankers. Despite Fed's independence central government question impact Greenspan come job close Presidential election. News Volcker seek third term hit financial market hard. The U.S. Dollar fell sharply foreign exchange market report concert central bank intervention Fed Bundesbank help recover somewhat. Prices Eurodollar denominate bond fell price U.S. Treasury bond trade lose point. But despite disruption market Lloyds Bank Plc's Group Economic Adivser Christopher Johnson announcement well-timed recent rise dollar mark yen. In recent statement U.S. Officials dollar fall White House briefing announce nomination Greenspan "there certainly evidence" dollar bottom out. However economist believe recent rise dollar temporary fall far America's huge trade deficit begin reverse. "The dollar far fall years" Lloyds Bank's Johnson. He add soft landing. Like economist Johnson anxious hear Greenspan's testify Congressional confirmation hearings. "He everything establish credibility. We hear view inflation outlook rates" said. Some banker criticize Volcker take hard stance combat inflation late 1970's tighten U.S. Monetary policy push rate record levels. "He tighten Republicans want relaxed stance Latin American debt crisis erupt (in 1982)" National Westminster's Lomax said. Lomax Greenspan appoint inherit agreement enter Volcker Group Five industrial nation dollar. However danger lie dollar stability maintain monetary policy tight. Too firm monetary policy send U.S. Into recession welcome European counterpart said. Reuter 

Connecticut Light Power Co unit Northeast Utilities sell 50 mln dlrs prefer stock ongoing refinance high-interest debt high-coupon prefer stock. Northeast stock retire 25 carry annual dividend 9.1 pct Connecticut Light proceeds redeem 36 mln dlrs prefer stock issue June 1982. The company issue offer E. F. Hutton Co. Reuter 

Hollinger Inc pay 50 mln dlrs cash previously report acquisition privately own Unimedia Inc chairman Conrad Black told reporter annual meeting confirm publish report. Commenting press report 50 mln dlr price tag Black "That wildly inaccurate" decline disclose actual cost. Montreal-based Unimedia Quebec's third large newspaper French language daily newspaper Quebec City Ottawa Chicoutimi Quebec printing plant Ontario Quebec. Black add Hollinger continue seek acquisition daily newspaper circulation 25000 readers. He Hollinger currently talk 10 newspaper U.S. company currently own 23 dailies. "There really one available" told reporter add remain acquisition opportunity U.S. He Hollinger's 58 pct-owned Daily Telegraph PLC London profitable year's fourth quarter. For full-year 1987 Daily Telegraph break Black cite major reduction labor cost improve technology Telegraph Britain's large circulation quality daily. The Telegraph lose 13.2 mln Canadian dlrs year. Daily Telegraph chief executive Andrew Knight told reporter meeting Telegraph's daily circulation risen 25000 September 1150000 weekday despite add competition Independent daily newspaper. Knight The Independent affect Telegraph's growth make inroad circulation London quality daily The Times The Guardian. Hollinger chairman Black predict Hollinger post 1987 net income 55 mln dlrs dlr share include extraordinary gain previous sale discontinue operations. Hollinger lose 87 mln dlrs 6.54 dlrs share few average share extraordinary loss 52 mln dlrs. Black told shareholder quarter operating earnings continue operation amount 499000 dlrs year-ago loss 165000 dlrs. Revenues continue operation rise 102.1 mln dlrs 1.5 mln dlrs include Daily Telegraph revenue added. Consolidated quarter figure disclosed. He Daily Telegraph's quarter operating loss sharply reduce year. Reuter 

Algonquin Gas Transmission Co unit Texas Eastern Corp file Federal Energy Regulatory Commission approval rate schedules. It file propose service agreement interruptible firm transportation service. Algonquin filing allow customer move available spot gas supply price competitive markets. Reuter 

USX Corp's USS division raise price hot roll bar semi-finished product 1100 series grade 10 dlrs ton effective July One 1987. The company increase reflect current market conditions. The company percentage increase reflect current price nor ton product sell currently. Reuter 

Central Maine Power Co issue request proposal 150 potential project sponsor cogeneration production projects. The utility fill six avoid cost decrement solicit proposal fill 50 megawatt seventh eighth decrement define Maine Public Utilities Commission. Central Main avoid cost decrement establish basis cost negotiate utility Hydro-Quebec plan purchase begin 1992. Reuter 

Spartech Corp earlier repurchase 10 pct 2.6 mln outstanding share market 475000 dlrs currently available buybacks. It indenture convertible subordinate debt limit stock purchase 50 pct net earnings (less prefer stock dividends) fiscal year. Reuter 

President Reagan call continued nondiscriminatory treatment Romanian export United States congressional opposition Bucharest government's record human rights. A White House statement Reagan's decision press continuation so-called Most Favored Nation (MFN) status Romania "exceptionally difficult" "all option seriously considered." But statement despite concern human right abuse Bucharest government president decide continued help stimulate emigration Romania give United States influence human right practice there. The statement issue Reagan sent Congress request one-year extension MFN Romania Hungary China. The House Representatives attach trade bill legislation temporarily deny MFN Romania pending certification Reagan country progress human rights. There controversy continuation MFN Hungary China. Reuter 

Oper shr eight ct v ct Oper net 119000 v 32000 Sales 12.0 mn v 11.3 mln Note: Current qtr figure exclude loss discontinue operation 30000 dlrs ct share v loss 54000 dlrs ct share. Reuter 

Rainier Bancorp Allan Nichols Consumer Banking Division resign effective June 19 succeed David Williams. Williams currently Corporate Banking division Rainier said. It James Cullen currently charge International Banking succeed Williams Corporate Banking Steve Driscol director International Division's Asia-Pacific Region succeed Cullen International Banking. Reuter 

Corvus Systems Inc Lewis Lipton currently president name additional post chief executive. The company Lipton elect board. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp upgrade 100 mln dlrs B-plus subordinate debt Computer Associates International Inc 13 mln dlrs B-minus subordinate debt UCCEL Corp. S P cite merger agreement company believe improve firms' market position complement other's product distribution. But S P point duplicate product line raise marketing difficulty restrict sales. The agency study improvement financial condition competitive position merge entity. Reuter 

Autodesk Inc underwritten offering 2640836 common share 24 dlrs share. The company sell 2.5 mln share rest sell stockholders. Reuter 

The Commodity Credit Corporation CCC accepted bid export bouses cover sale 150000 tonne U.S. barley Saudi Arabia U.S. Agriculture Department said. The CCC accepted bonus offer exporter average 40.88 dlrs tonne said. The barley delivery August 15-November 30 shiments 50000 tonne each. The bonus award Louis Dreyfus Corporation paid form commodity CCC stocks. An additional 350000 tonne U.S. barley available Saudi Arabia Export Enhancement Program initiative annnounced May 15 1987 said. Reuter 

Rockwell International Corp U S West Knowledge Engineering Inc U S West Inc subsidiary agree jointly develop operator workstation combine voice data capability directory assistance call intercept operator function single terminal. It system offer integrate element Rockwell's telephone- company-oriented ISS-3000 Automatic Call Distribution switches. Reuter 

The European Community plunge ever-deepening budget crisis minister fail reach agreement plug gap near-bankrupt Community's finance diplomat said. As EC budget minister end six hour talk Luxembourg diplomat little basis accord amongst trading bloc's 12 member states. The EC executive Commission say Community face deficit five billion European Currency Units force choose massive spending cut bankruptcy. It appeal member pay extra 1.5 billion ECUs meet deficit cause soar farm spending fall revenues. But hardliner Britain West Germany insist extra cash Community instead call clampdown farm spending absorbs third EC budget. "We clear expense base income" West German Minister State Hans Tietmeyer told reporters. "There Germans agree extra financing form contributions" added. A Commission proposal plug budget gap pay member arrears advance spending Community farm policy agreement diplomat added. The proposal strongly back Britain West Germany save billion ECUs payment delayed months. But poorer member borrow fund cover delay complain change unfairly impose burden them. The European Parliament expect refuse debate changeover farm payment far delay move solve deficit parliamentary source said. Reuter 

Data General Corp sale continue remain flat see little evidence demand pick near future. The company "really see major change" demand vice president marketing J. David Lyons told Reuters interview. "Our sale moderate flat certainly down" Lyons said. Data General president Edson de Castro decline comment outlook computer industry company's performance. Wall Street analyst surprised confident message Data General earlier announce computer networking product link personal computer network minicomputer computer vendors. "They've try haven't work" Paine Webber analyst Stephen Smith. "Data General find aggressive pricing alone isn't enough" win sales" Smith said. In quarter end March 31 Data General post operating loss 24.4 mln dlrs 91 ct share compare earnings 2.0 mln dlrs eight ct share earlier. Sales quarter fell 315.2 mln dlrs 318.8 mln dlrs. Despite report upturn sale rival Digital Equipment Corp DEC> International Business Machines Corp IBM> Data General convince minicomputer market emerge two-year slump. "We wait sustain improvement orders" Lyons said. Lyons hardware software introduce company response customer tie together grow PCs connect large mini mainframe computers. He product strategy provide industry-standard system allow computer vendor share exchange information. Analysts note Data General company promote integration PCs office computers. "PC integration tough strategy" Smith. "A lot come market lot angles" said. Reuter 

The Senate clear parliamentary obstacle threaten final passage 9.4 billion dlr money bill rest fiscal 1987 end October 1. The Senate vote 64 32 override objection bill's money total violate 1987 budget vote require 60 vote approval. The House-passed measure debate Senate May 7 carry fund government activity bulk --6.7 billion dlrs--for agriculture support programs. Final passage late tonight tomorrow. Reuter 

Noland Co May sale 35 mln dlrs 11 pct year-earlier period 38.8 mln dlrs. For five month 1987 company sale total 161.8 mln dlrs pct five month 1986 company post sale 169.0 mln dlrs. Reuter 

House Speaker Jim Wright predict passage legislation require Reagan administration provide Congress report Mideast Gulf policy last-minute revolt alliance liberal conservative left bill's fate doubt. The legislation write wake May 17th Iraqi missile attack U.S. frigate Stark Gulf kill 37 Americans President Reagan's decision protect 11 Kuwaiti oil tanker put U.S. flag -- effectively make American ships. Since administration know reflagging plan congressional leader complain consult charge policy lead United States 6 1/2-year-old Iran Iraq. The House vote bill -- support Democratic Republican congressional leadership administration -- demand report seven day plan meet security need U.S. force gulf. The resolution expect pas controversy House Foreign Affairs Committee full House bill. But surprise move liberal Democrats conservative Republicans committee join unusual alliance oppose resolution. Liberal Democrats lack restriction bill imply consent Reagan's policies. Reuter 

The U.S. Treasury sell 13.2 billion dlrs six-month bill regular auction week. The June 8 sale evenly divide six month issue result paydown 1.3 billion dlrs mature bill total 14.512 billion dlrs. The bill issue June 11. Reuter 

U.S. company generate net 49.92 billion kilowatt-hours electrical energy week end May 30 6.8 pct 46.74 billion earlier Edison Electric Institute (EEI) said. In weekly report electric output electric utility trade association electric output week end May 23 49.86 billion kilowatt-hours. The EEI production 52 week end May 30 2578.41 billion kilowatt hour 2.7 pct year-ago period. Electric output 1072.97 billion kilowatt hour 3.2 pct 1039.25 billion EEI said. Reuter 

Some producer 1987 acreage reduction eligible deficiency payment 92 pct enrol acreage none plant wheat crop U.S. Agriculture Department said. The department provision Farm Disaster Assistance Act available eligible winter wheat producer producer type wheat prevent plant 1987 wheat crop 1986 natural disaster producer operate farm crop acreage base subject flood 50 pct crop's permit acreage. A producer enroll 1987 acreage reduction eligible signing-up July 15. Producers inform local office application accepted said. The department producer wheat winter wheat 0/92 option preventedf plant intend acreage wheat harvest 1987 natural disaster occur 1986 farm locate county approve Farmers Home Administration emergency loan disaster occur 1986. Reuter 

The Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC) accepted bid export bonus cover sale 15000 tonne frozen poultry Iraq U.S. Agriculture Department said. The poultry shipment June-September bonus 719.80 dlrs tone said. The bonus award ConAgra Poultry Co paid form commodity inventory CCC stocks. The purchase completes Export Enhancement initiative Frozen Poultry Iraq announce December 22 1986. Reuter 

The Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC) accepted bid bonus offer cover sale 10000 tonne frozen poultry Egypt U.S. Agriculture Department said. The poultry shipment November 1987 August 1988 bonus 473.99 dlrs tonne frozen fryer legs. The bonus Gress Foods Inc (5000 tonnes) Serva International Ltd (5000 tonnes). The subsidy paid exporter form commodity CCC stocks. An additional 8500 tonne frozen poultry remain available Egypt Export Enhancement Program initiative announce Dec 19 1986 Feb 27 1987 department said. Reuter 

West Germany's big bank withhold support Volkswagen AG VOWG.F> management month's annual meeting VW currency scandal. Deutsche Bank AG DBKG.F> abstain vote exonerate VW management supervisory board represent shareholder employee unless auditor's report currency scandal publish July 2 annual meeting either clearly absolves blame management board. Several shareholder group vote management promise stormy annual meeting. If majority shareholder group top management Europe's big carmaker dismissed. Deutsche expect result auditor's report currency fraud cost VW 260 mln dlrs publish annual meeting. But letter Deutsche customer deposit VW share bank Deutsche wrote: "Without knowledge result position suggestion exoneration management board supervisory board." "Unless instruction contrary abstain share ... reserve vote exoneration management board supervisory board seem line result auditor's report" added. A strong shareholder vote management empower supervisory board dismiss management chooses move mandatory. A member supervisory board receive exoneration annual meeting step down. An abstention no-vote bank behalf customer management vote confidence. German bank traditionally huge proxy vote annual meeting support management company represent supervisory board. VW management board chairman Carl Hahn April 1986 profit hit scandal document relate currency arbitrage allegedly fake profit 1987 affected. Following scandal finance director Rolf Selowsky resign former chief dealer Bobby Junger arrested. Deutsche represent 8-10 pct VW's share capital source F. Wilhelm Christians bank's management board spokesman (chief executives) VW supervisory board. Banking source Deutsche furious VW bank lead international placement VW share company's record right issue September. Less month VW announce sharp fall interim profit bashing share price severely dent confidence German share market generally. A spokesman Savings Bank Association German saving bank vote discharge Selowsky depend whether auditor's report publish abstain vote management board members. The federal government Lower Saxony together 40 pct VW shareholders' votes. It unclear vote. Associations represent shareholder ensure annual meeting heated. The Protective Association Securities Ownership vote entire management board Protective Society Small Shareholders vote supervisory board. A spokeswoman Deutsche Treuhand-Gesellschaft AG auditor commission VW March investigate scandal decline comment report issued. Reuter 

The Senate clear parliamentary obstacle threaten final passage 9.4 billion dlr money bill rest fiscal 1987. The Senate vote 64 32 override objection bill's money total violate 1987 budget vote require 60 vote approval. The House-passed measure debate Senate May 7 carry fund government activity bulk 6.7 billion dlrs agriculture support programs. Final passage late tonight tomorrow. Reuter 

Phelps Dodge Corp official fundamental copper market lead improve price metal. In interview Reuters chairman G. Robert Durham continued strong demand low inventory push price eight nine pct New York Commodities Exchange month. "Our customer country living tailgate trucks" refer tightness supply strong demand. "The fundamental good." Asked metal price continue rise Durham said; "All I fundamental cannot ignored." He copper supply low 20 years. Last copper demand high record behind 1984 said. Phelps Dodge nation's large copper company annual production expect reach 500000 ton year. During interview executive vice president Douglas Yearley believe matter copper price rise "because aren't project come demand short major recession continue grow modestly." Copper July delivery rise ct pound 69 cent Comex trading today. A cent pound rise copper price yield 10 mln dlrs annual earnings Phelps Dodge company said. "Demand surprisingly 1987 construction areas" Yearley said. New production Bingham Utah mine own Kennecott Corp unit British Petroleum Co PLC's BP> Standard Oil Co mine New Guinea Phelps Dodge's expand Morenci Ariz. mine offset production shortfall Mexico Zambia said. Durham production cost New Mexico-located Chino mine line conventional copper production company's mine fourth quarter. The company's total production cost include depreciation corporate expense below 50 ct pound late 1989 1990 said. Reuter 

The Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC) amend Export Credit Guarantee Program line Haiti add mln dlrs guarantee sale U.S. wood product U.S. Agriculture Department said. The action increase value export credit guarantee wood product Haiti 1.8 2.8 mln dlrs total value export credit guarantee authorize Haiti current fiscal commodity 12.0 mln dlrs department said. All sale register export complete Sept 30 1987 noted. Reuter 

John Boy president chief executive officer U.S. Sugar Corp retire effective June 30 1987. He replace J. Nelson Fairbanks currently senior vice president company said. Boy vice chairman board effective July One 1987. Reuter 

Shr 42 ct v 22 ct Net 3445000 v 2326000 Revs 41.7 mln v 51.5 mln Reuter 

Braniff Inc aid May load factor rise 59.15 pct 57.16 pct. Revenue passenger mile rise 25.7 pct 268.9 mln mile 213.8 mln mile available seat mile rise 21.5 pct 454.5 mln mile 374.1 mln miles. Year-to-date load factor rise 56.22 pct 55.35 pct. Revenue passenger mile rise 34.2 pct 1.3 billion 934.2 mln available seat mile rise 32.2 pct 2.2 billion 1.7 billion. Reuter 

Central Pennsylvania Financial Corp earnings end March 31 adjust downward 126000 dlrs 3005000 dlrs. The company adjustment due today's Federal Home Loan Bank Board announcement Federal Savings Loan Insurance Corp cancel secondary reserve payment members. It adjust net income 3005000 dlrs 2.34 dlrs share compare previously report 3131000 dlrs 2.44 dlrs share. Reuter 

Sweet Victory Inc common stock continue list Nasdaq via exception capital surplus requirement. The company fail meet requirement April 6 1987 grant temporary exception subject meeting conditions. Reuter 

Trustcompany Bancorporation company raise cash dividend 1.56 dlrs 1.20 dlrs share. The company dividend increase base 43 pct increase net income 1986 additional 42 pct increase quarter year. Trustcompany net income month 1987 2.84 mln dlrs compare mln dlrs period year. In addition company expect net income rise substantially 1986 company report earnings 8.8 mln dlrs 7.24 dlrs share. Trustcompany plan 13 additional bank branch disclose details. Reuter 

General Electric Co Bahrain Amiri Air Force select engine 12 General Dynamics Corp GD> fighter aircraft. The company disclose price engines. The company Bahrain fourth foreign nation select engine. The Greek Israeli Turkish air force company said. Reuter 

Shawmut Corp change name subsidiary First Gibraltar Mortgage Corp Shawmut First Mortgage Corp. Reuter 

Piedmont Airlines total cargo load April increase 39.5 pct compare April 1986. Piedmont April 1987 carry total 4949369 ton mile cargo compare 3546543 ton mile April. In addition airline month 1987 total cargo load increase 30 pct 18.2 mln ton mile 14.0 mln ton mile period year. Reuter 

Bristol-Myers Co declare dividend 35 ct share common reflect two-for-one stock split approve May five annual meeting company. The dividend payable August shareholder record July three. Reuter 

CBS/Fox Video Co equal partnership CBS Inc CBS> 20th Century-Fox Film Corp expect revenue 1987 exceed 400 mln dlrs 361 mln dlrs President James Fifield interview. Despite leveling video recorder sale Fifield see strong international producer marketer prerecord videocassettes. He expansion non-theatrical product bolster results. Fifield Chicago attend summer Consumer Electronics Show. CBS/Fox Video project industry sell 116 mln unit total manufacturer value 3.3 billion dlrs. Fifield told Reuters company introduce "at 20 titles" fall accommodate Compact Disc-Video system. He CBS/Fox support S-VHS Super VHS high-resolution format title match demand. Reuter 

Daniel Industries Inc Measurement Control Division award contract value 7.5 mln dlrs SPIE Capag S.A.> meter control systerms 11 station USSR - Turkey Pipeline System Project. Reuter 

Shr 18 ct v 27 ct Net 283000 v 435000 Revs 97.8 mln v 95.1 mln Reuter 

Standard Poor's downgrade 446 mln dlrs Allegheny International Inc's senior debt CCC B-minus subordinate debt CCC-minus CCC-plus. Also downgrade CCC-plus B senior debt unit Allegheny Sunbeam Corp. Allegheny's prefer stock affirm C. S P cite far erosion firm's flexibility due restrictive bank loan agreement limited debt service capability. In spite restructuring effort firm report quarter loss 38.5 mln dlrs. Reuter 

The Federal Reserve Board release April consumer instalment credit figure Friday. No fix release. Consumer credit fell seasonally adjust 63 mln dlrs March rise 1.01 billion dlrs February. Reuter 

After highly favorable reception trial batch bread bake 300 lb U.S. wheat flour February Senegalese appear ready delivery tranche 10500 tonne mixed U.S. wheat U.S. Agriculture Department said. In report U.S. Export Markets U.S. Grain department note Senegal bought 100000 tonne wheat Export Enhancement Program November local opposition miller accustom French wheat delay deliveries. As result series baking seminar trial batch effort satisfy local flour miller convince key official quality U.S. wheat. The department delivery U.S. wheat Senegal remain track U.S. dominate wheat market expect import 140000 tonne mostly French wheat 1987/88 (July-June) season. Reuter 

Sears Roebuck Co's stock downgrade notch neutral rating E.F. Hutton analyst Bernard Sosnick. The company's stock close 50 1-1/4. Sosnick "sluggish sale cloud economic picture concern outlook credit income diminish Sears' near-term investment prospects." He retail sale May weak mean sale below plan past months. Sosnick indication Sears strong performer retailers. However earnings estimate company 1987 remains unchanged 4.50 dlrs share compare 3.62 dlrs share 1986. He add "as result weaken sale momentum confidence estimate." The analyst project quarter earnings 1.05 1.10 dlrs share range 77 ct ago. The 1987 estimate include 18 ct share gain sale 50 saving bank branch strong earnings contribution Allstate Insurance. Reuter 

Paul Volcker's departure Federal Reserve Board chairman despite plea Reagan administration stay helm U.S. central bank U.S. official said. "The President clear pleased chairman's decision otherwise" Treasury Secretary James Baker said. A Reagan administration official identify Baker urge Volcker repeatedly past month consider stay chairman. But indication administration told Volcker stay current global economic uncertainty require it. Associates Volcker assume Volcker stayed circumstances. "He doesn't care lot emotionally third term" Nikko Securities vice-chairman Stephen Alixrod top Fed staffer told Reuters recently. Officials confident newly-nominated chairman Alan Greenspan re-establish close work relation Baker credential eventually calm markets. One Reagan administration economic policymaker name point Baker Greenspan work together closely Ford administration. At Baker act Secretary Commerce Greenspan head President's Council Economic Advisers. Reagan administration official clear meanwhile announcement precipitate Volcker's unshakeable decision quit clear uncertainty ahead Summit lead industrial democracy Venice. President Reagan embarrass position decision then. Volcker enjoys respect top economic official abroad admire West German Bundesbank Tokyo despite criticism Japanese policies. Financial market possibly reflect disappointment foreign capital drove dollar sharply low news departure prompt central bank intervention stem fall dealer said. Finance Ministries central bank summit nation -- Japan West Germany Britain France Italy Canada -- inform shortly news announce Baker told reporter today. Monetary source reason Volcker decide resign personal financial situation marriage -- wife life New York term mid-1983. Volcker foregone potentially million-dollar salary overwhelmingly devote service pay rate low relative financial commitments. Both reason prompt consider step term completed. But Volcker hint personal reason decision. "It personal decision take account lot include purely personal consideration others" told reporters. Fed source note Volcker's considerable unease lack progress administration reach budget deficit reduction agreement. In addition Volcker face Board comfortable monetary source say. The five Reagan appointees. What unsettle market Fed governor six seven years' collective experience financial uncertainty. Analysts Greenspan consider tough inflation-fighter Volcker Republican credential political Fed chairman Volcker. An administration official Volcker consult Greenspan "and approve replacement." But analyst compare Greenspan's relationship administration whom unofficial economic adviser relationship former chairman Arthur Burns Nixon administration. Burns somewhat sympathetic administration viewpoint Volcker Burns willing radical policy changes. Making clear decision strong Volcker told reporter "I told (Reagan) considerable definitiveness yesterday." Administration official Volcker arrive White House yesterday afternoon resignation. When renominated mid-1983 Volcker probably step years. Monetary source departure Donald Regan Treasury Secretary factor convince stay on. Regan Volcker clashed start administration. Another source prospect able Baker Treasury Secretary tackle international debt crisis deal high-flying dollar. Reuter 

A University Massachusetts finance professor raise stake Banc Texas Group Inc 45340 share 1.4625 dlr cumulative prefer stock 7.4 pct total 30300 share 5.0 pct. In filing Securities Exchange Commission Ben Shirley Branch bought 52025 share Class A cumulative convertible prefer stock 5.9 pct total 160000 dlrs bring total investment prefer series 330000 dlrs. Branch bought stock investment reserve try influence company. Reuter 

H.F. Ahmanson Co quarter earnings include write-off company's 24 mln dlr investment Federal Savings Loans Insurance Corporation. The company postpone plan quarter sale billion dlrs adjustable rate mortgage-backed security secondary market premium temporarily contracted. It write-off reduce net earnings quarter 13 cent share postponement security sale defer 30 ct share profit subsequent quarters. The company write-off FSLIC asset prompt recent General Accounting Office report declare FSLIC technically insolvent. The company receive letter FSLIC inform Ahmanson honor long-standing obligation Ahmanson's Home Savings America unit hundred thrifts. The company letter state Ahmanson's investment write May. The company report quarter net income 76.6 mln dlrs 80 ct share. Ahmanson report 1986 net income 303.6 mln dlrs 3.22 dlrs share. Reuter 

With private investment protection U.S. textile industry competitive modern foreign producer analyst congressional agency today. The Office Technology Assessment nonpartisan arm Congress told House Ways Means Trade Subcommittee hearing concern future part U.S. textile apparel industry reason optimism ago. "While textile producer make significant investment more" OTA analyst Henry Kelly said. The Congressional Budget Office (CBO) nonpartisan budget analysis arm Congress federal loan loan guarantee preferable option Congress increase trade protection lead foreign retaliation. CBO analyst Edward Gramlich past trade protection impose 1950's benefit profit investment domestic firms. Trade Subcommittee chairman Rep. Sam Gibbons agency analysis agree opinion congressional approval protectionist textile quota legislation aim mainly Western Europe Japan Asian textile produce countries. President Reagan vetoed textile protection bill reintroduce session Congress expect vote House year. However approval doubt passage major trade bill specific protection textile show weaken support legislation. Most U.S. producer fall behind foreign producer modern textile apparel production equipment net import grow faster domestic market Kelly said. He add private investment textile clothing industry 1983 0.5 pct one-seventh average manufacturing investment 3.9 pct. Despite exist import quota tariff import textile grow 26 pct 1986 import apparel grow 14 pct U.S. production rise 1.9 pct. "The traditional industry seem destine replace technology import combination both. While industry able compete domestic market enjoy twenty ago result research indicate portion domestic market recover export expanded" Kelly said. Reuter 

Shr ct v n.a. Net 68281 Revs 639471 NOTE: Company become March 1987 Reuter 

Qtly div ct v ct prior Payable July 1 Record June 10 Reuter 

Drillers Inc Florida unit DI Industries Inc> formerly Drillers Inc DRL> receive separate contract injection project value 408500 dlrs 850000 dlrs respectively. DI Industries unit Drillers Inc Texas complete 560000-dlr Department Defense project involve drilling vertical fire shaft department's R D Railgun. DI project represent effort company diversify traditional oil gas drilling contracts. Reuter 

Widespread soak rain aid crop development across province northwest crop produce region receive precipitation accord Manitoba Agriculture weekly crop report. The rain replenish formerly low soil moisture reserve reserve area rat report said. Plantings virtually complete across province germination advanced. However field show spotty stands. Cereal crop southwest 90 pct germinate field already subsequent tiller stage said. Oilseeds northwest region 80 pct emerge area region 50 70 pct emerged. Reuter 

Period end March 31 Shr loss nil v profit ct Net loss 36000 v profit 310000 Revs 1172000 v 1686000 Note: Full name Atlas Yellowknife Resources Ltd. Reuter 

Shr loss 32 ct v loss 37 ct Net loss 5374000 v loss 6159000 Revs 241.3 mln v 253.2 mln Reuter 

Qtr end April 30. Shr 32 ct v 20 ct Net 1982000 v 1022000 Year Shr 1.22 dlrs v 59 ct Net 7005000 v 3030000 Assets 191.3 mln v 116.5 mln Reuter 

Central Maine Power Co issue request proposal 150 project sponsor cogeneration production projects. The utility solicit proposal fill 100 megawatt commitment Maine Public Utilities Commission. The avoid cost paid produce project base cost negotiate Central Maine Hydro-Quebec plan purchase begin 1992. Reuter 

President Reagan nominate Kenneth Rogers president Stevens Institute Technology member Nuclear Regulatory Commission White House said. Rogers 58 succeed James Asseltine five-year term expire June 30 1992. He president Stevens Institute Hoboken N.J. 1972. He previously act provost dean faculty. Reuter 

Continental Associates shareholder hold 5.02 pct Continental Materials Corp stock pursue tender offer shares. The shareholder told Continental Materials director sell company. Late yesterday Continental Materials board decide far consideration "business combination" propose St. Louis businessmen. Reuter 

Bell Atlantic Mobile Systems file New York Public Service Commission propose retail rate market mobile telephone service metropolitan New York City area. The company expect rate effect July 1 60-day statutory period pending regulatory approval. It approve price structure regulatory step company begin marketing cellular service equipment northern New Jersey. Reuter 

A House Banking subcommittee approve bill authorize U.S. contribution International Development Association Asian Development Fund Afrian Development Bank. The bill authorizes 2.875 billion dlrs U.S. contribution eighth replenishment International Development Association 584.3 mln dlrs Asian Development Fund 719.5 mln dlrs buy 59648 share capital stock African Development Bank. The bill go full Banking Committee include amendment oppose U.S. approval development bank loan commodity surplus intend export. Reuter 

The Bank Canada country's central bank believe economist Alan Greenspan sound choice replace retire U.S. Federal Reserve Chairman Paul Volcker spokesman bank said. "Mr. Greenspan know bank. He's lot experience. He's capable Mr. Volcker's decision seek reappointment he's sound choice" Roy Flett associate secretary bank. Flett "the Bank Canada enjoy excellent relationship Mr. Volcker term great respect performance." Economists appointment extremely Canada country's monetary policy closely link U.S. "Basically chosen ... march lockstep U.S. monetary policy really central banker appoint well" Mike McCracken Infometrica Ltd. Reuter 

Phelps Dodge Corp chairman G. Robert Durham company prepared non-copper acquisition deal struck near future. In interview Reuters Durham company examine potential candidate yet talk any. He decline name company deal occur soon half 1987. Phelps Dodge rank large copper producer U.S. paid 240 mln dlrs Columbian Chemicals Co maker carbon black rubber tire products. The purchase strategic plan diversify eventually match earnings non-copper operation copper operations. Phelps Dodge spend 250 mln 500 mln dlrs buy non-copper company Durham cite 100 mln dlrs cash 580 mln dlrs untapped bank credit. Any acquisition candidate economic cycle copper substantial earnings management said. Phelps Dodge friendly deal added. "We're talk high-tech financial service perfume company" said. "We basic industrial company fit management structure" Durham said. During interview Durham executive continued strong demand tight copper supply lead high price metal. "In view it's matter price (for copper) improve aren't project come demand short major recession continue grow modestly" executive vice president Douglas Yearley. Phelps Dodge continue low cost produce copper executive said. Costs below 50 cent pound depreciation corporate expense 1989 1990. Production cost 56 57 cent pound compare dlr pound 1981 Wall St analyst said. Durham copper supply low 20 demand continued strong. He decline project result quarter year. But quarter rise copper price month results. Durham month quarter match quarter earnings rise 11 pct 16.8 mln dlrs 49 ct share. First quarter sale rise 61.5 pct 372.9 mln dlrs reflect acquisition Columbian Chemicals increase copper shipment Chino copper mine New Mexico acquire year. Analysts project 1987 earnings 2.20 dlrs 2.75 dlrs share sharply 1.79 dlrs 1986. Reuter 

Hoffman-LaRoche Inc Eli Lilly Co Inc pay royalty sale Lilly's human growth hormone Humatrope earlier-reported licensing agreement companies. Hoffman-La Roche spokesman John Doorley decline disclose amount royalty payments. "Lilly take position respect patent pay roylaties" Doorley. "We hopeful company respect position" said. Roche licensee Hormone Research Foundation patent synthetic version human growth hormone. Last September Roche Foundation sue Genetech Inc GENE> allege Genetech's product Protropin human growth hormone infringe Hoffman's patent hormone. Last Genetech's sale Protropin 35 mln dlrs. David Saks drug analyst Morgan Olmstead Kennedy Gardner New York Genetech's Lilly's product bring 50 mln dlrs sale annually. Other company develop human growth hormone include Biotechnology General Corp. Roche's Doorley company start develop growth hormone decide effort products. Reuter 

Shr 87 ct v 87 ct prior Pay August 14 Record July 20 Reuter 

The Treasury Department release data U.S. reserve asset monthly basis instead quarterly. Reserve asset held gold special draw right Internatinal Monetary Fund foreign currency U.S. reserve position IMF. Assets total 46.59 billion dlrs April compare 48.82 billion dlrs March Treasury said. Reuter 

Shr ct v ct prior Pay August 5 Record July 15 Reuter 

Mexico intention leave International Coffee Organization (ICO) event Brazil withdraw Mexican Coffee Institute (IMC) said. The IMC statement ICO instrument ensure producer obtain adequate price. Mexico currently produce five mln 60-kilo bag coffee year. Brazil meeting coffee producer Rio de Janeiro weekend consider leave ICO export quota reduce organization. Reuter 

Mercantile Bancorp Inc add special provision 75 mln dlrs reserve loan loss quarter expect report loss 33 mln dlrs period. The company estimate report net income mln dlrs full 1987. Mercantile Bancorp additional provision represent 28.5 pct Mercantile Bancorp's 263 mln dlrs total outstanding loan Latin American countries. The special provision raise reserve 148 mln dlrs 3.1 pct company's 4.7 billion dlrs total loans. Mercantile Bancorp earn 19.5 mln dlrs year's quarter 1.23 dlrs share 55.6 mln dlrs 3.50 dlrs share full 1986. Mercantile Bancorp's reaffirm intention continue dividend follow normal policy base future dividend anticipate earnings ongoing business. "It appear adjustment process heavily indebted country stretch 1990's restructurings negative economic effect loan portfolio" Mercantile Bancorp said. Reuter 

Amoco Corp's wholly own Amoco Canada Petroleum Co Ltd propose 5.22-billion- Canadian-dlr acquisition Dome Petroleum Ltd benefit Canada foreign investment commercial development Alberta's oilsands. Amoco Canada president T. Don Stacy told oilsands conference "Amoco Canada present solution Dome we're invest confidence dollar determination solution work." The Amoco buyout debt-burdened Dome angered Canadian nationalist Canadian buyer Dome. Stacy described Amoco Canada's previously report share offer proposal chance increase Canadian ownership country's oil gas industry 50 pct. He reiterate Amoco plan virtually layoff Dome employees. He reaffirm Amoco reinvest Amoco Canada-Dome property available cash flow five acquisition. Reuter 

Opr shr nil v seven ct Opr net 3000 v 99000 Revs 2745000 v 2395000 Avg shrs 1500000 v 1375000 Year Opr shr 24 ct v 20 ct Opr net 343000 v 271000 Revs 10.7 mln v 8232000 Avg shrs 1459000 v 1341000 NOTE: Earnings exclude gain due tax loss carryforward 210000 dlrs 14 ct share 1987 198000 dlrs 15 ct 1986. Reuter 

TCBY Enterprises Inc apply Securities Exchange Commission withdraw registration statement file May 14 30 mln dlrs subordinate convertible debenture due unfavorable market conditions. THe company form financing available company work capital sufficient fund us proceeds debenture offering applied. Reuter 

The U.S. House Representatives approve bill require Reagan administration provide Congress report Gulf policy restriction actions. The bill pass 305-102 -- win necessary two-thirds voting -- despite last-minute revolt alliance liberal Democrats conservative Republicans sought defeat signal grow legislator oppose President Reagan's policy region. The legislation pass wake May 17th Iraqi missile attack U.S. frigate Stark Gulf kill 37 Americans Reagan's decision protect 11 Kuwaiti oil tanker put U.S. flag -- effectively make American ships. The legislation -- support Congress' Democratic Republican leadership administration -- require Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger provide report Congress seven day enactment plan protect U.S. warship flag ship Persian Gulf. It restriction administration proceeds reflag Kuwaiti ship immediate effect U.S. policy. The Senate expect approve legislation week. The bill sent Reagan signature. Supporters bill passage bill step great congressional involvement formulate policy. But Democratic critic bill ask administration address tough policy question report. Reuter 

The leader U.S. Senate team probe American defense strategy MidEast Gulf favor multinational force keep oil flow waterway. Sen. John Glenn John Warner Kuwait Gulf Arab tour news conference top official appear ready discus extra facility need U.S. upgraded defense role. The Senate team head United Arab Emirates stop fact-finding mission prompt Reagan administration plan half Kuwait's 22-tanker fleet fly U.S. flag. Glenn Warner U.S. Britain France explore possibility unified Gulf force. "The American ship British ship French ship talk we've formalize arrangement" Warner said. Glenn multinational force effectively deployed 24 hour decision. Glenn voiced preference United Nations multinational force fail American British French force cooperation Gulf Arab states. Warner voiced concern Soviet Union situation Gulf raise presence. "And unequivocally GCC talk interest Arabian peninsula." Reuter 

Assistant Secretary State Elliott Abrams "completely honest completely wrong" give assurance October U .S. government involve flight contra supply plane down Nicaragua. He question congressional Iran-contra panel testimony give House Foreign Affairs Committee October 15 1986 say U.S. intelligence defense government official involve flight. "I statement I similar statement October 14 Secretary (of State George) Shultz. And statement completely honest completely wrong" Abrams testified. Two crew down aircraft operating El Salvador killed. The third Eugene Hasenfus capture try sentence 30 years' jail release Nicaraguan authorities. Abrams -- highest-ranking member administration testify five week televise hearing -- remember learn plane shot probably CIA. He statement couple day U.S. government involvement make inquiry CIA National Security Council Pentagon. "Everybody U.S. government role" said. Reuter 

A New York investment partnership seek control Allegis Corp AEG> disclose Department Transportation review 700 mln dlr note agreement Allegis Boeing Co BA>. Citing call serious competitive concern deal Coniston Partners hold 13 pct Allegis department assert jurisdiction matter require company seek approval transaction. In petition department contain filing Securities Exchange Commission Coniston claim Boeing major aircraft manufacturer obtain control Allegis parent United Airlines virtue May 12 deal companies. Under deal Boeing bought Allegis 700 mln dlrs convertible note due May 31 1992 simultaneously 2.1 billion dlr aircraft United place Boeing. Coniston note Boeing control Allegis warn relationship company raise antitrust issue scrutinize closely. "The world's large manufacturer aircraft permit acquire control nation's large airline opportunity comment find scrutiny regulatory agency have jurisdiction air transporation marketplace" Coniston petition. Coniston call Allegis Investors Group petition department force Allegis Boeing require regulatory filings. Coniston currently seek control Allegis win majority representation board directors. Reuter 

A Colombian announce suspension bombing oil pipeline pending government's levy tax foreign petroleum company 800 mln dlrs fine Occidental Petroleum Corp OXY>. There indication government meet condition demand leftist National Liberation Army (ELN). According oil firm ECOPETROL ELN carry 72 attack petroleum pipeline 1984 1986. The assault recent launch month ago cause estimate total 50 mln dlrs damage. In communique ELN demand tax dollar barrel crude oil pumped foreign firm condition maintain suspension assaults. Foreign oil firm pump average 225083 barrel Colombia. Colombian tax authority investigate Occidental U.S.-owned firm allege tax evasion. If charge proven firm fine 800 mln dlrs. The ELN demand government charge penalty. Reuter 

The U.S. Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) release guideline commodity trading advisor (CTA) calculate "beginning net asset value" (BNAV) purpose compute rate return require commission disclosure rules. The commission compel release guideline receive disclosure document indicate "serious differences" CTAs define BNAW -- "differences compromise ability compare rate return advisors." CFTC CTAs fund control conjunction carry future commission merchant calculate BNAV. Computation BNAV exclude item money security tangible property fund control CTA CTA conjunction carry future commission merchant. CFTC "notational" fund exclude merely verbal promise furnish funds. Funds commodity trading account CTA discretionary trading authority include CFTC said. Reuter 

Two affiliate investment firm told Securities Exchange Commission acquire 593000 share Midway Airlines Inc 7.7 pct total outstanding common stock. The firm Boston-based FMR Corp Fidelity International Ltd Bermuda-based investment advisory firm bought stake "to acquire equity company pursuit specify investment objectives...." The firm increase decrease stake company plan seek control company representation board. Reuter 

Watkins-Johnson Co receive contract General Electric COrp's GE> G.E. Astro Space division nearly mln dlrs provide traveling-wave-tube amplifier Mars Observer spacecraft. The Observer schedule launch Mars orbit 1990s. Reuter 

Wickes Cos Inc complete purchase Dura Corp undisclosed amount. Dura supplier automotive equipment annual sale 100 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Cominco Ltd tentative talk strike union local reject Saturday three-year contract offer Cominco's Trail Kimberley British Columbia lead-zinc operations. The local United Steelworkers America represent 2600 production maintenance workers. No date talk spokesman reply query. The spokesman talk ongoing strike local represent 600 office technical workers. Production Trail Kimberley shut strike start May 9. Each five local separate contract expire April 30 main issue similar. The Trail smelter produce 240000 ton zinc 110000 ton lead Sullivan mine Kimberley produce 2.2 mln ton ore processing Trail. Revenues Trail's smelter total 356 mln Canadian dlrs 1986. Reuter 

Southern Air Transport> sue WPLG-Channel 10 Miami compensatory punitive damage excess 50 mln dlrs false defamatory statement television station series broadcast month. The complaint alleges broadcast contain numerous false statement station untrue. Officials either company unavailable comment. Reuter 

Phelps Dodge Corp prepared non-copper acquisition deal struck near future chairman G. Robert Durham said. Durham told Reuters company examine potential candidate yet talk any. Any acquisition economic cycle copper said. Phelps Dodge large U.S. copper producer paid 240 mln dlrs Columbian Chemicals Co make carbon black rubber tires. The purchase strategic plan diversify match earnings copper non-copper operations. The company spend 250 mln 500 mln dlrs buy non-copper firm Durham cite 100 mln dlrs cash 580 mln dlrs untapped bank credit. Reuter 

The European Community (EC) watch carefully development Gulf War consequence oil market EC Energy Commissioner Nicolas Mosar today. Speaking week U.S. warship attack Gulf Mosar warn "An escalation Gulf increase tension oil market." "But I alarmist" told news conference EC energy minister meeting Luxembourg. He volume EC oil import Gulf decline 31 pct total oil import month 1987 35 pct period year. "There potential source supply world" added. The issue Gulf oil import discuss ministers' meeting added. A EC committee expert so-called oil supply discus Gulf oil supply bi-annual meeting June 19 said. But major decision reserve EC foreign minister diplomat said. West European nation show little enthusiasm backing U.S. plan military protection merchant ship Gulf insure safety oil supplies. Reuter 

Spanish International Communications Corp Federal Communications Corp grant license renewal five station clearing sale company Hallmark Cards Inc>. THe FCC preliminarily approve transfer station September 26 1986 party file application FCC seek block renewal broadcast license block sale. The station grant renewal include KMEX-TV Los Angeles KWEX-TV San Antonio WLTV Miami WXTV New York KFTV Fresno Calif. Reuter 

Ball Corp complete purchase privately held Verac Inc> San Diego defense system software development company. Terms acquisition disclosed. Verac 1986 sale 23 mln dlrs. Verac operate San Diego Ball's technical product group. Reuter 

The Securities Exchange Commission charge Windsor Holding Co Chicago-based lamp ceiling fan maker fraudulently overstate 1982 1983 pre-tax income total 3.6 mln dlrs. Simultaneously filing civil U.S. District Court company formerly Windsor Industries Inc former officer former director agree settle charge admit deny them. But settlement company defendant consent court order bar commit far violation security law. There monetary penalty settlement company delist National Association Securities Dealers Automated Quotation NASDAQ May 1985 require restate earnings. The SEC charge Jose Arrojo vice president Windsor subsidiary Ronald Kahn former vice company David Garvin former president Windsor subsidiary take scheme inflate value Windsor's 1982 year-end inventory result 2.0 mln dlr overstatement company's pre-tax income year. The company's inventory falsify result 1.6 mln dlr overstatement SEC charged. Another defendant Arthur Usheroff former Windsor board member company Kahn fail disclose SEC filing arrangement Usheroff compensate service render 1983 Windsor stock offering agency said. Arrojo Kahn company charge make false statement require SEC filings. Windsor file bankruptcy August 1985 plan reorganization approve December. Reuter 

Brazilian official privately express concern change command Federal Reserve lead tougher U.S. Policy debt understand problem Third World. Paul Volcker Federal Reserve consider understand Brazil's difficulties. A Finance Ministry source colleague ministry: "They bit apprehensive (Alan) Greenspan (who replace Volcker) consider reputation tough advocate recessive measure counter-attack inflation. There little bit concern." Reuter 

Ninety-six pct Alberta northeastern British Columbia crop seed week ahead 10 average accord Alberta wheat pool report. Hard red spring wheat account acreage 6.0 mln estimate little change year. Oats acreage 1.95 mln unchanged barley 5.9 mln similar year. Rapeseed plant estimate 3.24 mln expect five pct 1986. The south south central area Alberta lack moisture germination patchy best. Growth prospect northern area generally range. Soil moisture north central Peace area wheat pool said. Reuter 

Ford Motor Co praise President Reagan's nomination Alan Greenspan Federal Reserve Board chairman say conservative economist "sound record fill void (Paul) Volker's departure." The U.S. auto maker statement Volker "took office...at begin critical auto industry" "a positive impact U.S. economy." Reuter 

New Zealand's current account deficit narrow 76 mln N.Z. Dlrs April revise 89 mln dlrs March 224 mln dlrs April 1986 smooth seasonally-adjusted measurement Statistics Department said. The March figure revise 69 mln dlrs. The department statement seasonally adjust non-smoothed figure show deficit 99 mln dlrs 76 mln dlrs March 230 mln dlrs April 1986. Totally unadjusted figure show deficit 83 mln dlrs 164 mln dlrs March revise 178 mln dlrs compare 262 mln April 1986. The smooth seasonally adjust series show surplus merchandise trade 145 mln dlrs 135 mln dlrs March 30 mln dlrs April 1986. Seasonally adjust non-smoothed figure show merchandise trade surplus 132 mln dlrs 148 mln dlr surplus March 14 mln dlr surplus April 1986. Unadjusted merchandise figure show surplus 151 mln dlrs 5.0 mln dlr (revised 10 mln dlr) deficit March 31 mln dlr deficit March 1986. The smooth seasonally adjust deficit invisibles 234 mln N.Z. Dlrs 236 mln dlrs March 255 April 1986. The seasonally adjust non-smoothed deficit invisibles 240 mln dlrs 229 mln dlrs March 245 mln dlrs April 1986. The unadjusted deficit invisibles 234 mln dlrs 158 mln dlrs revise 168 mln dlrs March 231 mln dlrs April 1986. Seasonally adjust export import figure available. The department figure show continue improvement current account deficit cause mainly improvement balance merchandise trade surplus november 1985. Reuter 

Very strong demand market include recently Japan result Peru's bismuth export show impressive increase January/May 1987 Peru's own mining industry's marketing arm Minpeco S.A. Said. In statement release London office Minpeco Peruvian custom figure bismuth export five month 574.8 tonne compare 160.7 tonne period 1986 483.4 tonne 1986 Minpeco said. A breakdown figure show Peru export 296.4 tonne bismuth U.S. During Jan/May 1987 compare 127.0 1986. Other recipient Peoples Republic China 110.4 (100.0) Holland 100.2 (150.0) USSR 50.0 (50.0) area 17.8 tonne (56.4). Sales U.K. West Germany France Western Eastern European country hidden head Holland Minpeco sell customer country stock company normally hold Rotterdam statement said. REUTER 

Allergy Immuno Technologies Inc receive federal funding develop diagnostic kit measure Interleukin-2 Interleukin-2 receptor. Interleukin naturally produce substance maintain body's immune system. Reuter 

Floating Point Systems INc implement restructuring consolidate eight department decrease worldwide staff 800 1200. It cost-cutting measure include significant reduction Ireland manufacturing facility. "Our expectation 1987 slow turnaround require intensified effort operation cost-effective" chairman Milton Smith said. For end October 31 1986 FLoating POint report net loss 14.3 mln dlrs 1.67 dlrs share sale 88.6 mln dlrs. Floating Point expect incur charge five 10 mln dlrs third quarter end July 31 year's third quarter. In 1986 Floating Point report third quarter loss mln dlrs sale 20.8 mln dlrs Floating Point expect report loss full year. It restructuring result saving five mln dlrs quarterly basis. Reuter 

Freedom Savings Loan Association record net gain 13.5 mln dlrs sale asset Freedom Mortgage Co subsidiary Chase Home Mortgage Corp subsidiary Chase Manhattan Corp CMB>. Freedom complete sale. The company 9.5 mln dlrs gain recnogized quarter end June 30 remainder derferred recognize remain service mortgage porfolio. Reuter 

The U.S. meat industry launch aggressive promotion campaign Japan increase consumer awareness U.S. beef persuade Japanese government relax current beef import quotas. U.S. beef sale Japan currently 480 mln dlrs annually increase billion dlrs six billion dlrs 2000 Japanese quota remove Japanese consumer aware attribute U.S. beef official U.S. Meat Export Federation press conference today. Partially fund 6.5 mln dlr award Agriculture Department's Targeted Export Assistance (TEA) five-year meat promotion campaign Japan launch U.S. Meat Export Federation April. "The promising Japanese beef market bright spot U.S. agricultural exports" Philip Seng Asian Director Federation. "We supply (Japan) buy quality beef. They beef buy more" said. Seng point Japan's beef quota limit total Japanese beef import 177000 tonne U.S. import 58400 tonne major constraint expand U.S. beef shipment Japan. The quota implement 1977 heavy Japanese foreign beef imports. The current quota agreement expires March beef quota negotiation underway fall. The Reagan administration call quota April 1988 Japanese official liberalize import regardless U.S. pressure. Officials Meat Export Federation told Reuters expect complete lift quota hope gradual increase quota. High beef price Japan cause protect market kept beef consumption modest level meat industry official said. Japanese shopper pay average 27.14 dlrs U.S. tenderloin steak restaurant average 47.42 dlrs Japanese-produced restaurant steak meat association said. At retail level U.S. striploin sell 9.77 dlrs pound Japanese beef sell 28.51 dlrs lb. Japanese consumer currently eat 10 lb beef compare 78 lb average American official said. Total beef consumption Japan 700000 800000 tonne Seng removal quota decrease beef price consumption increase 3.2 mln tonnes. Reuter 

Adolph Coors Co expect quarter net income range 45 ct 50 ct share compare 82 ct share 1986. Coors earnings hurt start-up expense Shenandoah Brewery marketing expenses. It expect achieve record barrel sale 1987 quarter beer shipment expect similar 4.2 mln volume quarter 1986. It spend 90 mln dlrs 1987 1988 expand Shenandoah's operation increase advertising spending 10 pct 200 mln dlrs 1987. Reuter 

Shr 18 ct v 15 ct Net 3.3 mln v 2.5 mln Revs 45.2 mln v 26.8 mln NOTE:1986 net include seven ct 1.2 mln dlrs tax loss carryforward. Reuter 

Merchants National Corp 3.7 billion dlrs asset report loss 13 mln dlrs quarter due decision increase provision loss 30 mln dlrs mainly due uncertainty surround Latin American debt. In quarter Merchants report net income 6.2 mln dlrs 68 ct share. As result increase loan loss provision bank allowance loan loss increase 1.4 pct 2.5 pct bank's total loans. The bank expect report estimate net 15 mln dlrs 1987. Reuter 

venezuelan aluminum company venalum negotiate total 123.9 mln dlr credit abroad plan expansion production faciities finance minister manuel azpurua said. Azpurua spoke reporter meeting representative kreditanstalt fur wiederaufbau (kfw) bank germany tommorrow sign agreement grant 100 mln mark (54.9 mln US dlrs) credit venalum. The agreement eight one-half term fix rate 6.13 pct. Azpurua venalum negotiate credit 14.9 mln dlrs swiss bank corporation 14 mln dlrs mitsubishi japan 40 mln dlrs eksportfinans norway. "this prof achieve goal reestablish financial flow country" azpurua. The credit installation fifth production line venalum aluminum company produce primarily export market. Reuter 

The House approve bill require Reagan administration report Congress Mideast Gulf policy restrict actions. The vote favor despite last-minute revolt alliance liberal Democrats conservative Republicans sought defeat signal grow legislator oppose President Reagan's policy region. In Senate lead Republican senator former Senate Appropriations Committee Chairman Mark Hatfield Oregon try prevent consideration bill. He so-called "hold" bill find whether War Powers Act applies protect Kuwaiti tankers. Congressional leader complain consult plan U.S. flag Kuwaiti ship charge policy lead U.S. Iran-Iraq war. Conservative Republicans increase U.S. military obligation gulf impossible burden American serviceman equipment warn lead war. "It real snake pit powder keg blow sky-high worst" Wisconsin Rep. Toby Roth. Reuter 

The U.S. Postal Service Unisys Corp UIS> Bell Howell Co BHW> Recognition Equipment Inc REC> Toshiba AEG award contract automate postal service mail sort system. The Postal Service contract lead increase multiline optical character readers. Based outcome summer's test Postal Service decide whether buy equipment combine purchase old equipment. It test kit previous contract successfully complete ElectroCom Automation Inc. Reuter 

Paul Volcker's resignation Federal Reserve Board chairman creates serious leadership vacuum deep uncertainty future management third-world debt crisis banker said. They Volcker official hold financial together Mexico halt payment August 1982 played central role since. "Where leadership from? Suddenly there's terrible void" New York banker said. Volcker's expertise sorely miss International Monetary Fund manage director Michel Camdessus job Barber Conable find hard mark World Bank president banker said. Moreover Volcker's successor Alan Greenspan little experience international affair third debt. "Greenspan sensitivity issue understand complexity Volcker has. Volcker understands motivates outside U.S. That gut. Greenspan intuitive feeling" banker said. This banker discuss debt question Greenspan described view simplistic. But Robert Hormats Goldman Sachs Co worried Greenspan's lack international experience. "People rush judgment Greenspan I'm sure they'll excellent replacement" Hormats former Administration official. Anyone nominate replace Volcker pal initial comparison Hormats said. "Volcker status financial demigod can't attain status overnight" said. One veteran debt rescheduler Volcker together Bank England deserves credit keep banking intact Mexico's default. "If hadn't look lot now" said. "Whether agree superb grasp ideas." Certainly banker agree Volcker. In particular roundly criticize force September grant Mexico generous term 77 billion dlr new-loan debt reschedule agreement. "Volcker lose lot credibility overstep bound push package onto banks" comment banker help negotiate Mexican deal. Another critic Citicorp chairman John Reed 13/16 pct margin deter bank lender delay Mexico's return voluntary markets. It review fate Mexican deal - follow Chile Venezuela Philippines Argentina - help convince Reed debt crisis solve Citicorp need bolster reserve loan bad. "It certainly contribute feel malaise" Citicorp banker describe impact Mexican package bank's decision add billion dlrs reserve loan losses. That decision follow Chase Manhattan Security Pacific Corp profoundly alter strategy creditor debtor alike tackle debt crisis. But sure impact be. "It's difficult anyone debt Volcker picture add uncertainty" banker said. Reuter 

Currency future likely move high follow sharp rally President Reagan announce Paul Volcker accept third term Federal Reserve Chairman Alan Greenspan nominate replacement currency analyst said. Contrary prediction Volcker resignation analyst call high currency future price June 8 Venice economic summit. In particular uncertainty Greenspan's attitude dollar undermine sentiment U.S. currency analyst said. Greenspan dollar appear near bottom market bear remark Chicago week dollar's recent move upward technical reaction trade significantly low analyst said. "Disappointment European central banker appointment opportunity sell dollar lower" Manufacturers Hanover Futures vice president Carol Mackoff. "The international community appointment" suggests possibility U.S. budget deficit burden monetary policy Volcker unable commitment sought reduce deficit add Merrill Lynch Economics analyst David Horner. Furthermore "that Greenspan name month ago suggests Administration's choice -- status appointment bridesmaid" Horner said. A decline dollar scenario high currency future prior throughout Venice meeting mitigate concrete action oppose "jawboning" G-7 summit said. But G-7 finance minister judged recent statement impasse analyst said. Japan West Germany reiterate neither plan far rate cut despite pressure U.S. Mackoff said. The U.S. cut budget deficit Japan West Germany urge said. Should G-7 force U.S. commitment cut budget deficit far decline dollar forestall Horner said. However "the impact Venice changes" Horner said. Smith Barney Harris Upham Co. analyst Craig Sloane European currency likely move high 1987 range today's sharp advance. For week Sloan call September yen future advance 0.007200 area. He September mark close 0.5700 upside target Swiss franc climb range 0.6900 0.6950. Reuter 

The World Bank suspend loan Peru country month payment arrears lending agency central bank manager Hector Neyra said. He told reporter government decide stop pay World Bank schedule repayment outweigh loan due receive. The measure late hard-line debt stance adopt government President Alan Garcia Latin America's delinquent debtors. The 22-month-old administration cut repayment 10 pct export earnings nearly 14.4 billion dlr foreign debt. Neyra late 1986 Peru sought accomodation World Bank receive credit remit repayments. Neyra stress Peru withdraw bank. The country recently increase capital suscription institution mln dollars. The Bank immediately resume loan disbursement Peru clear arrears said. He specify value overdue payments. The economy ministry Peru's debt bank 521 mln dlrs end-1985. At Peru's total foreign debt stood 14.46 billion dollar 13.17 billion dollar medium- and-long-term debt central bank said. Total arrears 5.42 billion dollars. Central bank president Leonel Figueroa Peru hard currency gold silver cover 10 11 months' worth imports. The holding precious metal hard currency value 2.172 billion dlrs May 22 1987 said. Gross reserve slightly low 1.857 billion dlrs classification include silver holding undervalue central bank's gold. Reserves project fall 150 mln dlrs said. Reuter 

Westpac Banking Corp WSTP.S> cut indicator lending rate 22 pct 23 pct effective June 15. Westpac statement various lending rate revise downwards. The Westpac move follow base rate drop New Zealand trading bank recently. Bank New Zealand's> base rate drop 22 pct 23 June 16 National Bank New Zealand Ltd's> rate fall 21.50 pct 23 June 15. The Australia New Zealand Banking Group Ltd ANZA.S> rate remains 23 pct. Reuter 

Daiwa Singapore Ltd wholly-owned Daiwa Securities Co Ltd Japan yesterday launch 100 mln U.S. Dlr tranche equity warrant eurobond Singapore Japan's Minebea Co Ltd MIAT.T>. The five-year eurobond carry indicative coupon rate 5/8 pct manage Singapore. The warrant exercise share Minebea July 1 1987 June 10 1992. The bond 200 mln U.S. Dlr equity warrant Eurobond issue Minebea. Nomura International Ltd launch 100 mln dlr bond London. REUTER 

Matsushita Electric Industrial Co Ltd MC.T> Mazda Motor Corp MAZT.T> Ford Motor Co F> sign agreement joint venture car air conditioner Japan Matsushita statement. The venture Japan Climate Systems Corp> capitalise 1.5 billion yen partner hold equal shares. The partner invest 3.6 billion yen construct plant Hiroshima due completion late 1988. The plant initially 100000 air conditioner Mazda said. REUTER 

South Korea's wholesale price index base 1980 rise 0.4 pct 127.0 May 1.1 pct rise April 1.5 pct high May 1986 Bank Korea said. The May consumer price index base rise 1.4 pct 149.1 0.3 pct gain April year-on-year rise 3.5 pct. Wholesale price rise 2.0 pct five month 1986 consumer price rise 3.2 pct. Bank official rise due strong yen import Japanese part raw intermediary material expensive. REUTER 

Esso Singapore Pte Ltd low pump price premium 97 octane petrol price 96.8 cents/litre 97 cent effective midnight tonight spokeswoman said. The price similar oil companies' price grade. Esso's price 95 octane remains unchanged 90.8 cents. REUTER 

A Matsushita Electric Co Ltd MC.T> joint venture VHS-format video tape recorder (vtrs) Brazil domestic market government quota vtr import Matsushita spokesman told Reuters. Springer National de Amazonia SA> start output 1988 rate 20000 vtrs said. Springer National locate Manaus capitalise 89.93 mln cruzeiros own 51 pct Springer SA> Brazil 49 pct Matsushita unit National Brasil Ltd>. It form July 1981 colour television audio equipment microwave ovens. REUTER 

Brazil's economic plan enable Brazil renew negotiation creditor 111-billion dlr foreign debt 30 day Finance Minister Luiz Carlos Bresser Pereira said. The plan predict economy grow 4.5 pct inflation drop 10 pct month December 20 pct officially announce "within weeks" told news conference. The minister present outline cabinet meeting President Jose Sarney declare "a total war" inflation. Sarney told meeting austerity plan trim government spending introduced. Bresser Pereira Brazil face risk economic recession estimate gross product grow 4.5 pct year. It grow 8.3 pct year. Its April inflation rate record 20.96 pct contribute accumulate rate 84.19 pct month 1987. Bresser Pereira economic plan seek keep economy grow build eight billion dlr trade surplus force sharp drop inflation rate. REUTER 

Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone dollar's sharp fall yen overnight temporary. The dollar drop sharply New York news Paul Volcker step chairman U.S. Federal Reserve. Nakasone told reporter expect U.S. Policy change Volcker step down. REUTER 

The main navigation channel Rhine block sunken boat remain close begin week authority spokesman today. Karlsruhe authority queue 70 ship form town Speyer Iffezheim shipping company unloaded cargo use alternative mean transport. Heinz-Josef Recker Mannheim authority float crane fresh attempt raise sunken tug lighter unsuccessful try Friday. The tug Orinoko hit railway bridge Tuesday sank cargo 3500 tonne gravel board. Before accident 100 ship sail bridge. Reuter 

A West German navy ship accidentally hit artillery shell Warsaw Pact vessel Baltic Sea sailor injured Defence Ministry said. The ship Tender Neckar struck watch Warsaw Pact exercise Baltic Sea ministry spokesman said. He condition country own ship fire shots. The spokesman West Germany believe incident accidental. Reuter 

Chicago Mercantile Exchange floor trader commission representative guesstimate today's hog slaughter 250000 270000 versus 249000 week ago 261000 ago. Cattle slaughter guesstimate 126000 131000 versus 126000 week ago 131000 ago. Reuter 

Israel's inflation rate May 0.6 pct low July increase Central Bureau Statistics said. In April inflation 2.2 pct figure May 1.6 pct. The rate five month 1987 7.5 pct bureau said. The annual inflation rate past 12 month 20.3 pct bureau spokesman said. Israeli inflation run annual rate 400 pct government impose austerity plan control wage price mid-1985. REUTER 

The Cuban sugar harvest extend month half beyond originally schedule shutdown date end island's 154 mill close operation official newspaper granma said. The newspaper characterize harvest late November 1986 "a tense pressure campaign." In recent interview French communist party newspaper l'humanite Cuban president Fidel Castro crude sugar production harvest "less 7.5 mln tonnes. The harvest plague shortfall rain reduce sugar content cane unseasonable rain storm month cane cut mechanical combine virtually impossible. Many foreign sugar expert voiced doubt harvest raw sugar production exceed year's 7.2 mln tonne mark. In 1984-85 campaign Cuba produce 8.2 mln tonne raw sugar. Reuter 

Dow Chemical Co effective July 15 raise bulk drum price line DOWNRIGHT styrene-butadiene latex additive modification asphalt 15 pct. Reuter 

Egypt third submit bid 89 dlrs tonne tender 200000 tonne soft red wheat June-July delivery export enhancement U.S. exporter said. USDA reject bid twice source noted. Reuter 

Plans key reform European Community's (EC) controversial farm policy certainly refer bloc's head government summit meeting June 29 30 Belgian finance minister Mark Eyskens today. Eyskens speak news conference chair joint meeting EC finance agriculture minister design break deadlock year's EC farm price package endure March. Diplomats quote EC Executive Commission president Jacques Delors say meeting disaster difficult issue farm talk refer head government. These issue Commission plan tax marine vegetable fat oil proposal change EC farm price express European currency unit (Ecus) translate currency member states. The oil fat tax oppose country fear provoke trade retaliation U.S. A major exporter soybean EC. West Germany meanwhile strongly technical currency move result additional price cut farmer country strong currency mark. Commission source Delors anxious issue refer summit mean head government divert attention Community issues. Eyskens decision head government likely sound usually themselves technically complex questions. However Eyskens today's meeting thrown nuance member position "which dialogue constructive weeks." If farm price decide month Commission power impose seven pct cut cereal price farm trade source said. It originally propose measure cut farm spending 1.1 billion Ecus effective price cut 10 pct crops. Diplomats farm minister able agree price package cut spending 340 mln Ecus disagreement oils/fats tax currency reforms. The finance minister call emphasise budgetary restraint EC budget deficit five billion Ecus year. Although Delors aide found today's meeting useful diplomat little sign major shift position member finance minister adopt line agriculture colleagues. The farm minister expect meet week Luxembourg pre-summit attempt bridge differences. REUTER 

PhoneMate Inc common stock relisted NASDAQ National Market System July 8. NASDAQ company's share relisted NASDAQ June 4 follow delist September 1984 due insufficient capital surplus. PhoneMate Inc design engineer market telecommunication product markets. Reuter 

Africa's effort revive economy match international continent's head opening conference. Presidents Ibrahim Babangida Nigeria Denis Sassou- Nguesso Congo urge Africa's development partner act continent's debt total 175 billion dlrs meeting organise Economic Commission Africa (ECA). Their view back Monique Landry Canada's Minister External Relations. "Whether look aid debt trade rich country yet live year's economic recovery pact." Babangida unrealistic expect country spend 30 pct earnings debt service particularly price continent's commodity unstable. Sassou Nguesso current Chairman Organisation African Unity accuse international aid donor fail provide vigorous effort promise ago. The conference attend African minister economist representative major donor review progress side agree U.N. Last revive African economy five years. The response international community negative projection improve growth rate Africa already look optimistic ECA Executive Secretary Adebayo Adedeji told conference. Both Babangida Sassou Nguesso call debt Africa's poorest country write repayment grace term eased. They won degree support Landry "Even private banker willing talk longer term solution Africa's debt." REUTER 

Occidental Petroleum Corp complete acquisition Shell Oil Co's vinyl chloride monomer undisclosed terms. Shell subsidiary Royal Dutch/Shell Group RD> SC>. The company transaction allow source half vinyl chloride monomer requirement internally make fully integrate polyvinyl chloride production. It buying requirements. Reuter 

Despite past severe winter damage rapeseed acreage Poland appear minor U.S. Agriculture Department's Counselor Warsaw field report. The report date June 11 official statement show 40000 hectare 10 pct sown plow compare usual 15 pct. Rapeseed production forecast 1.1 mln tonne 200000 tonne below record crop produce 1986 35 pct above previous forecast report said. Reuter 

Ghana take step combat imminent famine area near border Togo follow scant rainfall Accra Radio report today. The Radio monitor Abidjan fishing farm activity disrupt district Volta region near eastern coast. The report follow period unusually dry weather Ghana Ivory Coast trade source Abidjan pose problem develop cocoa crops. The Accra Radio report Ghanaian government delegation visit Anglo Ketu district week investigate report food shortage promise regular supply maize rice sugar. At Anglo delegation told Keta Lagoon dry halt fishing activity catch sea poor crop fail due lack rainfall. Reuter 

Lewis Galoob Toys Inc clear apply New York Stock Exchange listing file formal application. company expect list NYSE week July. Galoob's stock trade NASDAQ system. Reuter 

The world's zinc mining smelt industry continue concentrate integrate 1990s Dr Klaus Goekmann vice-president marketing sale Cominco Ltd said. Opening Metal Bulletin base metal conference Goekmann forecast individual business industry continue decline company merge form conglomerate increase market shares. At conglomerate integrate handle entire chain basic ore production marketing added. "The key future viability flexibility. Prices likely remain current historically low level medium term competition metal material continue intensify" Goekmann said. "In past react change world's market economics. In future act defensively aggressively." The industry massive overcapacity tackle quickly added. "Attempts past cut excess capacity Europe fail miserably. However hope current effort successful" Goekmann said. At company move limit geographical currency risk marketing orientate added. "With change rationalization industry survive recover past strength profitability. Without future look rosy" Goekmann said. Reuter 

Reichhold Chemicals Inc RCI.N> emulsion polymer division increase sell price polyvinyl acetate vinyl acetate-acrylate latex paper coat application ct dry pound. The company attribute price increase continue escalation raw material costs. Reuter 

International Phoenix Energy Corp launch gold recovery venture Phoenix Exploration Recovery Inc> Mexico's Sistemas Tecnicos De Recuperaciones Sociedad Anonima de Capital Variable. The company joint venture explore recover gold precious metal artefact treasure ship worth 10 billion dlrs report sunk harbor Vera Cruz Mexico. The company expect begin 30 days. Reuter 

International Phoenix Energy Corp launch gold recovery venture Phoenix Exploration Recovery Inc> Mexico's Sistemas Tecnicos De Recuperaciones Sociedad Anonima de Capital Variable. The company joint venture explore recover gold precious metal artefact treasure ship worth 10 billion dlrs report sunk harbor Vera Cruz Mexico. The company expect begin 30 days. Reuter 

The Basin Pipeline Southwestern U.S. reopen yesterday expectation crude oil shipment June arrive schedule accord spokesman Texaco Inc. TX> operator pipeline Texaco Pipeline Co subsidiary. "We project pipeline June crude shipment scheduled" Dan Stevens spokesman. The pipeline reopen Sunday even 1900 EDT carry equivalent 280000 barrel crude oil compare average 225000 bpd ship 30 day shutdown May 30 accord Stevens. Stevens increase shipment crude oil schedule arrive Cushing Oklahoma via pipeline June. The pipeline shut May 30 apparent rupture cause flood Red River near Texas/Oklahoma border. It expect resume service Saturday rise water river recently recede delayed reopen Stevens said. Approximately 1100 foot 24-inch steel pip instal river replace damage pip accord Stevens. Reuter 

AMAX Inc unit AMAX Magnesium Corp build Knolls Solar Evaporation Pond System recovery magnesium. The company replace previous recovery flood 1986. The company construction complete 1988 full production 1989. Reuter 

Japanese crusher bought 3000 5000 tonne Canadian rapeseed trade source said. Delivery date price detail available. Reuter 

Olin Corp form joint venture Yamaha Group Japan's Nippon-Gakki Co LTd manufacture Olin's high-performance copper alloy Japan sale Far East. The firm Yamaha-Olin Metal Corp share facility Yamaha Iwata expect line third quarter 1988. said. The company join force August 1983 Yamaha agree process market Olin's alloys. The agreement lead 1985 reroll agreement involve alloy said. Reuter 

Spain join European Community country oppose propose tax marine vegetable oil fat diplomatic source said. They Spanish position clarify joint meeting EC finance agriculture minister discus budgetary situation surround year's EC farm price negotiations. Previously West Germany Britain Portugal Denmark declare themselves tax Spain's position unclear source said. The source Spanish junior finance minister Guillermo de la Dehesa Spain tax implication trade talk General Agreement Tariffs Trade discrimatory exclude butter. They country oppose tax vote need EC's majority voting block proposal. Reuter 

Olin Corp form joint venture Yamaha Group Japan's Nippon-Gakki Co Ltd manufacture Olin's high-performance copper alloy Japan sale Far East. The firm Yamaha-Olin Metal Corp share facility Yamaha Iwata expect line third quarter 1988. said. The company join force August 1983 Yamaha agree process market Olin's alloys. The agreement lead 1985 reroll agreement involve alloy said. Reuter 

The propose European Community (EC) levy oil fat criticise CAOBISCO association EC biscuit chocolate confectionery manufacturers. In letter President Council Ministers M. Eyskens association tax cost EC biscuit cake chocolate confectionery industry 200 mln European currency unit year. The tax contrary spirit General Agreement Tariffs Trade (GATT) prompt U.S. Retaliatory measure EC export CAOBISCO said. In parallel move British Biscuit Cake Chocolate Confectionery Alliance write U.K. Chancellor Exchequer Nigel Lawson urge oppose levy. President Charles Gillett tax extend Commission's power allow level consumer taxation previously reserve treasuries. Reuter 

An International Sugar Organization (ISO) committee discuss term administrative International Sugar Agreement debate controversial budget contribution delegate said. Progress technical area main importer Soviet Union unable attend prior commitment distribution vote contribution raise ISO spokesman said. Delegates private meeting take main participant discus detail agreement. The committee due meet tomorrow. Reuter 

Lack rainfall recent week affected Ivory Coast 1987/88 main crop cocoa prospect precipitation half June July reverse situation trade source said. They crop likely fairly determine consequence dry spell harvest. "This year's crop probably one. It impossible tell flower problem unless drastic happens" trader said. Private forecaster Accu-Weather report Ivory Coast cocoa grow region rain weekend similar weather persist Tuesday. "Rain welcome past week quite dry except western portion coast" said. Traders agree rain need note dry condition affected entire country. The Ivorian Meteorological Office reach comment recent statistics. The trade source rainfall recent week likely insufficient cocoa plant difficult ass minimum requirement are. Trade source rain late January February March help promote flower April May fairly dry area except south west country. The Ivory Coast mid-crop cover March/April rain main crop formation period depends largely rainfall April July. The main rain normally May July return September/October. "Flowering normal tree carry moment chance recover" trader said. Another trade source note flower plenty develop rain "not bad." The source weather emerge cause concern crop condition West Africa presently take seat factor international cocoa market. This premature nature harvest prediction supply cocoa already burdening market said. "With third surplus overhang market buffer stock fail boost price despite regular purchase weather factor" private consultant said. London-based dealer Gill Duffus April cocoa market report current 1986/87 Ivory Coast crop likely total 570000 tonne compare record 1985/86 crop estimate 585000 tonnes. Reuter 

Amoco Corp Taiwan petrochemical venture owner plan build chemical plant Taiwan. The company plant built China American Petrochemical Co Ltd 50 pct own Amoco Chemical Co purify terephthalic acid (PTA) raw material polyester fibers. It facility China American's third PTA plant capacity 550 mln pound PTA annually. China American's owner Chinese Petroleum Corp 25 pct Central Investment Holding Co 25 pct. Reuter 

Roy Denman European Community representative Washington warn United States set rule trading partner run surplus "beaten head" remove trade barriers. Denman Op-Ed piece today's Washington Post trade dispute dealt negotiation either bilaterally multilaterally Geneva-based United Nations agency General Agreement Tariffs Trade GATT. Denman's comment Senate begin debate week major trade bill. "It dangerous establish rule trading partner run surplus United States beaten trade barrier object United States remove time-scale" Denman apparent reference measure congressional trade bill. "If turn path unilateral action retaliation counter-retaliation one-world (GATT) trading quickly unravel" said. Denman 170 billion dlr U.S. trade deficit purely result unfair trade practice foreign nations. "The trade deficit result combination macroeconomic factor (the U.S. budget deficit) exchange rate competitiveness (U.S.) domestic industry" Denman said. He Washington employ term unfair trade prctices. He European Community recently update list 30 U.S. trade barrier impede EC exports. "We circulate list hostile aggressive intent. We record straight" Denman said. Reuter 

Tunisia launch fresh buying tender 200000 tonne French soft wheat tomorrow shipping July September trade source said. Tunisia recent week cancel tender cover French government's COFACE export credits. Reuter 

The premier Canada's eastern province governor America's New England urge development Canada's offshore oil gas field construction pipeline Nova Scotia New England. Newfoundland premier Brian Peckford speak annual conference New England eastern Canadian leader development prevent repetition energy crisis 1970s. The agree discus energy security supply spring. Drilling Canada's Atlantic coast stall oil price tumble ago. The resolution support natural gas pipeline Nova Scotia New England agenda six sixth approved. The two-day conference end tomorrow. Reuter 

USX Corp Worthington Industries WTHG.O> Inc's Worthingon Specialty Products steel processing plant Jackson Mich. recently reach production level designed. The company 600000 short ton plant design provide automotive appliance customer first-stage process steel just-in-time delivery. It open August 1986 USX begin six-month labor dispute. USX source plant coil Gary Ind. work Mon Valley Works near Pittsburgh Worthington operating plant. Reuter 

Bonn expect rush legislation month create special credit protect West German farmer propose European Community EC payment freeze government source said. The measure apparently design shield West German farmer consequence loom EC budget crisis Bonn scope keep opposition EC executive commission's farm policy reform plan political source said. EC finance farm minster held unprecedented joint session Luxembourg try solve stalemate future farm financing. West Germany prove main obstacle Commission attempt raise fresh fund farm financing tax import vegetable oil fat fear U.S. retaliation. Bonn oppose abolition agri-monetary mechanism act subsidy West German farm exports. The draft legislation ruling centre-right coalition parliament tomorrow provide temporary credit farm subsidy usually paid Brussels. The Commission face five billion European Currency Units (5.73 billion dlrs) budget deficit threaten start phase payment subsidy premium August unless EC member urgent measure provide fresh funds. West German Agriculture Minister Ignaz Kiechle give legislation top priority month's failure agree farm price package 1986/87. Political source Bonn Kiechle decide sting propose Commission measure cut subsidy create buffer West German farmers. The opposition SPD agree Kiechle bill allow hasty passage parliament July 1 ahead summer recess SPD source said. SPD farm policy spokesman Jan Oostergetelo party support bill far swell massive government spending agriculture. He bill admission government believe farm price talk fail EC face bankruptcy. According copy draft bill obtain Reuters government authority billion mark (1.1 billion dlrs) available pay farmer advance subsidy premium grain crop harvest summer. The Commission agree pay subsidy eventually. But pay farmer cost Bonn 100 mln mark (55 mln dlrs) payment farm policy source said. Chancellor Helmut Kohl's cabinet expect support bill meet tomorrow. Reuter 

Treasury Secretary James Baker far decline dollar currency counterproductive. Baker speech Pan American Economic Leadership Conference U.S. policy President Reagan's comment week Venice summit far decline dollar reason. "All G-7 nation believe far decline dollar counterproductive" Baker told reporters. Following Venice press conference Reagan White House clarify Reagan's comment dollar say United States want stable dollar. The main incentive United States favor weaker dollar reduce massive trade deficit deficit narrow past month appear respond 40 pct drop dollar yen mark past years. Reuter 

Commercial hedger increase stake sale U.S. crude oil heating oil future May accord U.S. federal agency report. Trade hedger account 64.7 pct short position May compare 58.2 pct April add 5700 sale May liquidate 11000 purchase report said. Speculators contrast decline share crude oil short May. May spec short total 13.6 pct versus 25.6 pct April. The report prepared Commodity Futures Trading Commission. In heating oil future commercial user account 68.7 pct short postions May versus 58.2 pct April add 311 short positions. Gasoline future little change percentage short position held commercial user speculator trader accord CFTC report. Trade user account 72.5 pct short gasoline future position May compare revise 75.7 pct April. New York Mercantile Exchange Commitments trader May 29 1987 SPECULATOR SPREADERS HEDGERS TOTAL LONG SHRT LONG SHRT LONG SHRT LONG SHRT HEATING 16.1 5.7 2.5 2.5 49.7 68.7 68.2 76.8 OIL SMALL TRADERS - 31.8 short 23.2 UNLEADED 10.8 4.0 7.0 7.0 64.4 72.5 82.3 83.6 GAS SMALL TRADERS - 17.7 short 16.4 CRUDE 15.1 13.6 5.5 5.5 61.2 64.7 81.8 83.8 OIL SMALL TRADERS - 18.2 short 16.2 Reuter 

Bear Automotive Service Equipment Co common stock begin trading June 16 NASDAQ National Market System. The company manufacture computerize electronic diagnostic wheel alignment equipment. Reuter 

The West German Government June 16 provide nearly 850 million mark (470 million dollars) lay retrain 20000 steel worker whose job threaten recent slump country's steel industry. Government spokesman Friedhelm Ost Chancellor Helmut Kohl review joint proposal steel employer trade union meeting ail industry tomorrow. Both steel employer union leader expect tell Kohl tomorrow Government fail protect German steel firm subsidy unfair competition European Community members. Government source Bonn prepared common effort solution steelworkers. But Government struggle finance tax cut slash subsidy prepared pick bill layoff source said. A spokesman IG Metall metalworkers' trade union proposal seek redundancy payment 10000 worker Ruhr Rhineland plants. Some 6000 worker redeployed non-steel make sector steel company far 4000 eligible job-retraining schemes. The union estimate redundancy payment total 600 million mark (340 million dollars) job retrain scheme cost far 240 million mark (130 million dollars). Up 30000 West German steel job risk follow steep loss incur industry mid-1986. Extensive restructuring industry recent unable compensate effect weak dollar depressed foreign demand steel industry source said. Reuter 

The U.S. corn soybean crop mostly condition suffer yield deterioration recent hot dry weather Agriculture Department private weather crop analyst said. "I don't reduction yield potential yet" Norton Strommen chief meteorologist USDA told Reuters. "The (corn soybean) crop actually mostly condition progress ahead normal good" said. Abnormally hot dry weather midwestern crop area spark sharp rally Chicago future cause crop soybean advance 30 cent daily limit 6.14 dlrs bushel September corn 12 cent 2.81 dlrs. "This rally amazing" private crop analyst said. "Corn soybean wheat excellent condition." The USDA meteorologist effect warm dy weather crop probably speed development crop crop cope stress critical grow period. "What weather simply push crop towards rapid development deep root draw subsoil reserve. It actually strengthens crop little stress on" Strommen said. Strommen note subsoil moisture shape grow areas. Strommen private crop analyst note corn soybean enter critical growth stage July August. But development Strommen midwestern corn crop enter reproduction period July. "Weatherwise market truly concerned corn soybean concerned corn. But dryness weeks" analyst said. Soybeans withstand week dryness yield start deteriorate crop analyst agreed. August September critical yield-producing month soybean Strommen said. "The sole purpose soybean plant simply survive May June July August rain determine crop" crop analyst said. Some analyst contend grow area crop receive moisture ensure problem later. Strommen note USDA's current six 10 weather forecast call above normal temperature below normal precipitation corn belt. "This open sort speculation" said. Reuter 

Hot dry weather Midwest forecast push grain future price high Chicago Board Trade. Soybean future lead advance closing 30-cent-per-bushel daily trading limit contract delivery year's fall harvest. All month life-of-contract high November close 6.23 dlrs bushel. "The market anticipate stay hotter normal out" David Bartholomew assistant vice president Merrill Lynch. "We probably go I don't measure euphoria level." Soymeal future lead grain rally week post contract high end 10 dlr ton daily limit new-crop contracts. December close 195.70 dlrs. Corn future contract high March September December closing 10 cent bushel limit 2.11-3/4 dlrs. Wheat post modest gain dry weather improve harvest condition southern Midwest. The hot weather stress develop corn soybean plant Midwest period dryness benefit plant encourage development deep root system Bartholomew said. European demand U.S. soybean meal contribute active buying estimate 2.0 mln bushel soybean order unfilled close trader said. After trading end U.S. Agriculture Department (USDA) meteorologist U.S. corn soybean crop suffer yield loss yet hot dry weather. Strong grain future ignore weakness value dollar depress price make grain expensive foreign buyers. But surge soybean encourage buying New York's COMEX silver future recover low settle steady. Managed fund trader bought silver belief weather-spurred jump grain future revive fear inflation. But weak dollar pressure COMEX gold future close follow Friday's news improve U.S. trade deficit figure U.S. producer prices. A USDA report release trading cattle fed seven major produce above level expect traders. Traders report probably push live cattle future low tomorrow Chicago Mercantile Exchange. USDA cattle-on-feed seven major 7.52 mln 106 pct ago trade forecasts. A total 1.954 mln place feed May 111 pct ago May cattle marketing 93 pct 1.524 mln USDA said. Cattle future close mixed choppy trading hot weather slow consumer demand red meat trader said. Reuter 

Spendthrift Farm Inc consent removal American Stock Exchange due failure meet financial listing requirements. The Spendthrift trading shall June 26. The company board name Dale McDoulett formerly president Diamond Shamrock International Petroleum Co president replace Robert Hagopian resign February 7. Reuter 

Noranda Inc contract talk resume continue 1600 unionized worker 63 pct-owned Brunswick Mining Smelter Corp BMS.TO> lead-zinc mine lead smelter Bathurst New Brunswick. A Noranda official reply inquiry talk involve mine smelter union local United Steelworkers America. The mineworkers' contract expires July 1. They vote June 22 either authorize strike ratify contract offer. The smelter workers' pact expires July 21. The Brunswick mine produce 413800 tonne zinc 206000 tonne lead recovery rate 70.5 pct zinc 55.6 pct lead. Concentrates produce 238000 tonne zinc 81000 tonne lead. Reuter 

Cominco Ltd contract negotiation schedule week five strike local Trail smelter Kimberley lead-zinc mine union spokesman said. However leader negotiate team try informal meeting discus stalemate John Owens spokesman United Steelworkers America local 480 local represent 2600 production maintenance workers. Owens Cominco strike cost five mln Canadian dlrs debt service cost cover revenue. He company estimate total lose revenue Cominco spokesman immediately available comment. The strike May nine involves local represent 600 office technical workers. The production maintenance worker week ago reject tentative three-year agreement provide cost living adjustment basic wage increase. Each five local separate contract expire April 30 main issue similar. The Trail smelter produce 240000 ton zinc 110000 ton lead year. The Sullivan mine Kimberley produce 2.2 mln ton ore processing Trail smelter. Reuter 

U.S. exporter opportunity sell 170000 tonne wheat West African country Export Enhancement Program U.S. Agriculture Department said. It addition Benin Cameroon Ivory Coast Ghana Togo country -- Burkina Faso Gabon Liberia Niger -- declare eligible initiative. The export sale subsidize commodity inventory Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC) said. West African country already purchase 129500 tonne wheat previously announce export bonus program noted. Reuter 

Noranda Inc contract talk resume 1600 unionized worker 63 pct-owned Brunswick Mining Smelter Corp lead-zinc mine lead smelter Bathurst New Brunswick. A Noranda official talk involve mine smelter union local United Steelworkers America. The mineworkers' contract expires July 1. They vote June 22 either authorize strike ratify contract offer. The smelter workers' pact expires July 21. The Brunswick mine produce 413800 tonne zinc 206000 tonne lead recovery rate 70.5 pct zinc 55.6 pct lead. Concentrates produce 238000 tonne zinc 81000 tonne lead. Reuter 

The glitter gold generate three-way competition world's large future exchange 100-ounce contract precious metal. When Chicago Mercantile Exchange (CME) re-introduces gold future trading Tuesday (at 9 a.m. CDT) toe-to-toe uphill battle Commodity Exchange Inc. New York (Comex) brokerage executive describe world's precious metal future capital institutional business. And autumn old big exchange Chicago Board Trade (CBT) expect join fray Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) approves pending application 100-ounce gold contract trade side-by-side CBT's small kilogram (about 2.5 U.S. pounds) gold futures. The CME introduce 100-ounce gold future contract 1974 lack force abandon instrument July 1986. CME official investor brokerage firm exchange reintroduce contract recent volatility precious metals. Other factor influence decision clearing problem May force Comex shorten trading straight day effort clear huge backlog unresolved trade especially silver futures. Comex's problem create window opportunity exchange successfully offer precious metal contract industry source say. But predict whether exchange inflict serious damage Comex' daily trading volume 40000 contract represent commitment buy sell gold 2 billion dlrs. While average daily trading CBT's small gold contract aim retail customer institution 500 contract throughout 1986 surpass 1000 contract daily past months. "The climate venture CME" Merrill Lynch Commodity Marketing Vice President Neil McGarrity. "Everybody talk metal interest daily trading range provide opportunity bull bears. There's trading volume outlets" McGarrity added. "The Merc's gold future insurance dealer merchant customer market trading" heavy gold silver future volume cause Comex close Jack Lehman senior vice president director commodity Shearson Lehman Bros. Inc. Comex board member. Delivery point vary exchange's 100-ounce gold futures. Comex contract deliverable New York warehouse CME contract specifies London delivery CME account Samuel Montagu Co. Ltd. member London gold market. The CBT gold application specifies delivery New York Chicago vaults. The Comex CBT apply CFTC earlier precious metal opening match CME's start 7:20 a.m. CDT. The exchange earlier start allows trading government report release 7:30 a.m. CDT. CME marketing source arbitrage possibility exist side-by-side trading note local interest generate trader deal foreign currency short-term debt future gold future contract far hedge financial risks. "If dollar rise trader sell currency buy gold" David Johnson CME's manager currency products. The Chicago Board Trade see extra advantage gold trading. "Given trading session add either pending 100-ounce gold exist 5000-ounce silver contract attract overseas business" CBT official said. Which market identify precious metal capital appear major issue professionals. "We've see Chicago bring constituency needs" Mocatta Metals Chairman Dr. Henry Jarecki said. "Merchants CME anywhere trade liquid contract. Our firm exception" Jarecki said. "At bad CME gold future fail Comex pressure improve integrity clearing processes" CME official added. Reuter 

Cominco Ltd contract negotiation schedule week five strike local Trail smelter Kimberley lead-zinc mine union spokesman said. However leader negotiate team try informal meeting discus stalemate John Owens spokesman United Steelworkers America local 480 said. Owens Cominco strike May 9 cost five mln Canadian dlrs debt service cost cover revenue. He company estimate total lose revenue. Cominco spokesman immediately available comment. Reuter 

The Agricultural Stabilization Conservation Service announce temporary step enable respond quickly demand Commodity Credit Corp.-owned soybeans. The CCC suspend practice contact store warehouseman sell soybean cash third party Collyn Peterson deputy director ASCS Kansas City office. In addition minimum quantity sale 25000 bushel warehouse total inventory that. ASCS add telephone line handle call interested buying soybean Peterson said. Reuter 

President Reagan sent classify report Congress plan protect Kuwaiti oil tanker U.S. military escorts. Congressional official report receive House Speaker Jim Wright Senate majority leader Robert Byrd public. Congress demand detailed security plan U.S. warship serviceman protect attack Gulf region scene prolong Iran Iraq. White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater Administration intend push ahead plan despite strong opposition Congress. He report Congress provide comprehensive overview Administration strategy Gulf add military escort plan begin "when President satisfied preparation complete satisfactorily". Fitzwater deny protection plan held up. Reuter 

Ecuador accept bid company wish explore crude oil 1.2-million-hectare southeast country spokesman Ecuadorian State Oil Company (CEPE) said. The spokesman company October 15 bid middle sign contracts. Competitors bid six alternative 200000-hectare area southeast forest bordering Peru western coastal plain Pacific. Petrocanada start drilling exploratory well 200000 hectare area. Reuter 

The European Community (EC) executive Commission urgently consider whether initiative break current deadlock reform bloc's farm policy ease budgetary crisis. The Commission meet Strasbourg follow diplomat described largely fruitless special joint meeting farm finance minister issue Luxembourg Monday. Commission official farm commissioner Frans Andriessen ask 17-man body permission farm minister compromise plan revise proposal 1987/88 farm price divide announce March. The controversial aspect proposal plan tax vegetable marine oil fat finance rapidly increase production subsidy technical measure change common EC farm price convert member currencies. West German delegation source oppose plan fiercely Commission drop oil fat tax plan modify currency proposal chance agreement aspect package. These include measure cut effective price paid farmer cereal crop 10 pct. But Commission spokesman proposal include plan revise current oil fat currency regulations. The Commission anxious avoid complete deadlock meeting EC farm minister week fear issue refer EC head government summit month. Commission president Jacques Delors want ensure summit ample consider proposal mean financing cash-strapped EC yesterday "disastrous" farm issue discuss government leaders. However five billion European Currency Unit (5.75 billion dollar) EC budget deficit inevitable Commission wary make major concession traditionally free-spending farm minister diplomat Belgian finance minister Mark Eyskens chair yesterday's joint meeting minister afterwards aspect farm price package certainly refer summit. Although Delors' aide described joint meeting useful clarify issue diplomat merely confirm member states' held positions. Indeed extra Spain line already oppose oil fat tax West Germany Britain Denmark Portugal. Reuter 

The grow shift low-skilled manufacturing job United States Mexican border city threat American employment create market product accord study release today. Richard Bolin director Flagstaff Institute Arizona study international trade issue United States need encourage expansion manufacturing develop country nation consumer U.S. goods. His study commission border city McAllen Texas presentation International Trade Commission gathering information report Congress change need U.S. tariff code prevent loss job industry. McAllen Texas border city benefit trend U.S. company build twin plant employ factory worker side U.S.-Mexico border. More 700 manufacturer take advantage lenient tax code allow U.S. company bring raw good Mexico assembly low-skilled worker product complete U.S. worker nearby sister plant. Bolin research indicate shift low-paying job across border reflect change demographic U.S. workforce. "In post-baby boom era few worker available fill low-skill job -- worker educate prior generations" Bolin told reporter McAllen. "The job low-tech industry export country job able fill future." U.S. employment less-skilled manufacturing job plunge 900000 1977 1982 largely due transfer job outside U.S. border said. American employment high-tech industry increase 634000 period said. But high-tech industry engineer six percent workforce pay high wage generate U.S. export low-tech business said. Reuter 

The dollar worth 170 yen base purchasing parity Ministry International Trade Industry (MITI) annual paper international trade. Using 1973 base ministry inflation differential point yen/dollar rate 172 fourth quarter 1986. The dollar open 144.90 yen. MITI so-called "J-curve" drop oil price together account 33.2 billion dlrs 36.6 billion dlr rise Japan's trade surplus year. On custom clear basis Japanese trade surplus rise record 82.66 billion dlrs year. The ministry fall oil price account 16.5 billion dlrs "J-curve" 17.2 billion dlrs rise 1986 surplus. Analyzing expansion Japan's trade imbalance recent MITI calculate 37 pct account exchange rate 24 pct difference economic growth rate Japan country 36 pct so-called price elasticity import exports. Analyzing expansion U.S. Trade deficit 1982 1985 ministry 24 pct account exchange rate 34 pct difference income elasticity import export 39 pct difference economic growth rates. The figure tally 100 pct minor factor left out. "One index trade structure income elasticity export import show U.S. Is likely experience increase import Japan structurally predispose growth exports" MITI said. Structural adjustment already underway Japan impact strong yen MITI said. Japanese company step import expand capacity overseas. Japanese consumer attitude changing. The ministry cite survey show price factor purchase import U.S. And Western Europe replace design brand reputations. "The smooth adjustment economic structure call measure address need affected firms" said. "Whole industry pinch employment expect suffer." "Sustained economic growth lead domestic demand essential condition" ministry said. It structural factor contribute growth U.S. Trade deficit recent -- decline U.S. Industrial competitiveness insufficient productive capacity increase foreign procurement U.S. Companies short-sighted U.S. Management attitudes. "While (U.S.) export picked somewhat dollar's fall value marked improvement appear import picture" MITI said. REUTER 

The Japanese economy bottom extend period stagnation Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told press conference. But optimistic economy employment situation shaky region country. Yesterday Finance Ministry quarterly corporate survey show economy show increase sign recovery. REUTER 

The Central Bank issue 8.29 billion Taiwan dlrs worth certificate deposit (CDs) raise total CD issue 228.27 billion bank official told Reuters. The CDs maturity six month bear rate range 4.05 5.25 pct said. The issue intend curb growth M-1b money supply expand due rise Taiwan's foreign exchange reserve 60 billion U.S. Dlrs. REUTER 

Treasurer Paul Keating expect Australian current account deficit fiscal 1986/87 end June 30 13.25 billion dlrs. In statement release Statistics Bureau figure show May deficit below forecast 866 mln dlrs Keating cumulative deficit likely 1.5 billion dlrs below Treasury forecast 14.75 billion issue 1986/87 Budget paper August. However government subsequently revise forecast 13.75 billion dlrs series current account figure indicate decline trend. Keating's revise 1986/87 current account deficit forecast compare record shortfall 14.40 billion dlrs 1985/86 level nearly double 7.29 billion deficit record earlier 1983/84. Keating main reason revision better-than-expected export performance. Recent quarterly figure show export volume rise 14.4 pct half-year March 30 import volume rise 0.9 pct said. The Bureau data issue show cumulative deficit 11 month 1986/87 narrow 12.32 billion dlrs 13.21 billion earlier. REUTER 

The Panama Canal world's key maritime crossroad affected recent anti-government protest spokesman U.S.-government agency operates waterway said. "Everything's normal here. It (the canal) run efficiently everything well" Anel Beliz spokesman Panama Canal Commission. The commission monitoring situation contingency exist ensure continued operation said. Unconfirmed report shipping line order vessel Panama far notice. REUTER 

Uruguayan supplier agree supply Taiwan 25000 tonne soybean total 70000 tonne agree April spokesman joint committee Taiwan's soybean importer told Reuters. He rise price Uruguayans reluctant ship soybean agree price 226.56 U.S. Dlrs tonne. The Uruguayans agree supply shipment Taiwan committee threaten week cancel postpone delivery July 1-20 original June 5-25 committee spokesman said. Government source Montevideo confirm Uruguayan grain export firm ask Taiwan reconsider price soybean government intervene dispute. "The deal agree private company participation whatsoever Uruguayan government" Uruguyan Agriculture Ministry spokesman Andres Bonino said. He add "Uruguay export 70000 tonne soybean total production low figure." The contract call Uruguayans deliver 70000 tonne shipment June 5 August 10. Taiwan's ambassador Montevideo Henry Wang told reporter "Both country finish detail arrive satisfactory price." He price "very advantageous (for Uruguay) above international price." Taiwan bought 36000 tonne soybean make Uruguay's big customer oilseed. Taiwan's joint committee hold tender shipment U.S. Soybeans total 87000 tonnes. REUTER 

The Venice summit accord give International Monetary Fund (IMF) increase responsibility smooth vital economic cooperation industrial country senior IMF official said. The official met reporter identify clear series economic measurement monitor seven lead industrial democracy difficult major step cooperation. The United States Japan West Germany France Britain Italy Canada agree summit series economic indicator forecast economic behaviour attempt increase cooperation economic policy. The set formal process review see step forward cooperative effort criticise lack teeth force country change economic behaviour hurt countries. But official influence peer pressure major impact reform err country. Economists generally believe cooperative economic approach large country salutory impact global economy include help poorest debtor countries. The official IMF function warn country economic behaviour stray badly try persuade modify it. "I hope yellow red flag" said. He hop negotiation begin week increase IMF's structural adjustment facility help 62 world's poorest countries. The facility approve 15 month ago currently finance 3.8 billion dlrs triple plan. He reach accord agreement difficult country press find reason reduce exposure. "They tremendously difficult negotiations" said. REUTER 

Taiwan's target sugar production 1987/88 season (November/May) 600000 tonne 479200 tonne harvest 1986/87 spokesman state-owned Taiwan Sugar Corp told Reuters. He increase meet rise local consumption estimate 500000 tonne calendar 1988 470000 tonne 1987. Taiwan surplus export 100000 tonne 1988 said. In 1987 Taiwan exportable sugar 40 typhoon damage 6000 hectare canefield 1986 said. REUTER 

Mount Isa Mines Ltd MIMA.S> raise copper price 20 dlrs 2220 dlrs tonne cathode 2387.50 dlrs tonne standard rod effective June 17. REUTER 

Japanese crusher bought 50000 tonne Canadian rapeseed shipment late July/August total purchase period likely 130000 tonne trade source said. Crushers reduce Canadian purchase late June July 111000 120000 tonne due seasonal maintenance oil mills. But estimate crushers' buying July/August slightly above monthly average likely keep level due crush margin compare soybean said. REUTER 

South Korea's energy consumption rise nine pct 61.07 mln tonne oil equivalent (toe) 1986 56.0 mln 1985 energy ministry official told Reuters. They oil account 46.7 pct energy consumption 1986 48.5 pct 1985. Anthracite account 21.0 pct 21.5 pct bituminous coal 16.5 pct 17.3 pct nuclear 11.6 pct 7.5 pct. The amount spent energy import 1986 4.53 billion dlrs 6.54 billion dlrs 1985 difference due change price oil. REUTER 

Japan's gross product (gnp) rise real 1.2 pct January/March quarter downwardly revise 0.7 pct increase previous month Economic Planning Agency said. The October/December rise originally 0.8 pct. For fiscal end March 31 gnp rise 2.6 pct 4.3 pct increase 1985/86. Last year's performance bad 1974/75 gnp contract 0.4 pct below government's revise pct forecast. Economists strong yen largely blame slowdown economic growth 1986/87. Domestic demand increase 0.7 pct January/March quarter 4.3 pct fiscal compare growth 0.6 pct October/December 3.7 pct 1985/86. The annualized growth rate January/March quarter accelerate 4.9 pct 2.9 pct October/December. In nominal term gnp rise 0.7 pct January/March 0.5 pct October/December rise reflect low prices. Domestic demand contribute 0.7 percentage real gnp growth January/March foreign trade add 0.5 point. In October/December domestic demand contribute 0.6 foreign trade add 0.2 point. Of 0.5 contribution foreign trade gnp quarter rise export account 0.3 fall import contribute 0.2. Total export volume rise 2.0 pct quarter-on-quarter January/March import fell 1.2 pct. Of 0.7 contribution domestic demand January/March gnp growth private sector account 1.1 sector knock 0.4. The private sector contribution include 0.4 corporate capital outlay 1.0 consumer spending destocking subtract 0.3 point. In 1986/87 domestic demand contribute 4.1 percentage point growth foreign trade knock 1.5 points. In 1985/86 domestic demand contribution 3.6 point foreign trade 0.7 point. REUTER 

Compagnie Financiere de Credit Industriel et Commercial raise 255 mln mark six-year float rate note (FRN) carry coupon 1/8 six-month London Interbank Offered Rate (LIBOR) price 100.05 lead manager Morgan Stanley GmbH said. The bullet bond sell denomination 10000 250000 mark list Frankfurt. It matures March 20 1993. Payment date July 20 1987. Fees total 15 basis point five sell 10 management underwriting combined. The bond lead-managed Morgan Stanley mark sector. REUTER 

Dowty Group Plc DWTY.L> agree buy Hydraulic Units Inc> Boeing Co BA.N> 42.5 mln dlrs cash. The final sum payable adjust accord change net tangible asset March 29 completion due July 1. Payment finance medium-term borrowings. Hydraulic report 4.3 mln dlrs pretax profit end-December 1986 sale 53.2 mln. It design manufacture sell hydraulic mechanical system airframe manufacturers. REUTER 

A Taiwan mission plan buy 410000 bale (500 lbs/bale) U.S. Cotton worth 110 mln U.S. Dlrs visit U.S. States month spokesman Taiwan Spinners Association told Reuters. He similar mission bought 700000 bale worth 77 mln dlrs. He mission buying U.S. Cotton price 15 pct high cotton Pakistan India. The current average price U.S. Cotton 75 cents/lb spokesman estimate average price 53 cent shipment year. REUTER 

Japan's broadly define money supply average M-2 plus certificate deposit (CD) jumped preliminary 10.2 pct May earlier Bank Japan said. The increase large year-on-year rise March 1982 money supply gain 10.5 pct. The money supply increase 9.8 pct April. The seasonally adjust average May rise 1.0 pct previous month. Unadjusted M-2 plus CDs average 347200 billion yen May 345500 billion April. REUTER 

U.K. Public relation Valin Pollin International Plc conditionally agree buy New York-based Carter Organisation Inc 114.6 mln dlrs. Initial payment 51.0 mln dlrs far payment base pretax profit end-September 1990. Carter investor relation consultancy proxy solicitation firm. The payment issue vendor Chairman Donald Carter Valin Pollin ordinary shares. A total 50 mln dlrs underwritten remainder retain Carter. In end-1986 Carter 16.0 mln dlrs turnover 35.41 mln pro forma basis deduct Chairman's salary rate agree acquired. Carter 300 client large 20 acocunting 45 pct total turnover. Valin Pollin propose issue ordinary share issue cash finance expense deal final payment 3.13 mln guilder Dutch unit Valin Pollin Thomas Kleyn BV. Dealings company's share suspend ahead announcement 290p expect trading restart July. REUTER 

China's final 1986 budget deficit 7.05 billion yuan 7.05 billion March budget speech surplus 2.1 billion 1985 Tian Yinong Vice Minister Finance said. The New China News Agency quote Tian put total 1986 income 226.03 billion yuan 186.6 billion 1985 1986 spending 233.08 billion 184.5 billion. He blame 1986 deficit excess demand rapid increase consumption fund capital investment loss firms. REUTER 

All Japanese maker truck stop export North Korea follow issue Japanese government guidance company spokesman told Reuters. The move responds U.S. Government's expression concern North Korea use Japanese-made truck missile launch pad said. Nissan Diesel Motor Co Ltd> ship 156 vehicle include mid-sized truck bus North Korea 1986 Isuzu Motors Ltd ISUM.T> export 100 six eight-tonne truck 1986 company spokesman said. A spokesman Mitsubishi Motors Corp MIMT.T> trade North Korea year. Hino Motors Ltd> ship 28 five-tonne truck 1986 company spokesman said. REUTER 

Dutch retail service Vendex International VENN.AS> delayed flotation 1988 1990 chairman major shareholder Anton Dreesmann interview Dutch financial daily. "We don't flotation yet" told Financieele Dagblad note want net profit rise 400 mln guilder year's 302 mln move bourse. Dreesmann add flotation speed company substantial amount capital attractive major takeover prospect yet. Vendex plan pay 30 pct profit dividends. REUTER 

U.S. Secretary State George Shultz forecast golden future Philippines talk struggle economic recovery fight communist insurgents. Speaking luncheon hour-long meeting President Corazon Aquino Shultz deliver powerful uncompromising endorsement Manila government. "There golden future Filipino gain" said. But temper praise veil hint Washington's attitude change call current realism see diluted. "The political dream 18 month ago become democratic institution today" Shultz said. "Your economy develop impressive steam insurgent learn threat intimidation stop Filipino voting democracry." He struck widespread awareness problem face Philippines. "No I met under-estimates task lie ahead act them. That Filipino realism essential element American confidence Philippines" said. Shultz revolution brought Aquino 18 month ago way. He praise effort arm force combat communist insurgency 18th add Aquino address economic problem fuel rebellion. Defence Minister Rafael Ileto briefing reporter separate meeting Shultz U.S. Was confident communist beaten. U.S. Officials clear start today's talk expect dramatic developments. REUTER 

Foreign Ministers Association South-east Asian Nations (ASEAN) expect closer economic tie Japan. A communique issue two-day ministerial meeting Asean hop great Japanese investment region access Asean product Japanese market large number visit Japanese tourists. The minister due start day talk tomorrow official U.S. Japan European Community New Zealand Australia Canada include Secretary State George Shultz Japan's Foreign Minister Tadashi Kuranari. The Asean communique note Japan's trade surplus enable Tokyo play great role economic development ASEAN facilitate closer ASEAN economic cooperation. "Japan facilitate flow Japanese investment ASEAN provision attractive financial assistance incentive private sector" said. The communique welcome President Reagan's firm action veto trade protectionist measure Congress. The communique ASEAN minister concerned proliferation protectionist policy pressure measure developed country continued depressed level commodity price instability exchange rate lack comprehensive solution debt situation. REUTER 

Mitsubishi Heavy Industries Ltd MITH.T> building world's advanced energy-saving tanker consumes 48 tonne fuel oil day. Construction 258000 dwt VLCC (very crude carrier) Nisseki Maru Tokyo Tanker Co Ltd> shipping arm Nippon Oil Co Ltd NPOL.T> expect complete April 1988. It run Japan/Gulf route company statement said. The statement give details. Mitsubishi Heavy finish building vlcc similar size consume 57 tonne fuel day. REUTER 

The Bank Japan consider expand 60 billion yen daily limit security firm's outstanding transaction yen call market request security industry Bank Japan source said. But do Bank wait effect brokers' fund raise change effective August shorter settlement period cash bond transaction source said. REUTER 

Pasco Corp issue 85 mln dlr equity warrant eurobond due July 9 1992 indicate coupon 1-5/8 pct par pricing lead manager Nomura International Ltd said. The issue guaranteed Mitsubishi Bank Ltd final term June 23. The sell concession 1-1/2 pct management underwriting combine pay 3/4 pct. The issue available denomination 5000 dlrs list Luxembourg. Payment date July 9 warrant exercisable July 20 1987 June 16 1992. REUTER 

Organisation African Unity Chairman Denis Sassou-Nguesso Africa unable pay debt due fall export prices. "Even African country pay debt able to" Congolese president Sassou-Nguesso told news conference meeting foreign African expert continent's economic prospects. "You cannot expect impossible. All commodity export exception oil fall value international markets" added. "In condition African country continue respect debt servicing?" Sassou-Nguesso asked. He debt issue main subject month's OAU summit Addis Ababa rule possibility joint "debtors' revolt" there. "Let wait see" reply possibility. Debts sub-Saharan African country total 100 billion dlrs accord Economic Commission Africa organise current meeting Nigeria's future capital. REUTER 

OPEC regain former role price-setter oil market follow year's price act OPEC Secretary General Fadhil al-Chalabi said. But expect short-term rise demand OPEC oil add market stability mean continued sacrifice 13 OPEC member countries. Al-Chalabi speak university yesterday December 1986 conference OPEC 18 dlr barrel reference price give market signal producers' serious. "It (OPEC) choice defend price restore credibility" al-Chalabi Caracas meeting OPEC Fund Board Governors. Al-Chalabi OPEC exceed production quota effect February 1 spot market price near above official OPEC prices. Before December conference OPEC face major basic dilemma lead loss leadership role said. "The question OPEC do? Defend price risk lose market share? Or defend market share price drop?" asked. "OPEC chosen stabilise price. But question willing keep painful exercise?" said. Al-Chalabi despite OPEC's success shore price achieve discipline regard quota quick restraint production. He foresaw increase demand OPEC oil increase non-OPEC production combine conservation alternative energy source cause change market easily reversed. REUTER 

Share price open sharply high boost Italian election result dealt blow Communist party bolster Christian Democrats Socialists. The Milan Stock Index indicate 2.90 pct high 0930 GMT sector stronger. Among stock post gain mid morning Fiat ordinary indicate 13090 lira yesterday's closing 12705. These provisional closing prices. Analysts result Sunday's Monday's voting boost bourse short-term market's medium-term prospect remain cloud doubt form government. "The result positive Communists suffer defeat Italians vote stability" director Paolo Azzoni Milan investment bank ABK Spa> told Reuters. Uncertainty election outcome possibility Communist gain weigh bourse week broker said. Final return show Socialists lead former Prime Minister Bettino Craxi increase vote 14.3 pct 11.4 1983 Communists drop point 26.6 pct. Support Christian Democrats rise 34.3 pct all-time low 32.9 1983. Carlo De Benedetti chairman Ing C. Olivetti EC Spa OLIV.MI> comment result Italian television "I be sure reaction international market extremely favourable electoral verdict." Broker Francesco Dinepi Milan investment firm Sige Spa> U.K. Institutional investor place buy order Milan morning. "In medium-term direction market depends Christian Democrats Socialists resolve differences" Dinepi. "What Italy want government quickly" add Azzoni. REUTER 

Toyota Motor Corp TOYO.T> likely raise 800 mln dlrs Eurodollar bond warrant mid-July underwriting source said. A final official decision issue yet detailed term announce added. The fund likely investment increase productivity domestically abroad said. REUTER 

Olympic Co Ltd Tokyo issue 50 mln Swiss franc five note indicate pct coupon lead manager Morgan Stanley said. The issue guaranteed Mitsubishi Trust Banking Corp. Terms fix June 22 payment due July 9. The warrant exercise period August 3 1987 June 30 1992. REUTER 

The Bundesbank announce lift veto private hold European Currency Unit (ECU) liability banking source said. But probably significant news today's council session brought forward usual Thursday date Corpus Christi holiday here. The Bundesbank expect change credit policy. The source Bundesbank official work technical legal problem ECU subject discuss presence federal finance minister Gerhard Stoltenberg May 7. With primary internal ECU complete approval 18-member central bank council virtually mere formality source said. Bundesbank president Karl Otto Poehl chair today's meeting mid-May remain ECU restriction likely lift allow individual ECU account incur liability previously mainly execute Luxembourg subsidiary major German banks. The source ECU liberalisation mainly design show West Germany prepared play effort attain European Community monetary unity 1992. REUTER 

The European Community launch 500 mln franc 10-year bond fungible 600 mln franc 8-3/4 pct April 7 1997 issue lead manager Banque Indosuez said. Co-lead manager Bank Tokyo International. The issue price tranche 96-5/8 pct. Fees pct 1-3/8 pct sell 5/8 pct management underwriting combine include 1/8 pct praecipuum. Payment date non-callable issue July 7 plus accrue interest. Denominations 10000 50000 franc listing Luxembourg Paris. REUTER 

Swedish industrial production rise 1.5 pct April 2.2 pct fall March rise 3.8 pct April 1986 accord preliminary figure Central Bureau Statistics. The bureau April rise occur sector great advance paper product chemical industries. REUTER 

Government official bad Japanese economy today's news strong expect growth January/March period. But private economist sure economy unlikely achieve government's 3.5 pct growth forecast current fiscal end March. As already report GNP rise 1.2 pct January/March quarter revise 0.7 pct increase previous months. For fiscal end March 31 GNP growth slow 2.6 pct 4.3 pct 1985/86. The government economist acknowledge improve export performance January/March quarter unlikely repeated. The volume export period pct previous months. The yen's rise April 140 dollar 150 probably result fall export April/June quarter said. However yen's recent stability stepped-up domestic demand drive force push economy onto path sustainable growth said. Many private economist doubt economy achieve government's 3.5 pct growth forecast 1987/88 year. Growth 1986/87 fell short government's forecast revise downwards pct December original pct. Domestic demand strong except housing Johsen Takahashi chief economist Mitsubishi Research Institute. Consumer spending likely remain weak growth nominal income stay low added. The rise consumer spending January-March quarter simply reflection contraction occur precede month Takahashi said. Private capital spending quarter look strong primarily utility company brought forward 1987/88 capital investment plan final quarter 1986/87 line government's economic stimulation package announce fall said. Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank chief economist Kosaku Furuta unable economy bottom add expect increase sign recovery come months. Destocking come company start rebuild inventory Furuta said. Housing expect remain buoyant back low rate government policy stimulate sector said. The government's recently unveiled 6000 billion yen economic package economy. But economy unlikely achieve government's 3.5 pct forecast 1987/88 growth close pct. REUTER 

The West German government consider demand nearly 850 mln mark lay retrain 20000 steel workers. Government spokesman Friedhelm Ost Chancellor Helmut Kohl review joint proposal steel employer trade union special meeting steel industry representatives. Companies Fried Krupp KRPG.D> Hoesch Werke AG HWKG.F> profit plunge take unusual step align metalworkers' trade union IG Metall press government finance slim staff level further. Government official Bonn prepared common effort solution steelworkers. But government struggle finance tax cut reduce subsidy pay layoffs. A spokesman IG Metall joint proposal foresaw redundancy payment 10000 worker Ruhr Rhineland plants. Some 6000 worker redeployed non-steel make sector steel company far 4000 eligible job-retraining schemes. Redundancies estimate 600 mln mark job retrain cost far 240 mln. REUTER 

Next likely shortfall zinc concentrate 100000 tonne ample supply 1987 Shearson Lehman Brothers Ltd metal analyst Stephen Briggs said. Speaking Metal Bulletin's base metal conference Briggs major factor predict 100000 tonne shortfall zinc concentrate supply 1988 imminent cessation mining termination milling Pine Point Canada. However partially offset stockpiles. Nevertheless despite predict shortfall unlikely dramatic change treatment charge 1988. The picture 1987 record production zinc metal few strike anticipate Canada improvement South America capacity South Korea. "Dramatic record level concentrate output expect 1987" Briggs said. This partly due return normal level exist mine Australia Peru allied achievement full capacity 170000 tonne Faro Canada. Looking far forward major event probable opening 1991 Red Dog mine Alaska capacity 300000 tonne concentrate year. "Once mine fully stream unlikely major shortage concentrate 1990s" added. The picture lead closely allied zinc dedicate lead mine plan therefore supply concentrate largely dependent by-product zinc mines. "On basis calculation modest oversupply lead concentrate 1987" Briggs said. The copper forecast record non-Socialist output 6.6 mln tonne concentrate 1987 increase far 150000 tonne 1988. Production primary refine copper metal increase concentrate output lead moderate oversupply concentrate 150000 tonne shortage predict rest decade said. REUTER 

Italy's wholesale price index rise 0.5 pct month-on-month April increase 0.1 pct March statistic institute Istat said. The index base 1980 equal 100 register 174.2 April compare 173.3 March. The April figure represent increase 1.6 pct compare correspond month 1986 year-on-year rise March 0.6 pct. REUTER 

Indonesia try increase sugar output calendar 1988 2.4 mln tonne expect 2.2 mln 1987 Agriculture Minister Achmad Affandi said. He told reporter meeting President Suharto gain increase average production 10 tonne hectare previous 6.2 tonnes. He Indonesia aim pas United States world's fourth large producer compare current seventh position. Affandi increase insure Indonesia's self-sufficiency commodity allow keep adequate stocks. Indonesia produce 2.02 mln tonne 1986 U.S. Embassy annual agriculture report output 1.8 mln tonnes. The U.S. Report forecast change 1987. Indonesia import 162000 tonne sugar late 1987 boost low sugar stocks. The country 284000 hectare sugar cane farms. The agriculture ministry estimate domestic consumption 2.03 mln tonne calendar 1987. REUTER 

Japan plan liberalise farm market try narrow gap price farm product overseas Agriculture Minister Mutsuki Kato said. He told reporter move aim deflect criticism Japanese protectionism agricultural goods. But Kato plan start bilateral trade talk United States rice Japan's staple food. Washington call Tokyo's rice policy extreme example protectionism demand access U.S. Growers Japanese market. This close import except emergency. Kato Japanese farmer "shed blood" relieve dangerous international farm trade. His comment precede meeting July 1 2 Rice Price Council government advisory body discus 1987 crop producer rice price. Kato welcome outcome week's recent summit leader lead industrialise democracy Venice farm trade talk Organisation Economic Cooperation Development (OECD) May. Ministers conference agree long-term cut subsidy worldwide Kato said. Kato Japan country protect producers. He United States spends 25.8 billion dlrs support producer price export enhancement EC 21.7 billion Japan spends 2.9 billion. He Japan provide world's high level subsidy acre subsidy farm time low United States. Expressing concern grow protectionist move U.S. Congress Japan effort prevent farm trade issue country become factor increase protectionism United States. Japan United States hold panel discussion General Agreement Tariffs Trade Japan's import restriction 12 farm items. Bilateral talk beef citrus trade period April due start autumn. REUTER 

Parliament approve proposal drop control capital outflow raise prospect Taiwan's vast resevoir foreign exchange flow economy. A government spokesman law promulgate President Chiang Ching-Kuo 10 day financial authority empower lift control currency outflow time. Tight restriction capital inflow introduce remain spokesman said. Central Bank Governor Chang Chi-Cheng control lift month August. The central bank finance ministry propose lift currency restriction reduce Taiwan's foreign exchange reserve stand 60 billion U.S. Dlrs lead runaway growth money supply. The reserve world's third large Japan West Germany draw attention Taiwan's huge trade surplus government fear make island target U.S. Trade protectionism. The surplus rise 34 pct record 7.32 billion U.S. Dlrs five month 90 pct United States. Money supply rise seasonally adjust 51.9 pct end-April raise fear high inflation. Local banker economist control lift businessmen allow buy foreign currency invest freely overseas. But warn expectation sudden outflow capital. "I don't we're bang" John Brinsden Taiwan manager Standard Chartered Bank told Reuters recent interview. Bankers businessmen hold vast quantity foreign exchange overseas freely buying export currency flourish black-market. "Obviously outflow fund ... But I don't it's much" Danny Chan director Fidelity Securities Investment Consulting Corp. Economists success plan encourage capital outflow depend whether central bank slow rise local currency. The Taiwan dollar risen 23 pct U.S. Dollar September 1983 prompt inflow speculative money. It rise Taiwan cent close 31.08. The government spokesman law empower authority permanently lift capital control proposal reimpose approval parliament. Many economist believe control lift impossible reimpose them. REUTER 

There merger major European zinc smelter decade Christian Bue Executive Vice President (commercial) SMM Penarroya France said. Speaking Metal Bulletin base metal conference Bue expect current talk five smelter include Penarroya result integration company 1990. The five company SMM Penarroya Outokumpu Oy Preussag Ag Ste de la Vieille Montagne Boliden Ore Metals AB 22 pct market Bue added. "We alternative integrate business trading bloc survive cut-throat price competition trend forward integration mining companies" Bue said. "It mean five company involve talk integrate together. It quite likely preferable European smelter form integrate blocs. "In able negotiate concentrate supplier metal buyer other" Bue added. In past production overcapacity intense competition European zinc smelter meant weak negotiate position buying concentrate weaker sell metal Bue noted. Although apparently easy solution simply shut excess capacity burden individual company heavy expect volunteer added. Another risky solution invest heavily modern low cost facility said. "My answer suggestion individual company invest surely die invest survive " Bue said. "The real option integration rationalization stabilization. We alternative " added. Bue European smelter completely dissatisfied tradition pricing concentrate metal US dollar suggest move either basket world's major currency pricing European currency unit (Ecus) protect exchange rate volatility. Bue's view integration European smelter met approval conference audience comprise representative world's major mining smelt trading company mining representative somewhat sceptical view industry's move towards integration smelters. However concentrate trader express worry position metal industry move trading blocs. The currency basket suggestion cropped constantly matter change near future. REUTER 

U.S. housing start fell 2.7 pct May seasonally adjust annual rate 1620000 unit Commerce Department said. In April housing start fell revise 3.8 pct 1665000 units. The department previously fell 2.9 pct. The rate permit issue future construction fell May 7.6 pct seasonally adjust 1477000 unit fall 7.0 pct 1598000 unit April. The department May housing start low annual rate December 1984 start seasonally adjust 1612000 units. The permit total low month March 1983 1475000 permit issued. Before seasonal adjustment May housing start fell 159600 unit 161600 unit April. Permits adjustment fell 134800 unit May 157000 April. The department single-family housing start fell May 7.6 pct 1129000 unit 1222000 unit April. The May decline follow slight 0.9 pct rise single-family start April. Starts multi-family unit rise 10.8 pct May 491000 unit decline April 14.6 pct 443000 units. Permits single-family home May 5.0 pct seasonally adjust annual rate 1005000 unit 1058000 unit April. The decline follow 8.0 pct drop single-family permit April. Permits multi-family unit fell May 12.6 pct seasonally adjust annual rate 472000 unit 540000 unit April. The May decline 5.1 pct drop seasonally adjust annual rate permit multi-family unit April. Reuter 

The EC Commission propose modify plan tax marine vegetable oil fat revise 1987/88 farm price proposal official document detail proposal shows. The document available journalist say commission proposes tax start level originally propose vegetable oil October 1. However tax marine oil fat cut 50 pct originally envisage level document said. In addition Commission proposes level tax expect start 330 Ecus tonne review month annually. Diplomatic source change proposal fish oil appear attempt overcome objection tax Portugal Spain major fishing nations. Other country oppose tax include Britain West Germany Denmark. The proposal retain Commission's original plan sectors. However mark Commission's recognition cannot proposal reduce period intervention cereal diplomat said. Instead Commission proposes cut monthly increment apply cereal November May period intervention 2.7 Ecus tonne durum wheat Ecus tonne cereals. The document show Commission change green currency proposal heavy opposition notably West Germany. West German Dutch positive monetary compensatory amount (MCAs) immediately cut 0.5 point far cut begin 1988/89 season. The Commission originally propose complete dismantle positive MCAs. For country Commission make follow proposal dismantle negative MCAs Denmark Benelux - reduction 1.5 point animal product point crops. France Ireland - proposal unchanged except extra 1.5 cut beef. Italy - dismantle MCAs except create January 12. Britain - five cut product 6.5 point beef. Greece Spain Portugal - product dismantle seven 14 5.5 point respectively. Reuter 

Citibank Ltd low Australian prime rate 16 pct 16.5 effective tomorrow. The rate unmatched bank low Australian trading banks. Other prime range 16.25 17.5 pct. Australian prime rate retreat recent peak 19 pct October line decline money market levels. Citibank reduction reflect decline. REUTER 

China move stabilise price tungsten fluctuate price affected country's export earnings China Daily said. The paper quote industry official say fix export price basis market stop smuggle encourage producer reduce exports. Current price range 49 55 dlrs tonne unit China suffer heavy loss price slump 39 dlrs earlier said. Some 45 pct tungsten export China country import high-grade tungsten products. REUTER 

Australia's Ansett Airlines> exercise option acquire 20 pct America West Airlines Inc AWAL.O> 31.5 mln U.S. Dlrs Ansett Transport Industries Ltd> manage director Peter Abeles said. Exercise involve purchase mln America West share 10.50 U.S. Dlrs schedule finalise July August statement. Abeles Ansett large single shareholder fast grow airline United States. America West base Phoenix Arizona. Under term option agreement Ansett maintain 20 pct position event future stock sale beyond 20 pct unless request America West Abeles said. America West retain refusal Ansett offer share sale. In addition Ansett gain board seat said. Ansett Transport Industries wholly own Ansett Airlines Australia's major domestic airline turn own 50/50 Abeles' international transport TNT Ltd TNTA.S> Rupert Murdoch's News Corp Ltd NCPA.S>. REUTER 

Treasurer Paul Keating opposition's tax-cutting policy key issue run July 11 election miscalculation severely damage Australian economy. Opposition leader John Howard dispute Keating's allegations. "Keating engage desperate ditch panic attempt deny long-suffering Australian taxpayer cut entitled" said. Keating radio interview error Howard's plan include "double counting" increase budget deficit push rate above 20 pct. Keating Treasury official study Howard's plan conclude propose tax spending cut result nine billion dlr deficit damage international market confidence Australia. In mini-budget May 13 Keating budget deficit end June 1988 billion dlrs. Howard conservative government leadership reduce 55 pct top personal company tax level 38 pct fund reduction cut government spending. Keating Prime Minister Bob Hawke promise increase tax impose one reject tax cuts. Instead call wage economic restraint overcome balance payment foreign debt problems. Inflation decline 9.4 pct March 31 annual 9.8 pct December quarter. Hawke inflation fall six pct middle year. Australian bank lending rate customer drop 16.5 pct 19 pct nine month ago. REUTER 

Aides South Korea's President Chun Doo Hwan urge reopen talk electoral reform defuse nationwide political turmoil radio said. It ruling party official tell Chun consider reverse April 13 decision shelve debate reform 1988 Seoul Olympics. Ruling Democratic Justice Party executive met draw propose package measures. These include resume talk release political detainee lift arrest top dissident Kim Dae-jung radio said. REUTER 

New foreign shipbuilding order receive Japanese yard May fell five vessel total 188900 gross ton (gt) eight ship 314000 gt April ship 104500 gt earlier Japan Ship Exporters Association said. The backlog order end-May 122 ship 3.70 mln gt 125 ship 3.73 mln end-April 233 ship 5.99 mln ago association official said. The shipping recession yen's appreciation dollar depressed May order said. REUTER 

First City Bancorp Texas Inc FBT> talk party previously announce effort bolster capital position. The statement issue yesterday close bank merger recapitalisation program. "Several party express work First City" said. "This exploration process complete therefore premature speculate alternative First City pursue." First City "sufficient time" solution financing problem statement added. A spokesman statement response recent inquiry First City's progress strengthen weak capital position. Its problem cause slump Texas real estate oil prices. First City lose record 402 mln dlrs 1986 quarter loss 44.5 mln dlrs. The bank earlier predict small loss 1987. Banking analyst First City unlikely attract suitor unless federal regulator offer buyout assistance. The company's stock yesterday close 2-3/4 1/4. REUTER 

Secretary State George Shultz U.S. Would erase foreign trade deficit faster predict consequence trade partner traumatic. "The U.S. Economy inevitably adjustment necessary move deficit surplus trade balance service grow foreign debt" told conference attend six Association Southeast Asian Nations lead Western friends. "In view happen rapidly observer predict." "The universal strategy aggressive export-led growth become effective" Shultz said. "It arithmetically country net exporter time. The U.S. Deficit decry everyone's export-led strategy growth gone." "The huge surplus Japan (West) Germany fed deficit possibly traumatic experience" added. "While keep pressure eschew protectionist policy act too" Shultz said. "I job convincing Congress leave import trading partner door wider" told include representative Australia Canada Japan New Zealand European Community. REUTER 

Barclays Plc BCS.L> expect global traveller cheque industry grow six pct five 10 despite grow competition credit card divisional manager K.S. Nicklin said. He bank expect size market increase 39 40 billion dlrs 1987 37 38 billion 1986 worldwide economic recovery. He China Gulf South America Japan area growth. Middle-income group U.S. And Canada continue traveller cheque overseas trip credit cards. REUTER 

Aegon NV issue 100 mln dlr eurobond due July 23 1990 pay 8-1/4 pct price 101 pct lead manager Goldman Sachs International Corp said. The non-callable bond available denomination 5000 dlrs expect list Amsterdam. The sell concession pct management underwriting combine pay 3/8 pct. The payment date July 23. REUTER 

Japanese vehicle export fell 9.3 pct May earlier 531253 mainly low export U.S. Industry source said. This compare 633869 April. Official figure announce Japan Automobile Manufacturers Association month. May export include 374482 passenger car 9.9 pct earlier 156771 commercial vehicle 4.3 pct source said. But vehicle kit export rise 31.3 pct 154711 compare 146610 April. May export kit part include 115847 car 35 pct earlier 38864 commercial vehicle 21.4 pct industry source said. Japan's car production May fell 11 pct earlier 574921 commercial vehicle output fell 4.8 pct 335460 car kit output rise 29.7 pct earlier 106396 commercial vehicle kit production rise 34.7 pct 35128 said. REUTER 

The Supreme Council United Arab Emirates (UAE) reject overthrow ruler emirate Sharjah Emirates news agency WAM reported. The UAE plunge constitutional crisis yesterday ruling Sharjah ruler Sheikh Sultan bin Mohammed al-Qassimi abdicate favour brother financial mismanagement. The Council high federal authority UAE comprise ruler seven emirate internal affair individual diplomatic source said. The Supreme Council met emergency session representative Sharjah chairmanship UAE President Sheikh Zaid bin Sultan al-Nahayan WAM said. It decide ignore statement issue Sharjah continue meeting issue resolve agency added. The Qatar news agency Sheikh Sultan Dubai fly private visit London. The emirate Dubai reject Sharjah explanation Sheikh Sultan oust force. It unacceptable call reinstatement. The UAE form 1971. REUTER 

Marubeni Corp MART.T> Japan picked undertake telecommunication project worth 985 mln rupee Sri Lankan cabinet statement. It Marubeni select five Japanese competitor project involves lay telecommunication cable outskirt Colombo. Japan financing project. REUTER 

Dairy Farm International Holdings Ltd> statement make tender offer 22 pct Kwik Save Discount Group Plc KWIK.L> Britain total 146.6 mln stg. Dairy Farm offer buy 32.58 mln Kwik Save share 4.50 stg each. The offer bring Dairy Farm's stake Kwik Save 25 pct 3.5 pct 5.25 mln shares. The offer begin Monday end June 30 require share tender bring stake 15 pct. Dairy Farm finance acquisition place 89 mln share affiliate Jardine Strategic Holdings Ltd JARS.HK> 5.10 H.K. Dlrs total 454 mln dlrs. The placement raise Jardine Strategic's stake Dairy Farm 39.75 pct current 35.3 pct. It Kwik Save purchase finance loan Hongkong Shanghai Banking Corp HKBH.HK>. It size loan raise net bank borrowing maximum 2.2 billion H.K. Dlrs. Dairy Farm reduce bank borrowing proceeds previously announce sale office building Sydney 625 mln dlrs. It consider raise additional capital probably placement convertible preference share Euromarket added. Company chairman Simon Keswick U.K. Market "offers attractive opportunity competitively price food retailers" "a strategic investment Kwik Save offer vehicle pursue opportunities." REUTER 

Singapore Petroleum Co Pte Ltd raise post price product June 19 cent/gallon lpg naphtha gasoline cent gas oil 60 cents/barrel marine diesel oil. New price - lpg 36.0 cents/gallon chemical naphtha 47 unleaded reformate 65.8 0.4 gm lead 97 octane 61.3 95 octane 59.3 92 octane 55.5 85 octane 49.5 0.125 gm lead 97 octane 64.3 92 octane 58.5 85 octane 52.5 jet kerosene 51.5 kerosene 50.5 premium kerosene 54.5 dual purpose kerosene 52.5 0.5 pct sulphur gas oil 52.0 pct sulphur 51.0 marine diesel oil 21.20 dlrs/barrel. REUTER 

Six month end April 30 Parent shr 1.66 yen v 7.28 Div 3.50 yen v Net 1.59 billion v 6.88 billion Current 5.03 billion v 16.03 billion Sales 804.02 billion v 839.20 billion Oustanding shrs 955.00 mln v 944.15 mln REUTER 

Japanese compound feed output rise 2.3 pct 25.80 mln tonne 1986/87 end March 31 25.23 mln earlier Agriculture Ministry said. The marginal rise reflect slight growth demand poultry raise moderate increase demand beef cattle raise Ministry official said. Compound feed sale total 26.01 mln tonne 1986/87 25.40 mln ago end-March stock 217554 tonne 224101. Corn feed output 1986/87 rise 11.71 mln tonne 11.02 mln earlier due low import prices. The official corn import rise surplus yen's strength dollar reduce Chicago prices. The corn compound ratio rise 45.2 pct 1986/87 43.4 pct earlier. Sorghum rise marginally 4.80 mln tonne 1986/87 4.79 mln compound ratio fell 18.5 pct 18.9 pct great corn use. Higher import price due poor harvest major produce nation Argentina feed maker reluctant sorghum. Soybean meal fell 2.58 mln tonne 2.63 mln compound ratio decline 10.0 pct 10.3 pct. The drop soybean meal consumption result increase cheaper rapeseed meal official said. Rapeseed consumption 1986/87 563889 tonne 528152 earlier. The compound ratio rise 2.2 pct 2.1 pct. REUTER 

six month March 31 Shr 16.25p v 15.61p Div 4.0p v 3.5p Turnover 6.12 billion v 4.89 billion Interest 25.2 mln v 37.6 mln Pretax profit 42.7 mln v 40.3 mln Tax 10.3 mln v 9.9 mln Minorities 1.3 mln v 439000 Extraordinary item 2.6 mln credit v 1.2 mln debit Note - company name S W Berisford Plc BRFD.L> REUTER 

Parliament pass law allow state-owned industrial company sell 49 pct share staff private investor official BSS news agency said. Under law pass yesterday 51 pct share affected company held government 34 pct 15 pct staff. The law allows worker nominate member board director buy 12 pct company's shares. Bangladesh return 500 industrial company private ownership March 1982. REUTER 

South African year-on-year broadly define M-3 money supply growth revise upward 10.37 pct April preliminary 10.08 pct revise 10.69 pct March Reserve Bank figure show. M-3 rise revise 82.38 billion rand April preliminary 82.17 billion March's revise 81.39 billion. In April M-3 stood 74.64 billion rand. Preliminary figure May show M-3 83.24 billion rand year-on-year rise 10.97 pct 75.01 billion May 1986. April M-1A rise year-on-year 15.12 pct 14.22 billion rand rise 14.72 pct 13.97 billion March M1 rise 24.49 pct 27.92 billion 20.69 pct increase 26.97 billion figure showed. M-2 rise 8.28 pct 58.71 billion April rise 6.47 pct 57.52 billion March. REUTER 

The Commonwealth Bank Australia low reference rate loan 15.75 pct 16.25 pct overdraft reference rate 16.25 pct 16.75 effective June 24. Bank official bank regard overdraft reference rate base short-term rate trend key prime lending rate corporate customers. The loan reference rate base longer term trends. The bank late cut prime rate recent day follow continue decline market rates. Other prime rate range 16 pct 17.5 pct. REUTER 

The Australian government support principle production platinum silver bullion coin Perth Mint Treasurer Paul Keating said. This follow success Australian Nugget gold bullion coin launch statement. He Australian nugget coin legal tender. The platinum coin weight silver coin ounce weight. He detailed arrangement issue finalise talk Federal authority Western Australian government owner Perth Mint. REUTER 

South Korea's gross product (GNP) exceed 10 pct real growth won rise far current account surplus continue widen Deputy Prime Minister Chun In-Yong told reporters. Chung Minister Economic Planning GNP estimate base assumption economy remain stable. The official target 1987 GNP growth eight pct. GNP rise 15.6 pct quarter 1987 1986 accord provisional Bank Korea figures. GNP rise 12.5 pct calendar 1986. In month current account swung surplus 2.5 billion dlrs deficit 294 mln dlrs 1986 period. "What Minister imply major economic policy change" Ministry spokesman told Reuters. "But try urge circle prepare forseeable economic (future) ... A won era." South Korean manufacturer insist won rise seven pct plan ask government slow appreciation dollar. The Bank Korea quote won unchanged 812.05 dollar 6.02 pct gain compare 3.34 pct increase 1986. The won strengthen 6.60 won dollar day earlier month International Monetary Fund team held talk discus revaluation. REUTER 

The New Zealand government forecasting budget surplus 379 mln N.Z. Dlrs end March 1988 Finance Minister Roger Douglas statement. This compare deficit 1.95 billion dlrs end March 1987 1.87 billion dlr deficit earlier. Total expenditure see 22.907 billion dlrs 20.94 billion end-March 1987. Total revenue see 23.29 billion dlrs 18.992 billion. The forecast rise revenue come partly 10 pct value add good service Tax (GST) introduce October 1986 see bring 4.1 billion dlrs 1.23 billion earlier. Other indirect taxation see rise 3.1 billion dlrs 2.2 billion. Company tax forecast bring 2.39 billion dlrs 1.22 billion earlier tax individual see little change 10.7 billion dlrs 10.9 billion. Excluding revenue expenditure capital nature repayment loan state-owned enterprise revenue asset sale budget indicate deficit 1.27 billion dlrs Douglas Using "financial deficit" method deficit March 1987 1.89 billion dlrs said. Douglas use method financial deficit forecast 1987/88 measure 2.2 pct gross domestic product 6.9 pct earlier. REUTER 

Australian crude oil condensate output fell 7.6 pct 23480 megalitres 147 mln barrel nine month fiscal 1986/87 end June 30 Department Resources Energy said. The decline production nine month end-March reflect mainly sharp dip fiscal low oil price marginal excise rate lead reduction output Bass Strait department figure Major Energy Statistics publication show. A megalitre 6290 barrels. REUTER 

New Zealand repay portion 42.48 billion N.Z. Dlr debt 1952 result 379 mln N.Z. Dlr budget surplus fiscal March 1988 Finance Minister Roger Douglas said. Douglas budget statement surplus achieve New Zealand 35 years. It compare 1.95 billion dlr deficit fiscal 1987. Douglas year's government bond tender adjust surplus provide repayment 600 mln dlrs New Zealand's 21.74 billion dlrs overseas debt. Details loan repaid decided. Douglas scale debt massive. "It reduce debt acceptable level" said. REUTER 

Year end-March Shr 20.9p 22.3 pct rise Div 5.1p make 8.45p v v 7.5p Turnover 9.42 billion 12.4 pct increase Operating profit 2.35 billion 10.9 pct increase Pretax profit 2.07 billion 11.7 pct rise Fourth quarter 1987 Turnover 2.42 billion 8.4 pct rise Operating profit 629.0 mln 12.1 pct increase Pretax profit 555.0 mln 11.7 pct rise. REUTER 

Austria's current account surplus grow 11.0 billion schilling month 8.2 billion period National Bank said. In April current account record deficit 300 mln schilling compare 800 mln surplus March 800 mln deficit April 1986 bank statement. The trade deficit month fell 16.4 billion schilling 17.5 billion period April deficit 4.1 billion compare 6.9 billion March 3.6 billion April 1986. REUTER 

Year March 31 Fin div 3.5p make 5.5p v 2.5p Shr 25.2p v 14.7p Pretax profit 50.5 mln stg v 30.1 mln Net tax 36.0 mln v 21.6 mln Turnover 1.22 billion v 1.16 billion Extraordinary dbt 10.3 mln v 8.2 mln Note - Full company name Johnson-Matthey Plc>. REUTER 

A forecast 379 mln N.Z. Dlr surplus government's 1987/88 budget allow significant reduction government debt Finance Minister Roger Douglas statement. "There reason maintain high borrowing Budget number require" said. The government borrow far 950 mln dlrs fiscal far 1.75 billion originally planned. "The amount foreign currency debt generate previous economic mismanagement large" Douglas said. "It sensible present opportunity repay debt respect domestic debt." The government keep domestic borrowing keep secondary market efficient said. That government borrowing term future added. Douglas revise debt meant government able retire 650 mln dlrs domestic debt 600 mln dlrs foreign debt. REUTER 

S W Berisford Plc BRFD.L> six pct rise pretax profit 42.7 mln stg half maintain year's momentum despite poor commodity trading condition continued rationalisation costs. Its British Sugar Corp Plc unit produce performance due great efficiency sell price course record full profits. In Berisford attempt sell unit attract bids. A bid Hillsdown Holdings Plc HLDN.L> abandon Tate Lyle Plc TATL.L> officially block sale BSC Gruppo Ferruzzi> prevented. It authorise far 46 mln stg capital expenditure BSC eight mln high anticipate total year. Berisford particularly pleased progress associate Hunter Saphir Plc acquire substantial equity stake January return sale food manufacturing companies. Since deal complete market value stake Hunter double enable concentrate effort food division ingredient -- mainly sugar gelatine flavours. The property division maintain growth financial service satisfactory contribution profits. However result industrial division continued disappoint rationalisation programme progress well. Commodity operation return profit half loss year. The result reflect dull market condition coffee trading fail repeat year's exceptional half performance due extremely difficult condition markets. It reduce exposure volatility commodity earnings concentrate small range key commodities. Berisford share firm penny announcement 366p. REUTER 

Members Bull Moose coke coal mine British Columbia Canada agree cut base price charge Japanese steelmaker 91.77 Canadian dlrs tonne FOB April 1 14 dlrs 1986/87 official company involve deal said. The Nippon Kokan KK NKKT.T> official cut agree five month talk Teck Corp> Rornex Mining Corp Ltd> Nissho Iwai Coal Development (Canada) Ltd>. He Japanese continue ask miner improve quality Bull Moose coal's ash specification. Japanese steel mill Canadian exporter include seller Bull Moose coal round negotiation coke coal base price industry source said. The Japanese steel firm start round base price talk Quintette Coals Ltd> yesterday discussion Gregg River Co Ltd> held month said. Nissho Iwai Coal unit Nissho Iwai Corp> Japan. REUTER 

The Bank Japan sell tomorrow 200 billion yen financing bill 35-day repurchase agreement mature July 24 mop project money market surplus money trader said. The yield bill sale bank security house money house 3.6005 today's one-month commercial bill discount rate 3.5625 pct one-month certificate deposit rate 3.98/86 pct. Traders estimate 300 billion yen surplus due tax allocation local government entities. The operation outstanding bill supply 2000 billion yen. REUTER 

Sweden's Volvo AB VOLV ST> B-Free share list Zurich Basle Geneva bourse autumn. The company statement listing far expand international bourse Volvo share quoted. It already quote stock exchange Sweden Britain West Germany France Belgium Norway Tokyo share trade over-the-counter United States. "Switzerland attracts international capital markets" Lennart Jeansson Volvo board said. A Swiss bank consortium lead Credit Suisse carry secondary placement 500000 B-Free Volvo share Swiss market preparation Volvo's autumn entry onto bourse Volvo said. REUTER 

Dairy Farm International Holdings Ltd> obtain 1.2 billion H.K. Dlr loan Hongkong Shanghai Banking Corp finance tender offer 22 pct stake Kwik Save Discount Group Plc KWIK> Dairy Farm chairman Simon Keswick told reporters. He disclose term loan "fairly fair." Dairy Farm earlier statement offer buy 32.58 mln Kwik Save share 4.50 stg raise stake retail firm 25 pct 3.5 pct now. Keswick Dairy Farm want obtain 15 pct Kwik Save Kwik Save's big shareholder otherwise dispose entire stake. Kwik Save open 4.45 stg yesterday's 3.90 stg close. REUTER 

The New Zealand Government sell 25 pct state-owned Air New Zealand Ltd> Civil Aviation minister Richard Prebble said. Prebble statement government appoint adviser decide share sell timing sale price. "Clearly gauge effect propose share issue enter market opportunity" Prebble said. "We particular rush sell share Air New Zealand" said. "Our aim maximise benefit taxpayer. If mean wait it" Prebble said. He Air New Zealand expect release result soon March 31 1987. He confident post excellent profit. Prebble Air New Zealand successful ability prosper future hamper wholly-government-owned status. Prebble access source capital increase ability expand develop. This sale announcement follow float March 13 pct Bank New Zealand Ltd>. The government float capital state-owned operation include DFC New Zealand Ltd> formerly Development Finance Corp New Zealand Ltd Petroleum Corp New Zealand Ltd. REUTER 

Alcan Australia Ltd AL.S> seek 100 mln U.S. Dlr eight underwritten note issuance facility Swiss Bank Corporation International Ltd arranger. The facility allows bank option withdraw five months' notice involves issuance tender panel note maturity six months. The maximum yield 20 basis point London Interbank Offered Rates (LIBOR) 3/16 pct underwriting fee regardless utilisation. Alcan Australia indirectly 70 pct own Alcan Aluminium Ltd Canada. REUTER 

The Finance Ministry put finish touch roughly 2000 billion yen supplementary budget 1987/88 start turn attention year's main budget ministry official said. The supplementary budget design finance 6000 billion yen emergency economic package government unveiled month boost domestic demand. Ministry official government issue 1300 billion yen construction bond pay increase investment emergency package. The rest supplementary budget finance 450 billion yen proceeds year's sale share Nippon Telegraph Telephone Corp (NTT) high expect 1986/87 tax revenue official said. One official carry-over tax revenue 1987/88 fiscal April 1 1000 billion yen. Soaring land share price boost receipt especially security land taxes. With half carry-over likely current supplementary budget rest available supplementary budget expect year. The supplementary budget finance government's wage bill know wage talk official said. The government finance tax cut 1000 billion yen promise emergency package contain supplementary budget due present parliament month. The Finance Ministry's budget bureau hop tax carry-over high expect revenue finance supplementary budget said. Officials Finance Ministry issue deficit-financing bond extra proceeds year's NTT share sale fund supplementary budget. Besides supplementary budget government intend introduce tax reform bill parliament upcoming extraordinary session official said. The government force abandon tax reform bill due strong opposition plan introduce five pct sale tax. The sale tax design finance cut individual corporate income taxes. The bill 1000 billion yen-plus tax cut contain emergency package step overhaul country's tax official said. It contain controversial plan phase tax break saving effect October originally plan said. Looking ahead year's main budget Finance Ministry begin debate whether abandon so-called minus ceiling investment. That policy call government department cut investment spending five pct year. Economic Planning Minister Tetsuo Kondo recently policy suspend 1988/89 pending recommendation government's administrative reform council. The ruling Liberal Democratic Party April budget request guideline invesment expenditure reviewed. But official Finance Ministry's budget bureau hopeful policy retained. They fear suspension guideline investment lead increase pressure government loosen grip current expenditure well. The account extend interest-free loan profitable work project developed conjunction private sector official said. In Finance Ministry meet grow pressure boost capital spending maintain tight grip outlay government departments. Surplus fund year's sale NTT share total 3000 billion yen. Based current market price plan sale 1.95 mln share raise 5000 billion yen compare 2000 billion plan main 1987/88 budget. REUTER 

South African year-on-year producer price inflation rise 16.1 pct April 15.8 pct March Central Statistics Office figure show. The item index (base 1980) rise monthly 1.2 pct 242.5 April increase 1.1 pct 239.6 March stand 208.9 earlier. REUTER 

Finnish industrial investment rise 10 pct 1987 reach high rate 1980 Bank Finland's survey predicted. Investment centre machinery equipment rise 25 pct. There rise 20 pct investment manufacturing notable growth paper industry chemical building material consumer good sectors. The rate growth fall 1988 spending remain level survey said. Research development spending show rise billion markka represent 18 pct investment 1987. Finland's investment rate internationally share capital intensive industry relatively large. "But quicker growth Finnish industrial production indication investment promote renovation increase production capacity" survey said. Manufacturing industry capacity rate 86 pct 1987 pct above rate start year. This expect grow far said. REUTER 

BET Plc BETL.L> slightly high expect result March show strategy working. BET raise pretax profit 157.4 mln stg 124.6 mln previously. It continued build range complementary service combination organic growth carefully targetted acquisitions. A company statement confident figure provide effective springboard broadening shareholder base particularly issue American Depositary Receipts U.S. Later year. BET appoint Sir Timothy Bevan formerly chairman Barclays Plc replace Sir Hugh Dundas retires Chairman December. BET's net debt fell pct 262 mln stg gear 63 pct 65 pct. Returns asset sale capital employ show far improvement period. BET share 0907 GMT quote 291p penny firmer night's close. REUTER 

European Community farm minister plunge bloc crisis end marathon negotiation 1987/88 farm price agreement. Their chairman Belgian Paul de Keersmaeker told press conference morning minister give majority vote favour aspect EC Commission compromise proposal introduce Tuesday. However minority crucial plan tax vegetable marine oil fat block adoption British Agriculture Minister John MacGregor aspect proposal likely vetoed. MacGregor meeting founder implicit indication West Germans prepared veto aspect package future monetary compensatory amount proposal directly connect common prices. De Keersmaeker consider minister call far talk diplomat outcome meeting make major outstanding issue refer EC head government hold summit meeting June 29 30 Brussels. A Commission official Commission stopgap measure bring July 1 deadlock persists. These concern product cereal colza sugar beef milk otherwise legal EC regulation date. Trade source expect include seven pct cut guaranteed price cereals. The official measure "will account situation market EC's severe budgetary situation." The Commission expect EC budget deficit six billion dlrs present compromise cost billion more. It estimate oil fat tax bring 2.3 billion dlrs full year. Diplomats Britain West Germany Netherlands maintain opposition tax despite Commission attempt persuade unfairly hit export country outside EC. They add Denmark formally final position understood remain against. REUTER 

Finance Minister Roger Douglas New Zealand enact legislation prevent local company individual use overseas tax havens. The government outlaw practice double deduction loss dual resident company know "double dipping" Douglas budget statement. The anti-tax-haven legislation affect non-resident entity company trust low tax country earn mainly passive investment income Douglas said. A consultative document release September explain propose legislation consultative committee receive submission advise government implementation Douglas said. The legislation attack tax avoidance genuine activity added. He New Zealand resident avoid New Zealand tax entirely set non-resident entity tax haven intercept gather income taxable New Zealand. In move counter "double dipping" government longer allow dual resident company loss Douglas said. The propose legislation require carry tax loss forward offset future profit effective income start December 17 1986. REUTER 

Year March 31 Final dividend 3.65p v 3.1p make 5.4p v 4.6p Share 14.11p v 12.13p Pre-tax profit 27.11 mln stg v 24.06 mln Net profit 18.12 mln v 15.21 mln Turnover 252.11 mln v 225.29 mln Note - London International Group Plc LONL.L> sharply increase sale condom lead particularly strong start considerable confidence future. REUTER 

The state-owned Industrial Development Bank India (IDBI) Morgan Guaranty Ltd Hong Kong> mandate arrange 10 billion yen loan Japan senior IDBI official told Reuters. The 15-year loan sign month carry pegged Japanese long-term prime rate five pct annum official decline named. The loan IDBI's foreign currency borrowing financial begin July 1 1987 specify IDBI's total targetted borrowing year. IDBI raise 85 mln dlrs Euroloans 100 mln Swiss Francs 1986/87 enter Japanese market 1984/85 raise loan five billion yen follow 10 billion Euroyen loan year. IDBI lends foreign currency fund local industrial borrower import capital goods. Bankers Industrial Credit Investment Corp India India's private sector financial institution hold talk foreign bank arrange loan 10 billion yen. They India's commercial borrowing 1987/88 remain 1986/87 level 1.5 billion dlrs. REUTER 

Finance Minister Roger Douglas government introduce full tax imputation dividend effective 1988/89 income year. Confirming government's timetable imputation announce earlier budget Douglas statement substantially reduce influence tax companies' financial policy investment strategies. REUTER 

Toyota Motor Corp TOYO.T> Nissan Motor Co Ltd NSAN.T> May vehicle export fell earlier mainly due yen rise dollar. Toyota's export fell 9.5 pct earlier 161266 vehicle May Nissan's fell 17.6 pct 100221. Toyota's export U.S. Fell 13.9 pct earlier 90096 May Europe fell 2.8 pct earlier 34876. Nissan's export U.S. Fell 25.4 pct 53604 Europe rise 0.7 pct 29721. REUTER 

Toshiba Corp TSBA.T> Sharp Corp SHRP.T> decide maintain export lap-top personal computer European Community (EC) year's level despite halt shipment U.S. Company spokesman told Reuters. They voluntary restraint aim avert EC sanction urge European computer makers. The Europeans fear Japanese personal computer flood EC market Washington impose 100 pct tariff April. Toshiba Sharp together control 40 pct personal computer market EC Sharp spokesman said. Toshiba export T1100 T3100 lap-top computer continue 5000 unit month being. Sharp export EC PC 7000 series lap-top personal computer continue year's level 12000 16000 unit year. Washington impose tariff Japan's allege failure uphold 1986 agreement semiconductor trade. REUTER 

The Belgian National Bank cut month treasury certificate rate 0.10 point effective immediately. The cut month rate 6.75 pct month rate 6.80 pct key month rate 6.85 pct central bank telex. A National Bank spokesman modest cut decline domestic money market rate yesterday expect follow cut 7.60 pct discount rate. The short-term treasury certificate rate especially three-month rate National Bank's main monetary policy instrument years. The discount rate market's penalty rate guide rate 1985 advance currently little liquidity ample bank economist said. The bank cut one- three-month certificate rate June 5 0.10 points. REUTER 

Aramco Corp> accepted Japanese nomination lift high proportion Arab Heavy crude oil term contract July oil industry source said. Japanese company request ratio 80 pct Arab Heavy 20 pct Arab Light term contract agreement Aramco 100000 barrel source said. The contractual ratio 30 pct heavy crude 70 pct light. Japanese demand heavy crude oil increase substantially All Japan Seaman's Union cease sail northern Mideast gulf month cause problem liftings heavy Kuwait Khafji crudes. REUTER 

Tehran Radio Iranian diplomat London return weeks. The report monitor British Broadcasting Corp follow announcement Foreign Office London Britain withdrawn six remain diplomat Tehran. They late move diplomatic row country start arrest Iranian consular official England follow abduction British envoy Tehran freed. REUTER 

Indonesia's oil company Pertamina inform affiliate Japanese company crude oil supply 40 pct contractual volume July spokesman affiliate company said. He allocation line Indonesia's production ceiling current OPEC quota increase OPEC ratifies production rise week. Allocations Indonesia's main trade crude Minas cut 50 pct Duri 38 pct said. Last month contractual volume cut 30 pct. Contractual volume assume production ceiling. Oil trader Indonesian grade already trading above official sell price (osp) spot market due strong demand Japan U.S. And tight supplies. A cargo Duri load July reportedly trade yesterday 70 cent osp 15.60 dlrs barrel Minas trading 20 cent high said. REUTER 

Vietnam's parliament sack Prime Minister Pham Van Dong President Truong Chinh choice successor indicate influence guard diplomatic source said. Dong prime minister 32 left fading health age 81. He popular hero war France United States staunch ally Soviet Union. Parliament replace second-ranked politburo member Pham Hung 74 Vietnam News Agency said. Hung head Viet Cong guerrilla Vietnam War. Diplomats Bangkok Hung note supporter economic political reform widely tipped presidency. That post instead Vo Chi Cong technocrat rank third politburo. Diplomatic source Cong tune economic political change push reformist apparently gain upper all-important politburo December. Chinh hardline Marxist veteran war France U.S. Was oust age 80. His political stance recently soften source said. REUTER 

Mazda Motor Corp MAZT.T> predict parent company current profit 10 billion yen end October 31 1987 50.8 pct earlier assume yen/dollar value 147 yen vice president Yoshihiro Wada told press conference. Sales 1986/87 estimate 1640 billion yen 0.9 pct earlier. The company earlier post parent net profit 1.59 billion half end April 30 76.9 pct earlier sale 804.02 billion 4.2 pct. The fall due yen rise dollar cut 55 billion yen sale Wada said. The average value dollar 155 yen period 190 earlier. Mazda estimate vehicle export 1.12 mln include kit part October 31 6.8 pct earlier domestic sale 360000 0.8 pct said. Kit export rise kit sell Kia Motor Corp KIAM.SE> unit Kia Industrial Corp> eight pct own Mazda Mexico unit Ford Motor Co F> rise 150000 9000 push kit export 45.3 pct 260000 said. Mazda yet decide whether pay unchanged yen dividend half pay unchanged 3.50 yen half Wada said. REUTER 

French official reserve rise 258 mln franc May 420.50 billion franc 420.24 billion April Finance Ministry said. The slight rise partly reflect repayment month France's outstanding 11.95 billion franc debt owe European Monetary Cooperation Fund (FECOM). It reflect negative 314 mln franc position France's Exchange Stabilisation Fund intervention purchase 10.6 billion franc May. Foreign currency holding fell 7.28 billion franc 124.58 billion ECU holding fell 5.55 billion franc 58.52 billion due repayment France's debt owe FECOM Stabilisation Fund operation ministry said. Claims IMF rise 1.14 billion franc 18.97 billion include 385 mln franc increase France's reserve position IMF 751 mln franc rise holding Special Drawing Rights. Gold holding unchanged 218.46 billion francs. REUTER 

The New Zealand government's sale 25 pct stake Air New Zealand release airline shackle burdensome government process manage director Norman Geary told reporters. Civil Aviation minister Richard Prebble government sell 25 pct airline public. Geary company propose sale 1984. "With company believe considerable New Zealand (in shares) hope strong private interest" said. Geary keen staff shareholding. REUTER 

Yugoslavia sign 550 mln ECU loan European Community (EC) official Tanjug news agency said. It agreement yet ratify 12 EC country European Parliament sign Brussels. The 20 7.5 pct loan complete trans-Yugoslavia motorway modernise country's railway network agency said. Yugoslavia's request 100 mln ECU grant refuse EC discuss Tanjug added. REUTER 

The French government's privatisation late earn French State 52 billion franc date Finance Ministry said. Sources close Finance Minister Edouard Balladur revenue raise privatisation priority pay debt stood 398.2 billion 1986. The Ministry communique return include banking Societe Generale SGEN.PA> two-week flotation Monday. The government carry eight flotation private sale telephone Cie Generale de Constructions Telephoniques> (CGCT) denationalisation scheme December sell-off glass maker Saint-Gobain SGEP.PA> added. The government pledge privatise 66 state-owned industrial banking insurance company 1991. Other company sell private sector near future television network TF-1 month banking Cie Financiere de Suez FSPP.PA> autumn. The ministry TF-1's forthcoming sell-off meant third government's programme complete nine months. Balladur Sunday reject press opposition charge share price privatise company pitch low. He average premium share trading Bourse 15 30 pct offer price. This compare premium 60 80 pct similar share flotation Britain. REUTER 

Fiji sugar farmer receive interim payment 1986 crop month ahead schedule move aim get harvest drought-hit 1987 crop Governor-general Ratu Sir Penaia Ganilau said. Industry source late forecast 1987 crop indicate output 360000 tonne record 501800 tonne tel quel production 1986 (May-December) crop year. The previous record 1982 Fiji produce 486790 tonnes. For past month Fiji sugar farmer delayed harvest 1987 crop pending response Governor-general demand follow May 14 coup. Ganilau statement Fiji Sugar Corp payment five dlrs tonne final payment 1986 crop understand preparation grower commencement harvest complete mill June 23. Crushing commence Labasa Penang mill June 23 Lautoka Rarawai mill June 30 said. The interim payment June 30 full amount grower's share 1986 sugar proceeds receive to-date. The balance paid October. Growers call full 1987 forecast price 23.50 dlrs tonne cane paid cash delivery mill reject control Fiji Sugar Corp Ganilau said. However addition schedule delivery payment 14.10 dlrs additional sum 2.35 dlrs 10 pct forecast price paid December 15 cane harvest November 30 said. Ganilau "This month advance expect date payment payment cane. The balance payment six week crushing." Another demand Fiji's 22000 farmer estimate 14 mln dlr loan Fiji Development Bank (FDB) 1983 cane crop rehabilitation programme write off. The FDB reject request. Ganilau "The bank prepared carefully consider request reschedule loan repayment case hardship case-by-case basis." In response far demand soldier remove cane grow area Ganilau army restrict presence cane areas. He direct authority issue permit harvest gang cane grower sugar industry trade union hold necessary meeting preparation commencement harvest. Senior representative sugar cane grower indicate desire commence crush soon added. REUTER 

Some major Japanese institutional investor gradually return invest U.S. Treasuries fear dollar yet bottom kept cautiously wait sidelines. Trust bank investment trust start look buying treasury short-term gain investment trust insurer wary accord fund manager poll Reuters. The five percentage gap U.S. And Japanese long-term bond major attraction T-bonds. Most institution remain sensitive prospect dollar decline make huge foreign exchange loss foreign bond holding fiscal end March. The seven lead local insurer alone loss foreign bond holding 1700 billion yen 11.5 billion dlrs 1986/87 industry source said. However institutional investor buy U.S. T-bonds due absence profitable domestic instruments. "Despite negative factor definite demand U.S. Securities" Osamu Fukushima deputy manager Mitsui Trust Banking Co Ltd's security department. Another trust bank fund manager "What matter fundamental U.S. Economy competitiveness U.S. Industry. We closely watch growth U.S. Exports measure fundamental strength dollar." The U.S. Trade deficit's decline April due 1.2 billion dlr decline import export show recovery said. One insurance company fund manager "We doubt U.S. Government fight trade fiscal deficit especially announcement Federal Reserve Board chairman Paul Volcker's resignation." "The receptive stance U.S. Congress call far dollar fall cut country's trade deficit make wary U.S. Bonds purchases" insurance company fund manager said. Yuji Miyaji deputy manager Sumitomo Trust Banking Co Ltd's security investment department "We slowly start buy U.S. Bonds gap 500 basis point U.S. And Japan attractive However pessimistic dollar's far recovery. We U.S. Economic fundamental change far." Keijirou Fukushima manager Yamaichi Investment Trust Management Co Ltd's bond portfolio management department "We invest U.S. Bonds gradually improve inflation outlook limited chance far steep fall dollar now." "We already reduce forward dollar sell volume 40 pct total foreign asset 60 pct" said. Another insurance company fund manager "We start invest U.S. Treasury security trading basis." REUTER 

U.K. Unemployment fell record provisional seasonally-adjusted 64300 May total 2.95 mln 10.6 pct workforce Employment Department said. In April seasonally-adjusted unemployment fell upwardly revise 21600 3.02 mln 10.9 pct said. The unadjusted jobless total May include leaver alos fell record 121000 2.99 mln 10.8 pct April's 3.11 mln 11.2 pct. May eleventh successive decline peak summer 11.6 pct Employment Department said. "Unemployment fall mln years. The May fall 64000 large drop record kept (in 1948)" Employment Minister Norman Fowler said. All region see above average fall term unemployment past added. The adjust total unemployed below mln July 1984 unadjusted total below level June 1983. REUTER 

U.K. Average earnings rise seasonally adjust 6.5 pct end-April increase 6.7 pct annually March Employment Department said. The April index base 1980 provisional seasonally-adjusted 197.3 194.8 March. But underlie rise 7.75 pct 0.25 pct March level see late year. The underlie rise adjust factor back-pay timing variations. Unit wage cost U.K. Manufacturing industry rise pct April upward revise rise 0.7 pct period March Department Employment added. In month end-April cost 0.9 pct high year-on-year compare rise 1.2 pct month March. Manufacturing productivity April 6.1 pct high ago downward revise 6.8 pct increase March. In month period manufacturing productivity 6.7 pct have increase 6.5 pct quarter. REUTER 

Clearing bank sterling lending private sector May estimate risen underlie seasonally adjust 3.5 billion stg compare 1.3 billion stg April recent monthly average 1.4 billion Banking Information Service said. The unadjusted rise 2.77 billion stg 844 mln April. The May surge borrowing clearing bank prompt fall base rate reach nine pct May 11 Banking Information Service said. Borrowing bill finance source shrank. The increase lending May see category Banking Information Service said. In personal sector unadjusted basis mortgage lending rise 544 mln stg compare 471 mln April. General consumption 399 mln 355 mln credit card debt rise 55 mln compare 161 mln. Financial sector borrowing 734 mln stg May compare net repayment 60 mln previous month. Unadjusted private sector deposit increase 2.37 billion stg 1.16 billion. Sterling attract extra 955 mln stg deposit abroad little change April. REUTER 

A commission unravel affair debt-ridden Air Lanka say airline amass loss 265 mln U.S. Dlrs "the devastate financial tragedy" Sri Lankan commercial history. The commission scrutinise financial dealing aircraft acquisition give-away cookbook blame airline's previous board losses. The panel appoint August President Junius Jayewardene submit report April 20. A copy obtain Reuters. The report available week. The three-man commission recommend finding pass law officer decide whether penal action necessary former board Air Lanka's management. The airline come Defence Ministry portfolio held Jayewardene himself. The commission Air Lanka's report Jayewardene "blurred" true financial health. It airline irretrievably lose share capital 3.8 billion rupees. To finance deficit treasury loan 800 mln rupee foreign currency loan obtain aircraft purchase infrastructure need said. "Air Lanka indebted overseas lender value billion rupee productive asset collateral provide repayment" commission said. It airline's loss assess 5.59 billion rupee March 31 1986. But cumulative loss reach 7.7 billion imply Air Lanka lose money rate 1.3 billion rupee 1979 start 1986. "These result rank devastate financial tragedy suffer Sri Lanka's commercial history" commission said. The report airline's dangerously critical financial condition due uncontrolled spending -- particularly airline expand fleet -- poor marketing extreme laxity cost controls. "It clear Air Lanka's misfortune largely creation reponsibility rest primarily board directors" said. Air Lanka blame problem effect tourism Sri Lanka's Tamil separatist rebellion depreciate rupee under-capitalisation. The commission dismiss invalid. The report major problem stem concentration Captain S.R. Wikramanayake held post chairman manage director. "It mainly responsible whatever status Air Lanka today" said. Wikramanayake resign board November. He contact comment. The commission recommend finding pass "to law officer ... To ascertain penal action necessary former board Air Lanka management staff." The panel recommend equity involvement foreign airline Air Lanka grant maximum concession carrier attractive foreign local investment. It suggest sell asset Boeing 747s finance U.S. Dollar loan reduce debt. It Air Lanka government renegotiate U.S. Dollar-denominated debt currency form core earnings obtain low rates. It propose negotiation return Lockheed Tristar L1011-500s lease British Airways lease expire March. REUTER 

The cantonal government Zurich want propose federal law make "money laundering" offence punish negligence gross negligence cantonal information service said. The Zurich authority support proposal unveiled federal government February crime anyone conceal origin money reason believe obtain criminal means. But argue submission proposal duty care impose financial institution liable negligence. The federal government's proposal circulate comment formal bill parliament gross negligence offence. The legislation aim mainly combat organise crime likely effect 1990s. REUTER 

The joint committee Taiwan's soybean importer reopen tender tomorrow shipment 54000 66000 tonne U.S. Soybeans committee spokesman told Reuters. The committee reject tender cargo 27000 33000 tonne ground price offer U.S. Suppliers said. The committee seek far shipment 27000 33000 tonne reopens tender tomorrow added. REUTER 

Amro Bank arrange guilder multi-option facility Greenland NV loan package 300 mln guilders. The package consists 150 mln guilder five multi-option facility tender panel facility short term advance stop syndicate 0.5 pct above London Inter Bank Offered Rate (LIBOR) There 150 mln guilder seven multi-currency term facility LIBOR plus 0.375 pct LIBOR plus 0.5 pct fourth fifth LIBOR plus 0.625 pct remain years. Greenland option fix facility. Both facility commitment fee 0.125 pct. Greenland NV producer agricultural machine subsidiary Thyssen-Bornemisza Group. The firm float Amsterdam Toronto stock exchange half July. REUTER 

Honda Motor Co Ltd HMC.T> vehicle export May fell 11.4 pct earlier 54982. Honda ship 34701 vehicle U.S. In May 4.4 pct earlier total shipment North America fell 8.3 pct 39009 due increase assembly company spokeswoman said. Exports Europe fell 24.8 pct 12821 added. REUTER 

ATT/Philips (APT) joint venture American Telephone Telegraph Co T> U.S. And N.V. Philips Gloeilampenfabrieken PGLO.AS> Spanish government approve set joint venture Spain. The government award state-controlled Compania Telefonica Nacional de Espana TELF.MA> (Telefonica) APT said. APT majority stake company form Spanish firm Amper> transmission equipment Telefonica. The expect worth 30 mln dlrs year. Further negotiation Telefonica yet conclude APT spokesman said. For Philips step Spanish market company spokesman said. REUTER 

BankAmerica Corp BAC> Japanese commercial bank buy 350 mln dlrs subordinate capital note prefer stock plan issue boost equity base company spokesman said. BankAmerica vice chairman Frank N. Newman held meeting outline fund-raising plan 20 Japanese bank told Reuters. He stress company's effort streamline operation withdraw unprofitable energy-related area concentrate Californian base. But Newman company intention sell Seafirst Corp Subsidiary Washington. A document obtain Reuters show fund-raising effort involves 250 mln dlrs 12-year subordinate capital note 100 mln convertible prefer stock. It shelf registration SEC issue debt security whenever market condition favorable. The company already raise 100 mln dlrs U.S. Market month added. According document 250 mln dlrs subordinate capital note carry rate 100 basis point three-month London Interbank Offered Rate (LIBOR). The minimum rate six pct maxiumum 12 pct. The note redeemable par warrant attach purchase firm's common stock 17.50 dlrs. There 7.5 mln warrant term 10 years. The plan convertible prefer stock carry dividend rate equivalent month LIBOR plus yet undecided premium document said. There sinking fund prefer stock 10-year warrant attach buy BankAmerica common stock. The rest detail prefer stock issue yet work out. On prefer stock note issue BankAmerica fix rate alternative possible. The document BankAmerica raise fund yen desirable Japanese. Those meeting working-level official 13 city long-term credit seven trust bank Japanese banking source said. Newman express hope bank act lead manager project debt security name specific bank source said. No bank commitment company's fund-raising plan little advance said. "Today's meeting held short-notice can't decide it" senior official lead city bank. Newman attempt quell Japanese bankers' fear U.S. Federal Reserve insist deduct equivalent amount security purchase primary capital regulation study U.S. And Britain. Newman told worry understood U.S. Federal Reserve regulation official said. REUTER 

Citibank Ltd low Australian prime rate 16 pct 16.5 effective tomorrow. The rate unmatched bank low Australian trading banks. Other prime range 16.25 17.5 pct. Australian prime rate retreat recent peak 19 pct October line decline money market levels. Citibank reduction reflect decline. REUTER 

Mazda Motor Corp MAZT.T> vehicle export fell 2.2 pct earlier 69191 May. In May export include 50800 car 4.8 pct earlier 18391 commercial vehicle six pct company said. Mazda's export U.S. Fell 7.8 pct 35401 Europe fell 2.6 pct 20809. Exports South East Asia rise 142.4 pct 6564 due high export complete kit Kia Industrial Corp>. REUTER 

James Hardie Industries Ltd HAHA.S> 28 pct increase 1986/87 net profit reflect benefit continue rationalisation consolidation Australian activity expansion U.S. The diversified building product report net earnings rise 60.58 mln dlrs end March 31 47.42 mln 1985/86. It lift annual dividend 24 cent 22 final 13 11 previously. Hardie concentrate resource building core business building product paper merchanting technology service statement. Hardie sell business unable meet objective return investment market share non-core units. This result decline sale 1.50 billion dlrs 1.56 billion contribute fall 100 mln dlrs borrowing year-end 36 pct drop expense 29.16 mln dlrs said. Hardie 42 pct jump second-half net earnings 29.66 mln dlrs 20.92 mln earlier particularly please view difficult trading condition face building product business Australia. The problem U.S. Irrigation operation adversely affected 1985/86 earnings overcome Hardie said. It process rationalisation consolidation continued current expansion U.S. Hardie look forward period development far growth Australia overseas carry expensive process eliminate asbestos group's original prime raw material fibre cement building product past eight years. REUTER 

Average spending French ministry virtually frozen framework pct real increase overall budget source close French Finance Minister Edouard Balladur said. The source priority defence research fight unemployment reach 2.66 mln April. Prime Minister Jacques Chirac yesterday chair ministerial meeting budget Balladur due final decision month. Budget Minister Alain Juppe yesterday government course achieve target tax cut worth 50 billion franc years. Juppe give detail pledge government plan cut budget deficit 115 billion franc 1988 129 billion franc shortfall forecast 1987. REUTER 

Britain withdrew diplomat diplomatic mission Tehran leave official posts. The Foreign Office left Tehran earlier arrive London tomorrow. Britain Iran embroil three-week-old diplomatic row British diplomat beaten abduct 24 hour Iranian capital.- Reuter 

Three U.S. Senators propose temporary ban import Toshiba product due company's illegal sale sensitive high-technology good Soviet Union. Senator Jake Garn John Heinz Richard Selby hearing senate banking committee export control offer proposal major trade bill brought senate summer. Garn Utah Republican "I be talk specific retribution company endangers security country ours." Reuter 

Representatives Republic Chile 400-plus international bank creditor start signing agreement reschedule 10.6 billion dlrs country's foreign debt Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co said. Manufacturers Hanover chair 12-bank advisory committee agree term deal late February Chile's creditor bank approve package. A key feature reschedule agreement Chile avoid fresh bank loan make payment bank twelve month instead six months. Reuter 

The U.S. Treasury auction 24.25 billion dlrs seven note week raise total 8.325 billion dlrs cash. The financing begin monthly auction Tuesday June 23 9.75 billion dlrs notes. That follow Wednesday Thursday respective quarterly sale 7.5 billion dlrs note 7.0 billion dlrs seven note refund 15.93 billion dlrs note mature June 30. The note mature June 30 1989. The mature June 30 1991 seven due July 15 1994. Reuter 

Four cargo raw sugar sell China yesterday via London trade supplement country's current nearby buying programme trader said. The sugar report sell 160 dlrs tonne c f July/August shipment arrival September said. Some trader recent Chinese purchase total 300000 tonne agree heavy volume take amount figure involved. China believe market sugar trader said. REUTER 

Texas-New Mexico Power Co unit TNP Enterprises Inc file Securities Exchange Commission registration statement cover 65 mln dlr issue mortgage bonds. Proceeds repay short-term debt purpose company said. It bond probably offer Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc Salomon Brothers Inc. REUTER 

Republic New York Corp add 100 mln dlrs allowance loan loss specifically related loan exposure Latin American customers. Republic New York estimate quarter net loss total 80 mln dlrs result. REUTER 

Moody's Investors Service Inc affirm rating 2.2 billion dlrs debt Republic New York Corp. The agency Republic's 100 mln dlr provision loan loss reserve adjusts institution's financial statement accurately reflect economic reality. Affirmed Republic's Aa-3 senior debt A-1 subordinate debt prefer stock Provisional Aa-3 senior debt shelf Provisional A-1 subordinate debt shelf. Also affirm lead bank Republic National's Aa-1 long-term deposit obligations. REUTER 

USX Corp announce offering 250 mln dlrs convertible exchangeable cumulative preference stock underwritten Morgan Stanley Co Inc FIrst Boston Corp. USX proceeds redeem currently outstanding 2.25 dlrs convertible exchangeable cumulative preference stock. USX stock offer 50 dlrs share dividend 3.50 dlrs share year. REUTER 

Trading share Dairy Farm International Holdings Ltd> suspend morning session stock exchange said. It give explanation move company announce hold press conference major corporate development afternoon. The stock trade 5.40 H.K. Dlrs 10 cent yesterday's close. REUTER 

Yr end March 31 Shr 37.8 cent v 30.7 Final div 13 cent v 11 make yr 24 v 22 Net 60.58 mln dlrs v 47.42 mln Turnover 1.50 billion v 1.56 billion Other income 16.84 mln v 3.73 mln Shrs 161.71 mln v 154.19 mln. NOTE - Div pay Aug 6. Reg July 17. Div unfranked tax-free dividend imputation. Net tax 28.39 mln dlrs v 29.93 mln depreciation 32.05 mln v 34.59 mln 29.16 mln v 45.74 mln minority 1.35 mln v 9.89 mln extraordinary profit 2.28 mln v loss 31.05 mln. REUTER 

The Commonwealth Bank Australia low reference rate loan 15.75 pct 16.25 pct overdraft reference rate 16.25 pct 16.75 effective June 24. Bank official bank regard overdraft reference rate base short-term rate trend key prime lending rate corporate customers. The loan reference rate base longer term trends. The bank late cut prime rate recent day follow continue decline market rates. Other prime rate range 16 pct 17.5 pct. REUTER 

Dutch parliamentary party re-affirmed support government's opposition propose European Community tax oil fat parliamentarian said. A broad cross-section parliament voiced opposition tax debate low yesterday basis retaliation U.S. And potentially damage effect Third World countries. State Secretary Foreign Affairs Rene Van Der Linden government tax note deepen EC financial difficulties. "It difficult tax extra finance. The EC choice" Van Der Linden said. However deny government drop opposition propose tax alter position. REUTER 

CSR Ltd CSRA.S> declare unconditional takeover bid Pioneer Sugar Mills Ltd> follow Pioneer's recommendation shareholder accept. This meant Pioneer shareholder paid share tender 14 day CSR statement. CSR's statement follow Industrial Equity Ltd's INEA.S> disclosure yesterday built 9.8 pct stake Pioneer 2.54 dlrs share top CSR's cash bid 2.50. CSR offering share currently worth 4.04 dlrs plus 1.20 cash Pioneer share value Pioneer 2.62 share. It hold 33 pct Pioneer. REUTER 

Sweden's Sandvik AB SVIK.ST> Diamant Boart SA Belgium Societe Generale de Belgique BELB.BR> hold indirect 52 pct stake finalise negotiation merge oil gas drilling tool activity official company said. Staffan Paues President Brussels-based joint venture company Diamant Boart Stratabit SA (DBS) told news conference merge firm able offer product type drilling operations. He already sign slow recovery recession oil gas industries. "Stability oil price lead renew investment" Paues said. DBS Paues operation brings together Sandvik's wholly-owned U.S. Subsidiary Strata Bit Corp Houston Diamant Boart's petroleum activity Europe North America Middle Far East Africa. Paues merger direct result sharp fall oil price 18 month ago lead oil firm cut exploration activities. Officials complementary character firms' operation far reason. REUTER 

Canada's Foreign Minister Joe Clark great international recognition reduce government-imposed subsidy agricultural produce. "There recognition agricultural subsidy reduce reform measure pursued" Clark told conference ASEAN (Association South East Asian Nations) foreign minister counterpart six industrialise countries. A delegate Clark's call "halting subsidy agricultural products" ensure stable trading receive warm support Japan Australia. Clark Organisation Economic Cooperation Development (OECD) call "reduction direct indirect subsidy avoidance predatory protectionist trade practices." The OECD stand endorse Venice economic summit month. However expect quick solution subsidy problem. Clark Canadian farmer ASEAN "are caught cross-fire agricultural subsidy making." Clark country provide 10 mln Canadian dlrs aid thu five develop country South Pacific region finance fishery marine projects. "The estimate cost mln Canadian dlrs implement te International Centre Ocean Development (ICOD) close cooperation major South Pacific regional organisations" said. REUTER 

Thomson Grand Public subsidiary Thomson SA THMP.PA> take audiovisual consumer good division British Thorn EMI Thomson Grand Public chairman Pierre Garcin said. The cost deal sign late yesterday 90 mln stg Thomson finance 50 mln equity. Thorn EMI leader British audiovisual market turnover 300 mln stg. Garcin acquisition substantially increase Thomson's turnover sector. REUTER 

The 37635 deadweight tonne bulk carrier Cumberlande sank South Pacific Friday carry cargo include lead magnesium ore Lloyds Shipping Intelligence spokesman said. He unable confirm tonnage involved. Trade report circulate London Metal Exchange vessel en route New Orleans Newcastle New South Wales carry 10000 tonne lead concentrates. Traders push lead price high morning trading market currently sensitive fundamental news due finely balance supply/demand position low stocks. Trade source 10000 tonne lead concentrate convert 5000 tonne metal depend quality concentrates. A loss size cause gap supply pipeline particularly North America noted. Supplies tight strike major producer Cominco labour talk currently held Noranda subsidiary Brunswick Mining Smelting Ltd. REUTER 

French mortgage refinance agency Caisse de Refinancement Hypothecaire (CRH) cancel today's auction billion franc worth tap stock Bank France said. In statement agency cite "exceptional circumstances" bond market result low level applications. Today's issue tranche agency's March 1987 8.50 pct 12 issue. At auction May CRH sell 2.02 billion franc worth stock top accepted price 91.10 pct give average 9.79 pct yield. REUTER 

Dome Petroleum Ltd common shareholder file class action suit New York court allege company chairman president breach fiduciary duty concern Amoco Corp's propose takeover Dome. Dome suit file counsel represent Allen B. DeYoung hold 100 Dome common share name Dome chairman J. Howard Macdonald president John Beddome defendents Amoco Amoco's Canadian unit Amoco Canada Petroleum Co Ltd. Dome class action suit file United States district court New York seek court declare Dome-Amoco takeover null void compensation excess 100 mln dlrs actual damage plus compensation consequential damages. The suit seek block provision merger agreement Dome sell Amoco Primrose Alberta heavy oil property 79 mln dlrs takeover completed. Reuter 

Texas-New Mexico Power Co unit TNP Enterprises Inc file Securities Exchange Commission registration statement cover 65 mln dlr issue mortgage bonds. Proceeds repay short-term debt purpose company said. It bond probably offer Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc Salomon Brothers Inc. Reuter 

JWT Group Inc file suit WPP Group Plc> enjoin company continue tender offer. The company charge former JWT Group unit executive John Peters breach fiduciary duty disclose confidential information company clients. The company suit file New York State Supreme Court seek halt "ongoing misuse misappropriation highly confidential proprietary information concern JWT clients. The defendant suit WPP Group unit Peters January 29 director J. Walter Thompson Co JWT Group's main subsidiary president chief operating officer. JWT court enjoin defendant acquire far JWT stock return confidential proprietary information disgorge profit gains. The company court award JWT unspecified damages. Reuter 

JWT Group Inc disclose filing Securities Exchange Commission award so-called "golden parachutes" 26 top officers. The company grant special bonus effect executive fire successful takeover June 8. It grant 25 official severance payment time annual compensation fire takeover. For chairman Don Johnston payment limited twice annual compensation. JWT approve additional lump-sum payment year's compensation unspecified highly paid company officials. The company alter employee retirement stock incentive plan assure continued protection benefit employee event hostile takeover. The company disclose cost change severance retirement stock plans. Reuter 

A spokesman Unilever Plc UN.AS> decline comment market rumour consider bid U.S. Health care The Gillette Co GS.N>. Gillette share trade over-the-counter market London morning stood dollar high 38 dlrs response bid speculation. Unilever dipped 33p 3275 generally depressed U.K. Market. Most analyst dismiss rumour say story comment "utter rubbish" add Unilever interested Gillette. Gillette share rise sharply begin month Wall Street rumour Sir James Goldsmith building stake company. Gillette subject repeat rumour Ronald Perelman chairman Revlon Group Inc REV> unsuccessful bid company year. REUTER 

Private Export Funding Corp PEFCO offering 150 mln dlrs secure note due 1994 8.60 pct coupon par pricing J.P. Morgan Securities Inc act lead manager corporate debt deal. "To knowledge affiliate bank hold company manager corporate bond offering U.S." spokesman J.P. Morgan Co Inc said. J.P. Morgan Securities affiliate J.P. Morgan Co fifth large bank U.S. The J.P. Morgan spokesman explain PEFCO note guaranteed U.S. government security affiliate prohibit Glass-Steagall Act underwriting issue. Indeed Bankers Trust Co Citicorp Investment Bank affiliate Bankers Trust New York Corp Citicorp respectively co-managers PEFCO offering. Passed Congress 1933 Glass-Steagall bar commercial bank own brokerage firm engage investment banking activity underwriting corporate security municipal revenue bonds. Last major U.S. bank form investment banking affiliate apply Federal Reserve Board authorization offer commercial paper underwrite trade municipal revenue bond form mortgage-backed securities. J.P. Morgan Securities receive permission Fed week ago activity spokesman said. But Securities Industry Association trade investment banking firm appeal decision. J.P. Morgan appeal believe Fed place restriction bank's affiliate spokesman said. "The Securities Exchange Commission stay engage activities" J.P. Morgan spokesman said. "We perfectly eligable underwrite offering. We endeavor prove mysterious business" spokesman said. He add "Ruling market serve policy. J.P. Morgan Securities form April 1986 capitalization 250 mln dlrs spokesman said. At year-end 1986 firm 261.5 mln dlrs capital. Dillon Read Co Inc Merrill Lynch Capital Markets Salomon Brothers Inc serve co-managers PEFCO deal. The issue's yield 50 basis point comparable Treasury securities. The note non-callable life. A top-flight AAA rating Moody's Standard Poor's anticipated. The gross spread 5.75 dlrs sell concession 3.50 dlrs reallowance dlrs. The spokesman J.P. Morgan Securities member underwriting syndicate Sallie Mae issue year. Reuter 

British Telecommunications Plc BTY.L> look far progress reporting 11.7 pct rise 1986/87 pretax profit 2.07 billion stg. The result top market expectation share nonetheless decline night's closing level stand 12p low 303p 1130 GMT. Telephone call income rise 9.5 pct 4.97 billion rental income increase 10.6 pct 3.06 billion. The company paid anything profit-sharing scheme 18 mln stg consider payment inappropriate series strikes. It total operating cost rise 806 mln stg 7.08 billion basket across-the-range tariff reduce overall 0.3 pct November arrangement privatisation. Despite rise profit taxation rise 11 mln stg 754 mln reflect cut U.K. Corporation tax 35 pct 40 pct year. Gearing fell 33 pct 39 pct. Price regulation formula introduce previously state-owned utility float off. Yesterday British Gas Plc BRGS.L> cut tariff domestic customer 4.5 pct. BT chairman Sir George Jefferson digital exchange optical fibre link continue fight vandalism call box on. "We spending 160 mln stg modernise expand payphone service call box reliable harder vandalise." Expenditure digital exchange 500 mln stg progress instal optical fibre. REUTER 

Exide Corp raise 135 mln dlrs via offering senior subordinate note due 1997 yield 13.01 pct sole manager Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. The note 12-7/8 pct coupon price 99.25 Drexel said. The issue non-callable non-refundable five years. Moody's rate note B-2 Standard Poor's rate B-minus. The gross spread 33.75 dlrs sell concession 21 dlrs reallowance 2.50 dlrs. Reuter 

Olin Corp raise 125 mln dlrs via offering 10-year subordinate note yield 9.558 pct lead manager Morgan Stanley Co Inc. The note 9-1/2 pct coupon price 99.625 yield 134 basis point comparable Treasury securities. Non-callable issue rat Baa-2 Moody's BBB-minus Standard Poor's. The gross spread seven dlrs sell concession dlrs reallowance 2.50 dlrs. Salomon Brothers co-managed deal. Reuter 

Fletcher Challenge Finance USA Inc unit Fletcher Challenge Ltd raise 190 mln dlrs via offering note due 1997 yield 9.28 pct sole manager First Boston Corp. The note 9-1/4 pct coupon price 99.80 yield 105 basis point comparable Treasury securities. Non-callable maturity issue rat top-flight Aaa Moody's Standard Poor's. The gross spread 6.50 dlrs sell concession dlrs reallowance 2.50 dlrs. Reuter 

McDonnell Douglas Corp receive Thai Airways International McDonnell Douglas DC-10 Series 30ER aircraft MD-11 long-range trijets plus option MD-11's. The company nine aircraft together DC-10ER's order earlier Thai Air worth billion dlrs. It DC-10 schedule April 1988 delivery newly order MD-11's September November 1990 October November 1991. McDonnell Douglas DC-10 power General Electric Co GE> CF6-50C2 engine MD-11's GE CF6-80C2 engines. Reuter 

Commonwealth Edison Co raise 140 mln dlrs offering mortgage bond due 1994 yield 8.92 pct lead manager Salomon Brothers Inc. The bond bear 8-7/8 pct coupon price 99.765 yield 85 basis point comparable Treasury securities. Non-callable five issue rat A-3 Moody's A Standard Poor's. The gross spread 6.50 dlrs sell concession dlrs reallowance 2.50 dlrs. Morgan Stanley co-managed deal. Reuter 

Service Resources Corp withdrawn terminate 23 dlr share takeover offer Sorg Inc Sorg fail respond bid. It Sorg's large single shareholder evaluate option include make far offer Sorg dispose Sorg shares. Reuter 

Exide Corp raise 135 mln dlrs via offering senior subordinate note due 1997 yield 13.01 pct sole manager Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. The note 12-7/8 pct coupon price 99.25 Drexel said. The issue non-callable non-refundable five years. Moody's rate note B-2 Standard Poor's rate B-minus. The gross spread 33.75 dlrs sell concession 21 dlrs reallowance 2.50 dlrs. Reuter 

Joy Technologies Inc raise 185 mln dlrs offering senior subordinate debenture due 1999 yield 13.85 pct lead manager Kidder Peabody Co Inc. The note 13-3/4 pct coupon price 99.396 Kidder said. The issue non-callable five years. Moody's rate debt B-1 compare B-minus grade Standard Poor's. Donaldson Lufkin Jenrette co-managed deal. Reuter 

Robert Salomon manage director Salomon Inc company's quarter "likely comfotrably black comparable year-ago quarter" Salomon earn 117 mln dlrs 78 ct share primary basis. "Its difficult quarter" Salomon told Reuters add financial analyst lower quarter earnings estimate company 30 ct 50 ct share range 75 ct 80 ct share. Salomon's stock close 34-3/4 heavy trading. Salomon deluge call analyst yesterday's announcement First Boston Inc FBC> report loss quarter due steep loss bond market April. Salomon acknowledge quarter "difficult" company report profit period. Reuter 

Thrifty Rent-A-Car System Inc fifth large car rental company North America file Securities Exchange Commission initial offering mln share comon stock. Thrifty offering represent one-third company's outstanding current stockholder retain majority two-thirds ownership company. Alex. Brown Sons Inc manage underwriter. Reuter 

Halcyon Investments New York firm report 6.9 pct stake Research-Cottrell Inc. Alan Slifka partner Halcyon told Reuters share purchase investment purpose decline far comment. On June 8 Research-Cottrell enter definitive agreement acquire R-C Acquisitions Inc 43 dlrs share. Research-Cottrell close 44-1/4 unchanged previous close. Reuter 

April 30 Shr loss 13 ct v shr profit 12 ct Net loss 4116000 v net profit 3672000 Revs 61.1 mln v 55.5 mln Avg shrs 32263000 v 31640000 12 month Shr loss 86 ct v shr profit 42 ct Net loss 27.6 mln v net profit 13 mln Revs 174.9 mln v 189.3 mln Avg shrs 32184000 v 30938000 NOTE: Both 1987 1986 figure restate reflect April 21 1987 acquisition Distribution Management Systems Inc account pool interests. 1987 result include quarter non-recurring charge 7 mln dlrs after-tax impact 11 ct share attributable write-off remain asset acquried Computer Pictures Corp November 1982. Reuter 

A spokesman United Airlines employee oppose attempt takeover United Airline Pilots Association met chairman Allegis Frank Olson. William Palmer group's spokesman claim speak thousand United employee meeting Olson "positive friendly" future meeting date set. In April pilot union offer buy United Allegis subsidiary employee stock ownership plan. Reuter 

USX Corp announce offering 250 mln dlrs convertible exchangeable cumulative preference stock underwritten Morgan Stanley Co Inc FIrst Boston Corp. USX proceeds redeem currently outstanding 2.25 dlrs convertible exchangeable cumulative preference stock. USX stock offer 50 dlrs share dividend 3.50 dlrs share year. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc affirm rating 1.4 billion dlrs debt Marine Midland Banks Inc unit Marine Midland Bank NA. Affirmed parent's A-2 senior debt prefer stock A-3 subordinate debt unit's Prime-1 commercial paper A-1 long-term deposit A-2 subordinate debt Prime-1 short-term deposits. Moody's cite 400 mln dlr addition firm's loan loss reserve reflection exposure economically troubled borrowers. Moody's addition merely accurately reflect economic reality. Reuter 

National Westminster Bank Plc NWBL.L> announce 0.75 pct reduction mortgage rate applicable mortgage take June 19 1987. The rate 10.5 pct (APR - Annual Percentage Rate - 11.2 pct include fee normal repayment mortgage 11.1 pct include fee endowment pension mortgages). A spokesman Nat West position exist mortgage kept active review market condition announcement soon possible. REUTER 

TPI Enterprises Inc chairman chief executive officer Stephen R. Cohen partner partnership form AMC Entertainment Inc AEN> Phillip E. Cohen 6275144 TPI shares. Yesterday AMC announce Cohen agree buy share Rank America Inc six dlrs each. Cohen formerly TPI director. TPI term sale share Rank 30-day option purchase share Rank proposes sell AMC Cohen price. It board consider whether exercise option. Reuter 

Congressional Democratic leader announce compromise reach 1988 budget pave final approval trillion dollar spending plan. House Speaker Jim Wright Senate Majority Leader Robert Byrd told news conference final congressional approval plan reduce estimate 171 billion dlr deficit 134 billion dlr expect week. The plan work Democrats control House Senate stalemate month House Senate budget pass earlier. The budget proposes 19.5 billion dlrs tax 65 billion dlrs span. It cut President Reagan's request spend 298 billion dlrs defense 1988 nine billion dlrs accepts propose tax increase pay it. If Reagan reject tax rise defense spending plan drop automatically five billion dlrs leader said. Reagan's budget reject wide margin House Senate combination Democrats Republican party unrealistic. Reuter 

Senator Kent Conrad D-ND President Reagan's goal phasing-out farm subsidy 2000 doom failure European Community EC accept it. "It (Reagan plan) nonstarter. Its absolutely crystal clear (EC) intention eliminate subsidies" Conrad return four-day visit Europe. Instead propose farm subsidy U.S. adopt EC Common Agricultural Policy CAP principle seek "compromise" agreement Brussels jointly reduce production apply two-price domestic low export prices. Under plan export subsidy bridge domestic price gap Conrad member Senate Agriculture Committee. Reuter 

A minority European Community country strong block adoption tax vegetable marine oil fat intact EC Commission propose change proposal earlier British agriculture minister John MacGregor told journalists. He Britain West Germany Netherlands Denmark continue oppose tax Commission propose make temporary promising compensation third country whose export suffered. Reuter 

Harcourt Brace Jovanovich Inc call special meeting July 23 vote increase authorize common share 100 mln 50 mln increase prefer share 150 mln 2500000 provision allow payment prefer dividend stock property cash. The company June 29 record date meeting. Harcourt fight takeover bid British Printing Communication Corp PLC> declare special dividend common stock 40 dlrs cash 12 pct prefer stock market value 10 dlrs share. The special dividend paid July 27. Reuter 

Washington Bancorp add 12 mln dlrs reserve loss international loan cause quarter loss nine mln dlrs. The company expect profit calendar sufficient cover dividend payment current dividend policy maintained. The company pay seven ct share quarterly. Washington Bancorp earn 2358000 dlrs year's quarter 8179000 dlrs 1986. It despite increase provision book value year-end end-1986 17 dlrs share. Reuter 

Shr 1.08 dlrs v 37 ct Net 3025000 v 1188000 Sales 35.2 mln v 35.4 mln Avg shrs 2794298 v 3187051 Nine mths Shr 2.43 dlrs v 83 ct Net 6781000 v 2576000 Sales 101.0 mln v 99.7 mln Avg shrs 2794298 v 3115499 Reuter 

The European Investment Bank make 300 mln franc loan Peugeot SA PEUP.PA> restructure paint work Sochaux car factory France. It ten-year loan carry 9.15 pct follow 300 mln franc 8.60 pct ten-year loan bank Peugeot July. Work paint shop Sochaux 1.3 billion franc operation modernise group's factory added. REUTER 

European coffee trader roaster propose formula calculate International Coffee Organization (ICO) coffee quota meeting week trader official told Reuters. Although trader unwilling reveal detail formula Brazil world's big coffee producer unchanged ICO quota basis renegotiation. "The main stick quota Brazil's attitude compromise solution " said. However European coffee trade federation meeting continue week reveal gap European position re-introducing quotas. Traders trade re-introduction ICO quota roaster generally favour single proviso formula basis re-allocating quota share produce countries. The roaster position generally fairly close problem Government officials. Germany Italy cite extreme polarize Government attitude country fence. Sources Germany extreme quota re-introduction Italians favour. "Nevertheless expect common ground week common European Community (EC) view meeting consumer International Coffee Agreement (ICA) July" trader said. "We hope compromise proposal consumer producer accept it" official said. "We learn live quota suspend February prefer stability bring market simply return outdated status quo quota allocation concerned" added. Overall trader roaster opinion likelihood successful re-negotiation mildly pessimistic vary 50-50 chance 60-40 against. "Our main difficulty persuade U.S. On consumer Brazil producer agree quota re-introduction " said. "The U.S. Position anything harden Brazilian Coffee Institute president adopt negotiable position predecessors" trader said. "However producer start swing favour consumer position quota re-allocated formula Brazil become increasingly isolated give hope compromise ICO quota meeting September" official said. Reuter 

First Data Management co Inc complete merger Firsst Data MAnagement Holding co follow sharehoplder approval. It 100 share exchange 1000 dlrs principal amount 14.375 pct senior subordinate debenture due June 15 2002. Reuter 

Qtr end April 30 Shr loss 10 ct v profit nine ct Net loss 163465 v profit 131815 Revs 3672731 v 3763829 Nine mths Shr profit ct v profit ct Net profit 57911 v profit 11380 Revs 11753950 v 10794822 Reuter 

Frost Sullivan Inc President Daniel Sullivan executive officer company agree sell aggregate 542684 share common stock include share issuable exercise options. In addition Sullivan officer cause sell additional 44000 share Theodore Cross investor 10 dlrs share. Frost Sullivan publishes market research report sponsor management seminar conferences. Such share together share presently held Cross Cross majority outstanding share company's common stock Sullivan said. Sullivan continue president chief executive officer company said. After consummation sale Cross designees elect board constitute majority company said. The company stockholder 10 dlrs share. The board director expect meeting torecommend stockholder accept. Reuter 

Poughkeepsie Savings Bank board declare initial quarterly dividend 10 ct share payable July 31 holder record July 17. Reuter 

Indonesia reject World Bank recommendation sweep reform farm economy country's foreign aid donor met consider give 2.5 billion dlrs grant soft loans. Agriculture Minister Achmad Affandi write remark distribute Indonesia's 14 foreign donor nation met The Hague "The argument present Bank free trade economy view weak." The Bank call overhaul Indonesia manages large farm South-east Asia agricultural growth stagnate subsisides rice farming. The Bank report Indonesia's rice production peaked subsidy waste money. Affandi reply rice main staple provide income 17 pct workforce. The subsidy need support fertilizer industry include importer exporter producer distributor assist majority Indonesian farmers. Affandi agree bank recommendation farmer free choose crop government continue maintain production target "strategic commodities" rice sugar. The Bank report especially critical Indonesia's drive plant sugar say domestic sugar price double average inefficiency country save money import commodity. However Affandi volatile sugar price save foreign exchange already up-and-running sugar industry argument continue sugar drive. He import barrier trade monopoly agricultural sector need domestic industry develop "over-production price intervention developed nations." REUTER 

Shr 29 ct v 23 ct Net 1262000 v 1002000 Sales 49.9 mln v 40.3 mln Year Shr 1.18 dlrs v dlr Net 5205000 v 4339000 Sales 180.1 mln v 150.7 mln NOTE: Prior net period include gain 900000 dlrs adjustment LIFO reserve compensation related accrual revise effective tax rate. Reuter 

Chock Full O' Nuts Corp board declare pct stock dividend payable July 31 holder record July Eight. The company Page M. Black resign board devote attention charitable affairs. Reuter 

Qtly div seven ct v seven ct prior Pay Aug 17 Record July 31 Reuter 

Qtly div eight ct v eight ct prior Pay Aug 28 Record Aug Three Reuter 

U.S. House Senate budget negotiator agree overall budget accord reach yesterday cut 1.25 billion dlrs fiscal 1988 spending agricultural program Congressional source told Reuters. The agree cut farm program compromise 1.4 billion sought Senate billion House. The negotiator agree cut 1.6 billion farm budget fiscal 1989 2.45 billion 1990 total 5.3 billion save source said. The agreement present House Senate Agriculture committee difficult choice change agriculture program achieve budget saving target jeopardizing popular support payment senior Congressional aide told Reuters. Some farm lawmaker already manuevering budget savings. Rep. Dan Glickman D-Kan. Chairman House grain subcommittee introduce bill freeze wheat corn loan rate 1988 crop current 2.28 dlrs 1.92 dlrs respectively say save 500 mln dlrs. House Agriculture Committee chairman Kika De la Garza committee consider Glickman proposal. But Congressional source proposal unlikely approve opposition Republican lawmaker strong stance Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng freeze loan rate send wrong signal major grain export competitor achieve budget saving Glickman claims. Another Glickman budget saving increase acreage reduction ARP level wheat corn. However issue Lyng take strong stand Reagan administration argue 1988 crop wheat acreage reduction left 27.5 pct 30 pct sought Office Management Budget OMB. Most commodity lobbyist expect Lyng prevail. Congressional source achieve significant budget cut ARP increase boost 1988 corn ARP. But inform Congressional source singling-out corn ARP increase see unfair commodity. Congressional source area Congress likely eventually look budget saving tighten payment limitation rule adoption 0/92 1988 crop major grains. Those change achieve portion 1.25 billion said. Ultimately Congressional source agriculture committee force apply across-the-board cut Commodity Credit Corp. payment farmer include price support loan deficiency payment similar Gramm-Rudman-Hollings budget cut apply fiscal 1986. This idea suggest American Farm Bureau Federation AFBF fairest approach commodities. Reuter 

Woodstream Corp board hold special meeting July 28 review "strategic plan" developed management. It give details. Reuter 

New application unemployment insurance benefit rise seasonally adjust 340000 week end June 6 310000 prior week Labor Department said. The actually receive benefit regular program total 2359000 week end May 30 late period figure available. That 2255000 previous week. Reuter 

Qtly div 1.25 dlrs v 1.25 dlrs prior Pay Aug One Record June 30 NOTE: American Information Technologies Corp. Reuter 

Qtly div 25 ct v 25 ct prior Pay July 10 Record June 30 Reuter 

Qtly div 96 ct v 96 ct prior Pay August Record June 30 Reuter 

The Arab Monetary Fund lend Iraq 71.7 mln dlrs finance trade Arab country United Arab Emirates news agency WAM said. The repayment loan fall due 30 month full repayment spread years. The loan carry 4.95 pct rise 5.85 pct fourth year. Today's agreement brings total loan fund Iraq 1983 390.6 mln dlrs. REUTER 

Some OPEC unhappy price assign crude oil pose problem review six-month-old price output pact Vienna week oil analyst say. They Nigeria hold OPEC conference presidency Qatar probably big grievance price differential make crude uncompetitive. There speculation Japanese trader OPEC mark price high-sulphur heavy crude correspond great demand high fuel oil prices. But expert agree major overhaul price differential unlikely avoid give market signal dent OPEC's unity. "All OPEC change differentials" analyst major oil company. "But attitude "leave alone' little likely altered." Iran Libya Saudi Arabia sale problem earlier trader say. But diminish customer resistance fix price case marketing incentive help sales. Some producer sell uncompetitively price crude mean discount processing deal sell alongside price grade "package." Many OPEC crude see reasonably price year. But expert OPEC change price quarterly monthly match seasonal demand fuel oil-rich heavy crude gasoline-rich lighter grades. At meeting December OPEC agree reintroduce fix price February 1 18 dlr barrel reference point. Official price effectively drop 1985 offer discount attract customers. OPEC decide limit first-half 1987 output 15.8 mln bpd propose ceiling 16.6 mln third quarter 18.3 mln fourth. Analysts expect extend raise slightly current ceiling come months. Spot market netback value crude mirror official price OPEC probably keep 18 dlr target minimal change differential analyst say. The 18 dlr figure base basket six OPEC non-OPEC crudes. OPEC assign price key export crude 2.65 dlr gap heaviest lightest. Extra heavy crude left out. Industry estimate vary proportion OPEC oil export actually sell official prices. Several expert one-quarter one-third total sell official price rest include processing barter deal sell form refine products. Problems structure appear earlier producers' output fell due customer reluctance pay prices. Nigeria especially found gasoline-rich Bonny Light crude -- OPEC's high price grade 18.92 dlrs barrel -- uncompetitive spot market Britain's Brent. In February March Nigeria's production shrank below 1.238 mln bpd OPEC quota. Spot price revive due partly seasonal demand gasoline output risen. Some expert feel Bonny Light overvalue price cut 50 ct dlr barrel. But Mehdi Varzi chief oil analyst London's Kleinwort Grieveson Securities doubt Nigeria actively push differential question Vienna. "It look OPEC unity Nigeria hold presidency raise issue" said. REUTER 

Qtly div 10 ct v 10 ct prior Pay July 30 Record July 15 Reuter 

Qtly div nine ct v nine ct prior Pay July 31 Record July Nine Reuter 

Saxon Oil Co stockholder recent annual meeting approve 1-for 15 reduction outstanding share common stock. The company stockholder approve reelection director company authorization change incorporation company Texas Delaware. Saxon defer completion reincorporation reduction share pending satisfactory resolution federal income tax consequence actions. Also approve meeting proposal indemnification agreement enter director executive officers. Reuter 

Analysts surprised government's announcement forecast budget surplus fiscal 1988 consistent previous policy statement positive economy. Finance Minister Roger Douglas predict budget surplus end March 1988 379 mln New Zealand dlrs 1.95 billion deficit year. Analysts poll Reuters forecast budget surplus positive bullish analysts' forecast news financial markets. Market expectation analyst question Reuters budget varied widely balance budget 2.3 billion dlr deficit. But none predict surplus. The forecast initially look positive bond foreign exchange market analyst said. Paradoxically New Zealand dollar rise medium term despite low rate overseas investor become confident invest New Zealand said. However foreign exchange dealer disagreed say local dollar primarily rate driven move lower. The local dollar drop 0.5940/50 U.S. Dlrs hour trading 0.5970/77 budget release. Analysts budget positive share market despite increase contribution company taxation revenue figures. One equity analyst predict budget surplus announcement push share market 50 point tomorrow. The Budget statement broadly expect continuation exist policy absence traditional pre-election incentive view positively overseas investor said. But merchant bank economist anti-tax avoidance measure damage sector share market particularly multi-national companies. The government lower borrowing requirement bond tender result surplus. The requirement rest 950 mln N.Z. Dlrs predict 1.75 billion. Predicted revenue Budget look sustainable appear hold expenditure economist said. He add document entirely credible. "Altogether look Labour's election prospects" said. An election due September. REUTER 

Qtly div ct v ct prior Pay Aug 14 Record July 24 Reuter 

Shr 37 ct v eight ct Net 12.0 mln v 5.1 mln Revs 280.1 mln v 155.9 mln Backlog 625.7 mln v 451.6 mln Reuter 

Aca Joe Inc Touche Ross Co intend qualify report Aca Joe's end January 31 uncertainty company's ability concern. The company previously project "substantial losses" fiscal 1987 expect report loss operation five mln dlrs 35 ct share sale 23 mln dlrs. For fiscal 1986 Aca Joe report profit 860998 dlrs. The company review alternative lender financial advisers. Aca Joe Touche Ross yet resolve proper accounting treatment asset company's balance sheet. As result unresolved issue company unable finalize audit financial statement fiscal 1987 file annual report form 10-K Securities Exchange Commission. Aca Joe unable comply SEC's timely filing requirement 10-Q report quarter end May 2. Involved dispute Aca Joe recoverability intangible asset total five mln dlrs arise acquisition Aca Joe Intercon Ltd Aca Joe Eastern Ltd recoverability mln dlrs ACA JOE trademark right purchase company. Reuter 

Cytogen Corp shareholder annual meeting approve authorization 5400000 prefer share increase 800000 share common share sell stock option plan. Reuter 

Lead underwriter Kidder Peabody Co Inc Shearson Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc SHE> initial offering mln common share Multi-Local Media Corp underway 10.50 dlrs share. Underwriters grant overallotment option purchase 300000 share said. Reuter 

Cominco Ltd plan issue unit Canada contain common share purchase warrant indexed zinc copper prices. Each unit consist defer retractable redeemable share warrant indexed average market price zinc copper exercise date. Issue size timing term yet determined. Cominco proceeds reduce bank loan short-term debt. Underwriters Nesbitt Thomson Deacon Inc Dominion Securities Inc Pemberton Houston Willoughby Bell Gouinlock Inc. Reuter 

Inter-Regional Financial Group Inc IFG Leasing Co discontinue subsidiary redeem effective August One 4.0 mln dlr outstanding balance 11-1/2 pct subordinate note due Aug 1 1988. It redeem effective September One 3.5 mln dlr outstanding balance 13 pct junior subordinate note due Sept 1 1990. The company expect redeem final 4.2 mln dlrs subordinate debt September. Separately Inter-Regional Financial complete agreement bank two-year 30 mln dlr revolve credit facility. It agreement replaces current 18 mln dlr revolve credit agreement. Reuter 

Environmental Power Corp file offering mln common share underwriter lead Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. The company 400000 dlrs proceeds pay purchase price Milesburg Energy Inc rest repay mln dlrs short-term debt corporate purposes. Reuter 

BSD Medical Corp receive 1400000 dlrs equity capital private sale security investment partnership director Alan L. Himber. Reuter 

American Biomaterials Corp issue transferable shareholder record yesterday share held. It 2920280 right allows holder buy common share dlrs July 15 expiration. The company Hallwood Group Inc HWG> agree buy share purchase right offering except connect right issue current former director own 30.2 pct interest. Persons exercise right able oversubscribe company said. Reuter 

Dutch butter consumption rise expense margarine partly European Community's (EC) cheap butter scheme Commodity Board Margarine Fats Oils (MVO) said. Butter consumption rise 4.1 kilo 1986 kilo 1985 margarine consumption include low fat margarine fell 14 kilo 14.3 kilos. The low fat margarine figure remain static 2.6 kilo ordinary margarine fell 11.7 kilo 11.4 kilos. However cheap butter scheme contributory factor changes. The MVO figure show fairly steady rise total butter consumption fall margarine consumption 1973. A graph produce MVO annual report show total Dutch margarine consumption 1973 210000 tonne 165000 1986. The graph show total butter consumption 1973 30000 tonne compare short 60000 tonne year. However period total Dutch edible fat oil consumption fat content basis risen 345000 tonne 360000 tonne average 24.8 kilo 1986. The graph show increase butter household cooking oil usage. Reuter 

Mr. Rooter Corp rescind recent agreement call United Western Energy Corp> buy majority Mr. Rooter's stock dlrs share. The company demand repayment 150000 dlr loan United Western. Since announce agreement Mr. Rooter discover additional information relate United Western unaffiliated privately held corporation guaranteed United Western's obligation agreements. Mr. Rooter agreement rescind d"in additional information" provide details. It talk progress United Western regard repayment term loan. Reuter 

Lincoln Telecommunications Co director vote increase quarterly dividend 58 ct share 55 ct payable July 10 record June 30. The company board vote two-for-one stock split holder record July 31. Lincoln Telecommunications quarter holder 8.9 mln dlrs subordinate convertible note response notice prpeayment issue company convert holding 273844 share common stock. Reuter 

Mthly div 16-1/2 ct v 16-1/2 ct prior Pay Aug 15 Record June 30 NOTE: C.R.I. Insured Mortgage Investments LP. Reuter 

Indonesia reject World Bank recommendation sweep reform farm economy country's foreign aid donor met consider give 2.5 billion dlrs grant soft loans. Agriculture Minister Achmad Affandi write remark distribute Indonesia's 14 foreign donor nation met The Hague "The argument present Bank free trade economy view weak." The Bank call overhaul Indonesia manages large farm South-east Asia agricultural growth stagnate subsidy rice farming. The Bank report Indonesia's rice production peaked subsidy waste money. Affandi reply rice main staple provide income 17 pct workforce. The subsidy need support fertilizer industry include importer exporter producer distributor assist majority Indonesian farmers. Affandi agree bank recommendation farmer free choose crop government continue maintain production target "strategic commodities" rice sugar. The Bank report especially critical Indonesia's drive plant sugar say domestic sugar price double average inefficiency country save money import commodity. However Affandi volatile sugar price save foreign exchange already up-and-running sugar industry argument continue sugar drive. He import barrier trade monopoly agricultural sector need domestic industry develop "over-production price intervention developed nations." Reuter 

Shr 30 ct v 24 ct Net 14.7 mln v 11.3 mln Sales 738.9 mln v 605.1 mln Avg shrs 49.0 mln v 47.9 mln Nine mths Shr 1.11 dlrs v 93 ctsd Net 54.2 mln v 42.9 mln Sales 2.45 billion v 1.95 billion Avg shrs 48.9 mln v 46.4 mln NOTE: Twelve- 40-week periods. Reuter 

Qtly div nine ct v nine ct prior Pay July 31 Record June 30 Reuter 

Qtr end May 31 Shr 20 ct v eight ct Net 509043 dlrs v 202473 dlrs Revs 2106462 dlrs v 1158621 dlrs Nine mths Shr 58 ct v 50 ct Net 1465271 dlrs v 1240773 dlrs Revs 5854819 dlrs v 4640687 dlrs Reuter 

Cedar Fair LP board declare initial prorate quarterly dividend 17 ct share payable August 14 holder record June 30. The partnership expect distribution third fourth quarter meet rate 26-1/4 ct predict previously. Reuter 

Computer Depot Inc cease operation liquidate assets. The decision result termination company's line credit asset-based lender demand lender immediate payment amount due said. Computer Depot stop trading shares. Upon liquidation company account expect available distribution shareholder payment creditor said. In December 1985 Computer Depot sell personal computer system software file reorganization Chapter 11 U.S. Bankruptcy Code. Its plan reorganization approve December 1986. The company yesterday demand lender agree voluntarily surrender inventory account receivable collateral. Operations dependent financing effort obtain financing include potential buyer merger candidate unsuccessful said. Computer Depot company eventually liquidated. Computer Depot report loss 591000 dlrs fiscal quarter end May 2 1987 show profit 237000 dlrs quarter include Christmas sell season. The company previously report sale margin January below expectation due uncertainty retail market follow recent product announcement International Business Machines IBM>. Computer Depot auditor Arthur Andersen Co qualify recent financial statement cite risk company's ability continue concern. Reuter 

Westcoast Transmission Co Ltd agree acquire Western Canada oil gas reserve property AGIP Canada Ltd subsidiary AGIP SpA Italy's ENI 54 mln Canadian dlrs. At 1986 AGIP Canada report proven probable reserve 4.2 mln barrel crude oil natural gas liquid 22.7 billion cubic foot natural gas. AGIP Canada hold 176000 net exploratory acre Western Canada. Its property produce 1100 barrel oil day. The deal subject approval companies' directors. Westcoast acquisition enable apply 150 mln dlrs accumulate tax pool AGIP Canada Ltd enhance after-tax cash flow acquire properties. AGIP Canada retain offshore exploration block Labrador gold mine Yukon Territory uranium interest Saskatchewan. Reuter 

Great Western Financial Corp offering 2513200 common share price 20.625 dlrs share. The company share offer connection conversion SunPoint Savings Bank FSB Lake Worth Fla stock mutual form simultaneous merger Great Western Bank federal saving bank own Great Western Financial. Great Western Bank receive Federal Home Loan Bank Board approval acquire SunPoint Savings asset 730 mln dlrs. Great Western note conversion merger recently won approval 94 pct SunPoint's -- comprise depositor borrower company. The merger expect complete June 25. Great Western depositor employee SunPoint purchase 56500 share Great Western's common price subscription offering. Proceeds subscription offering contribute Great Western Bank lending operations. The offering underwritten Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc Goldman Sachs Co. Reuter 

Chicago Mercantile Exchange floor trader commission representative guesstimate today's hog slaughter 262000 275000 versus 278000 week ago 277000 ago. Cattle slaughter guesstimate 126000 130000 versus 131000 week ago 132000 ago. Reuter 

Lomas Nettleton Financial Corp agree principle acquire Houston discount brokerage firm Texas First Brokerage Services Inc undisclosed term subject regulatory approvals. It completion expect July 31. Reuter 

French operator request export licence today's European Community weekly cereal tender trade source said. Reuter 

BP Canada Inc 64 pct-owned British Petroleum Co PLC state-owned Petro-Canada proceed Wolf Lake 2 phase bitumen-recovery project Wolf Lake Alberta. The expansion estimate pre-start cost 200 mln dlrs add 15000 barrel current capacity 8000 barrel day. Construction start 1988 248 well drill initially 975 well add project's 25-year BP Canada said. Reuter 

Liberty Financial Group Inc parent Liberty Savings Bank sign definitive agreement acquire Equimark Corp EQK> parent Equibank 48 dlrs share Liberty. The transaction structure merger Liberty duly-formed unit Equimark company said. Liberty shareholder receive 48 dlrs share uopn merger company said. According company acquisition contingent approval Liberty's shareholder appropriate regulatory authorities. Liberty acquisition unit Liberty Savings Bank Equimark Corp result bank operating separate wholly own unit Equimark. Charles Cheleden chairman president Liberty Financial Liberty Savings continue president chief executive officer Liberty Savings headquarter Horsham Pa. company said. Liberty feel price 48 dlrs cash share attractive advise Shearson Lehman Brothers price fair. Reuter 

General Electric Co receive contract worth 250 mln dlrs include option supply CF6-80C2 engine 747-400 MD-11 airliner order Boeing Co BA> McDonnell Douglas Corp MD> respectively Thai Airways International. The company receive 16 mln dlr Thai Air CF6-50 engine McDonnell Douglas DC-10 Series 30. Reuter 

Gillette Co Revlon Group unsolicited request ask Gillette board allow Revlon cash offer Gillette share 40.50 dlrs share. Gillette consent bid require standstill agreement Revlon Gillette Revlon move Gillette's stock. In November 1986 Revlon unsolicited offer Gillette share Gillette said. Subsequently Revlon withdrew offer sell Gillette share own enter standstill agreement. The Gillette board director regularly schedule meeting afternoon Gillette anticipates make statement meeting. Reuter 

The executive Brazil's militant trade union propose strike July 15 protest government's austerity program. A spokeswoman Workers' Confederation (CUT) told Reuters proposal discuss trade union movement. On Friday government President Jose Sarney introduce austerity measure try combat country's inflation rate currently run 1000 pct year. It scrap trigger mechanism guaranteed regular pay rise line inflation. Trade union real wage drop third. Reuter 

The executive Brazil's militant trade union propose strike July 15 protest government's austerity program. A spokeswoman Workers' Confederation CUT told Reuters proposal discuss trade union movement. On Friday government President Jose Sarney introduce austerity measure try combat country's inflation rate currently run 1000 pct year. The plan scrap "trigger" mechanism guaranteed regular pay rise line inflation. Trade union real wage drop third. Reuter 

Becor Western Inc talk fourth bidder company. The company Lynch Corp LGL> renew offer Becor withdrawn week. Talks bidder expect conclude shortly Becor add board evaluate exist offer time. In meantime company plan adjourn far meeting stockholder June 30. That meeting call act merger agreement call buyout BCW Acquisitions Inc. The third identify Becor suitor Davis Mining Manufacturing Inc>. In Fairfield N.J. Lynch late proposal call Lynch 75 pct Becor's stock Becor holder retain 25 pct. Peviously Lynch held 25 pct Becor holder receive 25 pct Becor management half. Lynch proposal change believe Becor's management "needs guidance term financial structuring. Reuter 

U.S. personal income rise 0.2 pct 7.9 billion dlrs May seasonally adjust annual rate 3630.0 billion dlrs Commerce Department said. The increase follow revise 0.4 pct rise April. The department previously estimate April income rise 0.3 pct. The department revise March personal income rise 0.3 pct previously report 0.2 pct. Personal consumption expenditure rise 0.1 pct 1.5 billion dlrs 2893.3 billion dlrs May rise 0.6 pct 18.6 billion dlrs April department said. The department April May increase personal income restrain low subsidy payment farmer initial payment newly establish retirement fund federal government employee April. Wages salary increase 8.8 billion dlrs May 7.0 billion dlr rise April manufacturing payroll 1.6 billion dlrs May fall 1.3 billion dlrs April. Farmers' income fell 11 billion dlrs May decrease 6.7 billion dlrs April due low farm subsidy payment department said. Reuter 

S.And W. Berisford Plc BRFD.L> attract takeover bid make effort remain independent deputy chairman Henry Lewis company announce interim results. "We've take specific step strengthen ourselves purpose" add refer management change corporate strategy concentrate sectors. Berisford aim produce balance earnings growth combination commodity property financial service food. Its industrial division asset 90 mln stg include debt review part sold. Reuter 

Today's U.K. Economic data push chance base lending rate cut current nine pct far distance analyst said. A record fall unemployment manufacturing production data show economy strong fillip low rates. News underlie earnings rise 7.75 pct annually take together high expect bank lending money supply growth revive inflation worry monetarist argument easy credit said. "The timetable low rate push while. The strength economy broad money growth make difficult near term" Chase Manhattan Securities economist Robin Marshall. Analysts reach conclusion despite yesterday's mortgage rate cut borrower building society sign expect near term trend U.K. Rates. It counter optimistic forecast week post-general election cut imminent support optimistic economic news May's record reserve rise mirror Bank England effort cap sterling's strength. The gilt market lose nearly half enthusiasm May's 64300 fall seasonally adjust unemployment rate 2.95 mln 10.6 pct workforce rapidly replace dismay continued level underlie average earnings April dealer said. The upset compound news sterling bank lending rise 2.7 billion stg May above forecast Bank England look likely sell gilt offset impact domestic money supply current intervention. "The gilt market reaction correct" Bill Martin chief U.K. Economist broker Phillips Drew. "That's ... It show economy indeed" Skeoch said. "There's reason worry inflationary pressure they're subdued." Unit wage cost rise expect pct high April cost average earnings potentially inflationary added. "I don't average earnings number major problem" agree Chase Manhattan's Marshall. But gilt market likely remain worried funding implication recent intervention. He inflow foreign money sterling asset earlier attract growth prospect hope ruling Conservatives win week's election look likely prevent base rate cut authority try prevent fund swell domestic money system. However David Owen U.K. Economist Kleinwort Grieveson Securities fresh sterling strength trigger base rate cut today's figure signal high inflation year. "Wage increase offset productivity growth. As continue we're okay" added. REUTER 

Federal Reserve Board Governor Martha Seger sign helpful stability foreign exchange market recent weeks. "I begin calm markets" Seger told reporter speech U.S. League Savings Institutions. "I healthy period stability" said. She market force major influence exchange rate value dollar Yen Mark. Seger told Savings Loan executive concerned financial markets' absorption exchange rate influences. "I be concerned gotten nervous" exchange rate Seger said. She Fed take account additional factor determine monetary policy value dollar currencies. On economy Seger call late figure gross product modest upward revision. Reuter 

U.S. exporter able sell 8000 dairy cattle Indonesia 5000 Turkey Export Enhancement Program U.S. Agriculture Department said. The export sale subsidize commodity inventory Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC) department said. Indonesia Turkey already purchase 7500 5000 dairy cattle respectively program. Details invitation offer exporter issue near future said. Reuter 

The coupon 80 mln ECU five equity warrant eurobond Japan's Wacoal Corp fix indicate 1-1/2 pct bookrunner Banque Paribas Capital Markets said. The exercise price 1323 yen share represent premium 2.56 pct today's closing price 1290 yen. The foreign exchange rate 167.11 yen ECU. REUTER 

Bell Howell Co remark prepared delivery New York Society Security Analysts expect per-share earnings grow 12-to-15 pct range years. President Gerald Schultz growth stock buyback tax law changes. He gain expect 1986 per-share earnings 1.89 dlrs calculate exclude DeVry Inc DVRY.O> operation non-recurring gain total 45 ct share. The company decision sell DeVry Keller Graduate School Management Inc provide Bell Howell non-recurring gain 4.00 dlrs share third quarter 80 mln dlrs additional cash. "We proceeds transaction repurchase stock (probably 10 pct) purpose reduce debt" Chairman Donald Frey told analysts. Bell Howell invest 16 mln dlrs electronic product development introduction. It stepped-up investment IDB2000 electronic storage us optical disk result 5.0 mln dlr loss product line similar year. But "the swing profitability 1988 product significant." Currently Bell Howell marketing IDB2000 General Motors Corp GM> dealers. Reuter 

Aid donor Indonesia pledge total 3.15 billion dlrs fresh fund Jakarta statement issue meeting Inter Governmental Group Indonesia (IGGI) said. This compare 2.6 billion dlrs allocate year's meeting statement said. It above World Bank's recommendation 2.5 billion guilder aid come year. "The Group commend Indonesia have take effective step adjust change economic environment" statement said. The statement Indonesia far step stage resume economic growth create employment country's rapidly grow labour force. "These measure include additional significant trade industrial deregulation" statement said. It call policy support efficient diversified growth agriculture Jakarta private sector. It call Indonesia mobilise domestic resource finance development programs. REUTER 

USAir Group Inc U.S. Department Transportation's Office Public Counsel urge expedite non-hearing procedure propose acquisition Piedmont Aviation Inc PIE>. The company America West Airlines Inc AWAL.O> party voice opposition acquisition. The Department Transportation party submit statement June 17 either support oppose acquisition. USAir Piedmont request expedite approval acquisition. The company Office Public Counsel evidence acquisition substantially lessen competition market. Reuter 

New York Federal Reserve President E. Gerald Corrigan favor bank reform want maintain separation banking commerce. "As I fundamental reform banking financial compelling" Corrigan told Senate Banking Committee. Corrigan believe bank reform allow bank offer broad range banking financial services. He common ownership bank thrift security firm insurance company allow commercial firm control insured depositories. Committee Chairman William Proxmire (D-Wisc) press bank reform legislation support give bank commercial paper mortgage-backed security municipal bond underwriting mutual funds. Former Citicorp Chairman Walter Wriston bank reform reflect reality company offering banking service check account credit card mortgages. "The reality one-stop financial shopping bank others" Wriston said. "There one-stop financial shopping 50 Sears store American Express office." "We way bank deliver product customer maintain spread risk rapidly lose traditional product customers" said. But John Weinberg Goldman Sachs Co allow bank enter security bank powerful. Reuter 

Systems Computer Technology Corp receive 4879000 dlrs former directors' officers' liability insurance carrier settlement claim reimbursement cost incur connection class action suit file late 1984 1986. The company amount record gain third quarter end June 30 mln dlr reserve establish continue legal fee expense connect ongoing litigation former president. The company continue pursue claim former president connection event require restatement result fiscal 1983 quarter fiscal 1984. It large client Temple University sign contract extend Systems Computer information provider June 30 1992. The company backlog 77 mln dlrs compose mostly multiyear facility management contracts. Reuter 

Federated Department Stores Inc's Foley's unit consolidate Dallas Distribution Center operation reduce building cut staff 125 300. The company hourly employee affected staff reduction offer comparable job Houston distribution center cannot relocate consider available position Foley's Dallas/Fort Worth stores. The company "The overhead cost inefficiency associate operating complete distribution network city economically unfeasible." The consolidation follow merger Foley's Sanger Harris January. Reuter 

Freedom Federal Savings Bank hire Salomon Brothers Inc solicit offer purchase bank ongoing review method enhance shareholder value. Freedom Federal operates 15 retail branch bank 1986 asset 733 mln dlrs. "There assurance bank receive acceptable offer sell feel prudent step time" bank said. Reuter 

Conseco Industries Ltd confirmation reorganization plan sign Chapter 11 bankruptcy proceeding terminate status debtor possession. Conseco plan creditor debenture holder receive 27 pct claim two-year period president Charles J. Trainor pay 250000 dlrs 2500000 shares. The company debenture holder 30 day convert debenture common shares. It arrange mln dlrs bank financing. Reuter 

Atlantic Richfield Co consider spin-off 20 pct chemical operation gain 500 mln dlrs deal industry analyst estimated. Yesterday ARCO's stock jumped five point rumor spin chemical operations. Based 183 mln outstanding share market frenzy value spin-off 900 mln dlrs analyst said. Atlantic Richfield aware rumor issue statement mid-day consider sale 20 pct unit lead investor profits. After announcement company's stock retreat closing 93-7/8 1-3/8. Today 1/4. "It small deal expect somewhat disappointing" analyst George Baker Smith Barney. He rumor spin-off "for couple days." Baker unit profitable wasn't get type exposure Atlantic Richfield sought value reflect company's stock price. Industry analyst Richard Pzena Sanford C. Bernstein unit operating earnings 132 mln dlrs expect earn 175 mln dlrs year. Based multiple 17 time earnings--which Pzena say chemical company sell for--the entire unit worth billion dlrs put 20 pct 500 600 mln dlrs. Pzena company sell stake chemical margin peaked speculate company proceeds pay debt. But add possibility remain deal fall through. Yesterday ARCO proposal yet present board. The chemical unit revenue 1.9 billion dlrs. Reuter 

Shell Canada SHC> whose majority own Royal Dutch/Shell Group company raise posting sweet sour crude oil Edmonton/Swann Hills 32 Canadian ct barrel effective today. The price sweet crude oil 25.60 Canadian dlrs barrel price sweet sour crude 24.08 Canadian dlrs barrel. The Royal Dtuch/Shell Group own 72 pct Shell Canada shareholder primarily Canadian remain 28 pct company Shell Canada spokesman said. Reuter 

Energy Conversion Devices Inc scientist achieve superconductivity temperature 90 degree Fahrenheit. The company composition fluorinated multi-phase superconducting material involve yttrium barium copper fluorine oxygen. Reuter 

Qtly div 21-1/2 ct v 21-1/2 ct prior Pay Aug Three Reord July Seven Reuter 

Qtly div 15 ct v 15 ct prior Pay July 15 Reord June 30 Reuter 

Regulations govern hedge risk management revise development future instrument cautiously monitor deal growth off-exchange future instrument Robert Davis commissioner Commodity Futures Trading Commission CFTC said. Davis told Chicago chapter Futures Industry Association Commodity Research Division "there cause undue alarm" growth off-exchange instruments. However CFTC "must clarify jurisdictional regulatory issues" maintain safeguard intend commodity regulation encourage "the far development competitive markets." "There single off-exchange issue cannot policy approach extent problem exist cannot solution" Davis said. The development off-exchange instrument future contract characteristic increase concern federal regulator try define issue cover exist regulation regulation need protect private investment. Davis CFTC step enforcement off-exchange instrument intend compete exchange-traded issue correct "regulatory inflexibility" force instrument exchange "delineate separate harmful off-exchange development not." "We cannot ignore growth off-exchange trading represent desirable far development financial forward contract complement compete relatively financial future contracts" Davis said. He CFTC task force continue investigation off-exchange issue. Reuter 

Olsten Corp OLS> begin offer exchange share-for-share basis share newly authorize Class B common share exist common stock. The company Class B contain limited dividend right 10 vote vote share common stock. It stock trading market subject significant restriction transfer entitle 1989 80 pct cash dividend common stock convertible common stock time. The company recommend shareholdrs chairman chief executive William Olsten tender common exchange. The offer expire July 16. Reuter 

General Motors Corp permanently lay 850 hourly worker August car assembly plant Janesville Wisc Lordstown Ohio due production cutback slow-selling car built facilities. GM large U.S. automaker suffer low sale month 350 3800 worker Janesville plant indefinite layoff effective August 11 production rate 1988-model Cadillac Cimarrons Chevrolet Cavalier compact car reduce five unit hour. Another 500 worker 5100 employ GM's Lordstown Ohio plant laid effective August 24 company said. GM begin date production 1988-model Chevrolet Cavalier Pontiac Sunbirds shift cut six unit hour current rate. GM change method reporting indefinite layoff monthly release previous weekly "to achieve complete accurate less-confusing reporting production-schedule adjustments." Reuter 

Canadian Imperial Oil 70 pct Exxon own raise post sweet crude oil Edmonton 32 canadian ct barrel effective today. The company post sweet crude oil Edmonton 25.60 canadian dlrs barrel. Reuter 

Shr 17 ct v 20 ct Net 3121000 v 3624000 Revs 60.2 mln v 59.0 mln Avg shrs 18.3 mln v 18.2 mln Six mths Shr 40 ct v 48 ct Net 7429000 v 8743000 Revs 124.7 mln v 126.1 mln Avg shrs 18.3 mln v 18.1 mln Reuter 

Dutch consumer food processor hit hard propose EC tax oil fat Dick de Bruyn chairman commodity board margarine fat oil MVO annual meeting. The Dutch large consumer margarine fourth large consumer vegetable oil EC. The fiercely contest tax levy consumer steeply increase cost industry potato processing cake biscuit manufacturing de Bruyn said. "A move industry country outside EC cannot rule out" added. De Bruyn tax vegetable marine oil fat wide fraud difficult police hugely expensive administratively. He propose tax contravene article General Agreement Tariffs Trade (GATT) Lome Convention United Nations Food Agriculture Organization (FAO) guideline EC's Treaty. The propose tax inflationary consequence employment investment added. Reuter 

Nabisco Brands Ltd 80 pct-owned RJR Nabisco Inc RJR> name president R. Edward Glover chief executive replace J.R. MacDonald remains vice-chairman chairman executive committee effective immediately. Glover president chief operating officer April 1986 Nabisco said. Reuter 

Period end April 30 Shr Net 2600000 v 1600000 Revs 18.1 mln v 15.1 mln SIX MTHS Shr 21 ct v 42 ct Net 3800000 v 5500000 Revs 32.9 mln v 35.8 mln Reuter 

Qtr end march 28 Shr loss 1.46 dlrs v loss 49 ct Net loss 2919000 dlrs v loss 892000 dlrs Revs 10.3 mln v 11.5 mln Avg shrs 2000000 v 1836000 NOTE: full name company robert bruce industry Inc. Reuter 

French medium publishing Hachette HACP.PA> expect record 15 pct rise profit Hachette chairman Jean-Luc Lagardere said. Lagardere told news conference Hachette's profit 565.4 mln franc 431.7 mln 1985. He Hachette carry feasibility study launch October nationwide daily newspaper. Earlier unsuccessful billion franc bid state-owned television network TF-1. In letter sent shareholder Lagardere 1987 likely record company. Hachette own Europe-1 radio station 60 weekly newspaper magazine involve printing. It post 14.7 billion franc consolidated turnover 11.6 billion 1985. REUTER 

VMS Hotel Investment Trust commit fund 1029600 dlr short-term loan increase capital improvement Omni Park Central Hotel New York. The secure loan increase previously announce commitment 5154600 dlrs 4125000 dlrs. The total loan term option extend one-year term. Current loan fee expect produce annualized yield 14.43 pct VMS said. Reuter 

The World Bank issue 100 mln ECU eurobond due July 21 1994 pay 7-1/2 pct price 101-1/2 pct lead manager Morgan Guaranty Ltd said. The non-callable bond available denomination 1000 50000 ECUs list Luxembourg. The sell concession 1-1/4 pct management underwriting combine pay 1/2 pct. The payment date July 21. REUTER 

The French agency international marketing videotex Intelmatique> plan bring Minitel network U.S. cooperation Infonet international network service Computer Sciences Corp CSC>. Minitel offer Gannett Co Inc's GCI> USA Today British Broadcasting Corp's> news service aim French-speaking business U.S. Intelmatique said. Initially 300 application Eastern corridor New York Washington include pilot project company said. Users pre-pay communciation cost connetion fee 25 dlrs hour company said. Also participant pilot able rent Minitel terminal 25 dlrs month Intelmatique said. Reuter 

Oper shr loss 19 ct v loss 38 ct Oper net loss 239000 dlrs v loss 476000 dlrs Revs 16.0 mln v 14.6 mln Reuter 

Global Yield Fund review dividend policy told shareholder Internal Revenue Code 1986 fund distribute substantially net income year. Under tax law company annual net income include net investment income expense plu minus ordinary currency gain loss realize connection sale debt securities. The company dividend policy distribution net investment income stockholder quarterly accumulate realize ordinary currency gain distribution net income year. At company currency gain amount 40 ct share. However currency net loss realize remain six half month period reduce eliminate distribution source reduce distribution net investment income company said. According Global board determine annual basis whether distribute retain net long-term realize capital gains. In matter company shareholder annual meeting elect nine director approve investment management agreement Prudential Insurance Co America> service agreement Prudential Prudential Investment Corp>. Shareholders approve administration agreement Prudential-Bache Securities Inc> amend fund's investment restriction permit purchase portfolio security borrowing outstanding company said. Reuter 

Wells-Gardner Electronics Corp award five-year contract supply touch panel monitor Matrox Electronics Systems Ltd Dorval Quebec Canada. The company contract expect generate total revenue five mln dlrs. It monitor videodisc U.S. Army's Electronic Information Delivery System. Reuter 

(Instant Medical Test Inc) open five health test booth inside store Osco Drug Co unit American Stores Inc ASC>. The company booth include full range medical test equipment certify medical technician blood sample test 55 major health risks. Reuter 

The United States respond kidnapping American journalist Charles Glass insist yield terrorist blackmail. "While remains unclear assume terrorist attempt manipulate United States concern citizens" State Department statement. "While deeply concerned well-being Mr. Glass Mr. (Ali) Usayran hostage American foreign extend sympathy family friend repeat yield terrorist blackmail" said. The State Department embassy Beirut learn Glass journalist leave job ABC television Usayran son Lebanese defense minister kidnap Awaz'i Road southern suburb Beirut north Beirut International Airport June 17. "We claim responsibility" department said. "We hold kidnapper responsible safety victim call immediate unconditional release held hostages" added. Reuter 

Shr primary 66 ct v 1.17 dlrs Shr dilute 66 ct v 81 ct Net 1220691 v 1302999 Revs 13.7 mln v 13.1 mln Avg shrs primary 1859421 v 1112400 Avg shrs dilute 1859421 v 1826303 NOTE: Latest net include tax credit 565000 dlrs v 620000 dlrs. Reuter 

Oper shr nil v profit ct Oper net profit 14000 v profit 51000 Revs 5547000 v 6021000 Six mths Oper shr loss nine ct v profit seven ct Oper net loss 383000 v profit 314000 dlrs Revs 931000 dlrs v 12.5 mln NOTE: 1986 qtr six mths excludes loss 171000 dlrs 358000 dlrs respectively loss discontinue operations. Reuter 

Commonwealth Savings Loan Association Michael McCarthy president chief operating officer resigned. The company Barry Chapnick chairman chief executive offcer resume responsibility president's post. Reuter 

Shr 23 ct v 14 ct Net 611000 v 511000 Revs 10.1 mln v 4380000 NOTE: Latest include cent share loss discontinue operation prev include seven cent share tax credit. Reuter 

Quixote Corp Ocean Scientific Inc subsidiary Columbus Ohio division Battelle Memorial Institute sign joint marketing agreement organization provide joint service specific research development program healthcare instrumentation. The agreement allow Ocean Scientific offer client great capability design instrumentation system Quixote said. Reuter 

Qtly div ct v ct prior Pay July 21 Record July 7 Reuter 

The Federal Reserve enter government security market supply reserve via either round customer repurchase agreement overnight possibly four-day repurchase economist said. They Fed fairly add likely reserve dislocation statement period start corporate tax payment swell Treasury balance Fed. Fed fund hover 6-3/4 pct average 6.80 pct yesterday. Reuter 

Qtly div ct v ct prior Pay July 31 Record July 15 Reuter 

Sykes Datatronics Inc agree principle Marshall Associates H M resource Inc purchase mln dlrs convertible debenture allow Sykes pay full debt Chase Manhattan Corp CMB> Chemical New York Corp CHL>. The company closing investor buy 750000 dlrs convertible debenture bearing point prime rate. It payable June 1 1990 repayment principal 20 quarterly installments. Sykes remain 250000 dlrs commitment drawn Sykes' option December 1 1987 company met performance levels. It debenture convertible common stock 15 ct share. It drawn remain 500000 dlrs debenture investor buy whatever amount debenture remain unsold immediately convert Sykes stock. Sykes investor convert debenture 13.3 mln Sykes shares. Sykes 13.0 mln share outstanding. Sykes agreement investor provide share result conversion debenture amount limit Sykes' ability net operating loss carryforward Tax Reform Act 1986. The provisioin prevcent investor own 50 pct Sykes' share immediately conversion said. The company closing trasaction expect July 1 subject receipt fairness opinion investment banker Moseley Holdings Corp MOSE.O>. Sykes 1100000 dlrs initial 1500000 dlrs proceeds together 200000 dlr note pay full debt Chase Chemical. The bank release security interest sykes asset pledge investor instead said. Sykes payment bank longer pay bank lease payment proceeds sale excess inventory assets. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp cut A-2 A-1 commercial paper Tektronix Inc. S P cite management's plan repurchase 380 mln dlrs common equity. The plan greatly reduce liquidity raise debt total capital increase Tektronix's sensitivity industry volatility. Because weak primary market lead slow growth recent strong balance sheet major support credit quality agency noted. It add firm improve long-term growth increase competition inhibit return previous levels. Reuter 

Southland Corp's subsidiary Citgo Petroleum raise post price crude oil across board 50 ct barrel effective June 17. Citgo post West Texas Intermediate West Texas Sour 19 dlrs barrel. Light Louisiana Sweet post 19.35 company said. Reuter 

Microelectronics Computer Technology Corp> board approve restructuring advanced computer architecture program. The private sector cooperative research venture own 20 U.S. company restructuring base study technical advisory board. The study occur due change requirement company said. Formerly comprise separate project central resaerch core laboratory call satellites. The core focus long-range research company said. Reuter 

Hollinger Inc complete previously report acquisition privately held Unimedia Inc owner French language daily newspaper printing plant Ontario Quebec. The company own 58 pct (Daily Telegraph Plc) name former Carling O'Keefe Ltd chief executive Pierre Des Marais chief executive La Societe Media Quebec unit acquire Unimedia. It appointment effective July 2. Reuter 

West Germany's propose tax reform brought forward stimulate economic growth U.S.-led pressure Bonn far fiscal step boost economy Ifo economic institute said. An Ifo report "The total growth effect reform considerably enhance international pressure government therefore reduce large portion tax cut plan 1990 brought forward 1988." Swift action require remove grow doubt 44 billion mark tax reform finance Ifo said. The report say tax reform insufficient late stimulate economic growth demand West Germany's industrial partners. Since lion's share cut worth gross 44 billion mark "will effect 1990 impact growth little late" Ifo. The West German government consistently cut tax encourage consumer spending boost domestic demand make significant contribution economic growth. Bonn agree increase scope tax reduction plan 1988. In March government 1988 tax cut expand 5.2 billion mark 13.7 billion. A month economics minister Martin Bangemann counter joint call five German economic institute speed tax cut say step endanger effort consolidate budget keep borrowing down. Financing tax reform "acute problem" Ifo said. "Currently proposal financing (the reform) come political opposition. There lot criticism outstanding 19.4 billion mark need finance reform account for" report said. The government pledge agree Autumn raise 19 billion mark need finance tax cuts. Subsidies paid ail industry major target. But lead coalition Matthias Wissmann economics spokesman ruling Christian Democratic party concede subsidy cut exceed five billion mark unrealistic leave remain 14 billion mark found. An increase borrowing inevitable finance tax cut Bonn able cope report said. Despite vigorous opposition Free Democrats junior partner centre-right coalition government Bonn eventually force increase value add tax (VAT) due tax harmonisation measure European Community. A VAT increase provide fund income tax reform report said. Viewed context effort Bonn Washington Tokyo reform tax "despite various shortcoming West Germany's plan tax reform reputation" Ifo said. The effective cut income tax burden carry West Germans great U.S. Although rate reduction small income tax level remain high overall report said. REUTER 

Shr 52 ct v 62 ct Net 10884000 v 12891000 Revs 133.3 mln v 128.8 mln Avg shrs 21017000 v 20845000 Reuter 

Canada's National Energy Board deny application Quebec-owned Hydro-Quebec export billion Canadian dlrs worth electricity New England board spokeswoman told Reuters. The decision chief information officer Ann Sicotte said. Sicotte board reject tha application month hearing Hydro-Quebec offer electricity Canadian province prove surplus Canadian needs. Sicotte Hydro-Quebec apply review decision fact change circumstance launch appeal federal court file application. Hydro-Quebec spokesman Maurice Hebert utility yet officially notify study decision decide action take. The contract 10-year agreement export begin 1990. "They weren't able demonstrate electricity surplus demonstrate offering neighbor provinces" Sicotte said. Hebert utility argue generate electricity supply U.S. Canadian customers. "Our position electricity manufacture product--so everyboday manufacture anybody buy some--if (the provinces) buy we're willing discus it" said. The application National Energy Board reject outright Sicotte said. New Brunswick Prince Edward Island Newfoundland oppose contract Energy Board hearing spring. Reuter 

Aid donor Indonesia pledge total 3.15 billion dlrs fresh fund Jakarta statement issue meeting Inter Governmental Group Indonesia (IGGI) said. The fund compare 2.6 billion dlrs allocate year's meeting exceed World Bank's recommendation come statement said. "The Group commend Indonesia have take effective step adjust change economic environment" said. The statement Indonesia far step economic growth create employment call policy support growth agriculture. Reuter 

Regulations govern hedge risk management revise development future instrument cautiously monitor deal growth off-exchange future instrument Robert Davis commissioner Commodity Futures Trading Commission CFTC said. Davis told Chicago chapter Futures Industry Association Commodity Research Division "there cause undue alarm" growth off-exchange instruments. However CFTC "must clarify jurisdictional regulatory issues" maintain safeguard intend commodity regulation encourage "the far development competitive markets." Reuter 

Murphy Oil increase crude oil post price 50 ct barrel effective June 17. The company post West Texas Intermediate West Texas Sour 19 dlrs barrel. Light Louisiana Sweet crude 19.35 dollar barrel company said. Increases follow trend industry start yesterday Sun Co. Reuter 

Phillips Petroleum Co raise crude oil post price West Texas Intermediate West Texas Sour 50 ct barrel effective June 17. The company post price WTI WTS 19 dlrs barrel. The increase reaction Sun Co raise posting similarly yesterday. Reuter 

Mobil Corp 49/28-14 wildcat Block 49/28 British North Sea flow 50.6 mln cubic foot natural gas depth 7742 7777 feet. The company 23.33 pct holder include Atlantic Richfield Co ARC> Sun Co SUN> Deminex AG 10 pct. Reuter 

Qtly div ct v ct prior Pay July 31 Record July 15 Reuter 

The International Monetary Fund loan Uganda 92.1 mln dlrs aid economic recovery. The fund 60 mln dlrs loan available so-called structural adjustment facility (SAF) years. The fund 57.5 mln dlrs available immediately SAF separate financing arrangement. After expand 1980's Uganda's economy suffer setback 1984 fall industrial agricultural output accelerate inflation fund said. The current economic downturn worsen sharp decline price coffee Uganda's major export fund said. Reuter 

A spokesman European Community Commission defend controversial plan levy oil fat say consumer alleviate surplus pay propose tax. Norbert Tanghe division Commission's Directorate General Agriculture told 8th Antwerp Oils Fats Contact Days "the Commission firmly believe sacrifice undergone Community producer oil fat sector ... Would justify ask consumer appropriate contribution solve serious sector pay levy." The propose tax necessary level budgetary cost result olive oil oilseed production unacceptable Tanghe said. Recent estimate cost 4.0 billion European Currency Units 1990 rise 2.0 billion Ecus said. In 1990 Community's "standstill" agreement Spain Portugal EC feel full impact enlargement. The Commission propose cost production cut measure include introduction maximum guaranteed quantity added. Under Commission's stabilise consumer price oil fat sector reference price 700 Ecus tonne refine soy oil introduce Tanghe said. Consumer price raise lower regulatory amount market price below above level. He revenue generate charge regulatory amount finance Common Agricultural Policy's oil fat regime. "The Commission believe hostile reaction (to propose tax) base incomplete insufficiently thorough analysis proposal" said. Tanghe propose conforms General Agreement Tariffs Trade GATT rules. It discriminatory apply domestic import product past experience show cause decline consumption oil fats. EC-produced oilseed benefit aid arrangement said. The competitiveness oil whether EC produce import remain unchanged quantity import third country affected tax Tanghe said. The propose alter EC nations' requirement import concerned overall effect stabilise Community production level affect demand said. It proposal's objective maintain current import level said. Imports soybean unaffected import primarily satisfy EC's cake meal requirement cover stabilise system. Furthermore half oil produce import bean re-exported third country Tanghe added. Reuter 

Officials Fuerzas Electricas de Cataluna S.A. (FECSA) Spanish electricity company hold meeting debt negotiate committee represent creditor Barcelona Tuesday senior banker said. The talk cover reschedule company's 610.57 billion peseta debt include foreign domestic loan debt instruments. The committee form earlier month FECSA agree rescind self-imposed term debt repayment unacceptable banks. The negotiate committee subcommittee broader creditor steer committee 22 creditor bank lease company co-chaired Bank America International Ltd The Sanwa Bank Ltd. Bank America Sanwa co-chair negotiate committee. The Bankers Trust Co Caixa de Barcelona Confederacion Espanola de Cajas de Ahorros Chase Manhattan Bank Deutsche Bank Long Term Credit Bank Japan Orient Leasing Ltd Crown Leasing Ltd Japan Overseas Leasing Co. These bank broader steer committee. Bankers addition negotiate committee seven-member sub-committee documentation finance Citicorp chairman. Gulf Bank KSC chair separate committee committee documentation. The final list creditor participate various committee formulate morning steer committee notify FECSA's approximately 320 creditor results. REUTER 

Union Pacific Resources formerly Champlin Petroleum raise post price crude oil 50 ct barrel effective yesterday. The price increase brings West Texas Intermediate U.S. benchmark grade 19.00 dlrs barrel. The post price increase follow similar move oil companies. Sun Co raise crude oil posting yesterday afternoon company following. The price increase oil company May 22. Reuter 

Italy's overall balance payment show deficit 3211 billion lira May compare surplus 2040 billion April provisional Bank Italy figure show. The May deficit compare surplus 1555 billion lira correspond month 1986. For five month 1987 overall balance payment show surplus 299 billion lira deficit 2854 billion correspond 1986 period. REUTER 

Italy's net official reserve fell 67110 billion lira May previously report 68455 billion April Bank Italy said. Gold holding total 35243 billion lira May unchanged April. Convertible currency total 18277 billion lira May 20028 billion April European Currency Unit holding 10610 billion 10528 billion. REUTER 

Becor Western Inc reconvene shareholder meeting adjourn 1000 CDT June 30. The company previously announce plan adjourn meeting follow receipt renew offer Lynch Corp LGL> yesterday. The meeting originally convene June shareholder approve sale Becor's Western Gear Corp subsidiary adjourning. The remain matter present propose acquisition Becor BCW Acquisition Inc offer company./ Reuter 

Two major steel company study price increase announce yesterday USX Corp's USS steelmaking division. Spokesman Armco Inc AS> Bethlehem Steel Corp BS> propose price hike study. Yesterday USS plan raise base price plate product 20 dlrs ton five pct effective shipment October 4. A spokesman LTV Steel Co unit LTV Corp QLTV> decline comment add company heavy plate make plate products. A spokesman National Steel Corp> joint venture National Intergroup Inc NII> Nippon Kokan K.K. company product line affected. Reached Inland Steel Industries Inc IAD> spokesman company study pricing move. USX increase plate product include carbon high-strength low-alloy strip mill alloy plates. It plan 20-dlr-a-ton increase special plate width thicknesses. Analysts firm price steel contribute result nation's major steelmakers. Reuter 

Italy's overall balance payment show deficit 3211 billion lira May compare surplus 2040 billion April provisional Bank Italy figure show. The May deficit compare surplus 1555 billion lira correspond month 1986. For five month 1987 overall balance payment show surplus 299 billion lira deficit 2854 billion correspond 1986 period. REUTER 

Coastal Corp CGP> raise posting crude oil 50 ct barrel across board effective yesterday June 17. The price West Texas Intermediate 19.00 dlrs barrel. For West Texas Sour price 18.10 dlrs barrel. Reuter 

Qtly div five ct v five ct prior Pay Aug 15 Record June 30 Reuter 

Qtly div 25 ct v 25 ct prior Pay Aug One Record July 10 Reuter 

Qtly div nine ct v nine ct prior Pay Aug 11 Record June 30 Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc upgrade rating Phelps Dodge Corp's 545 mln dlrs debt securities. The agency cite Phelps Dodge's progress restore profitability difficult environment copper industry. Moody's study company's prospect continued improvement debt protection measurements. It note copper price recently increased. Under review upgrade Phelps Dodge's Ba-1 sinking fund debenture industrial revenue bond Ba-2 convertible exchangeable preference shares. Reuter 

RJR Nabisco Inc carry personnel organizational change food tobacco businesses. H. John Greeniaus executive vice president Nabisco Brands Inc president International Nabisco Brands name president chief executive officer Nabisco Brands Inc company said. Replacing Greeniaus president International Nabisco Brands Peter Rogers previously president Nabisco Brands USA company said. The company Gerald Long senior executive officer RJ Reynolds Tobacco USA additional title chairman RJ Reynolds Tobacco USA. Charles Chapman former president chief operating officer Nabisco Brands name president Nabisco Brands North America company said. The company assign Planters Plus Life Savers operation RJ Reynolds Tobacco Co current reporting structure Nabisco Brands USA. In addition Del Monte Corp report James Welch Jr vice chairman RJR Nabisco chairman Nabisco Brands Inc. Reuter 

Gulf Canada Corp shareholder annual meeting approve previously report reorganization plan give shareholder stock publicly trade companies. Shareholders receive 66 share Gulf Canada Resources Ltd 29 share Abitibi-Price Inc AIB.TO> 20 common share GW Utilities Ltd 100 share Gulf Canada Corp. GW Utilities company hold Gulf's 83 pct stake Consumers Gas Co Ltd 49 pct Hiram Walker-Gooderham Worts Ltd 41 pct Interprovincial Pipe Line Ltd IPL.TO>. Debenture holder object plan withdrew propose amendment Gulf Canada chairman Marshall Cohen receive compensation six month otherwise lose plan. The debenture holder sought postpone reorganization's effective date July 16 July 1 earn late six-month period. Reuter 

The European Parliament threaten block European Community spending plan imply hold attempt solve ever-deepening budget crisis year. The Parliament vote unanimously favour resolution condemn annual haggle compromise Community's 12 member spending levels. "It longer resort short-term measure provisional budgetary solutions. It longer accept budget real expenditure cover revenue" resolution said. Parliamentary block jeopardise effort solve financing crisis five billion European Currency Unit (ECU) shortfall diplomat said. EC minister deadlocked issue. It plunge EC ever-deepening crisis year. Without parliamentary approval 1988 budget Community force emergency measure spending accord previous year's levels. British conservative parliamentarian Peter Price told reporter parliament delay emergency package EC minister prove ready long-term solution. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc upgraded Crane Co's 75 mln dlrs debt. Raised company's subordinate debt Baa-3 Ba-2 in-substance defeased senior debenture A-2 A-3. Moody's cite Crane's progress reduce exposure cyclical industry steel strengthen core business acquisition cost reduction. The agency expect Crane far improvement operating margins. The diversity Crane's business strengthen cash flow improve debt protection said. Reuter 

The Federal Reserve enter government security market supply temporary reserve indirectly via billion dlrs customer repurchase agreement spokesman New York Fed said. Fed fund trading 6-3/4 pct Fed action. Reuter 

Omi Corp expect reduce debt guaranteed former parent Ogden Corp OG> 30 mln dlrs 50 mln dlrs 1987 financing measure include employee stock ownership plan. The bulk shipping company expect ESOP subject stockholder approval. The company anticipates refinance cost debt related U.S. flag chemical tanker lease swap arrangement. Omi move far enhance cash flow. In matter company joint venture Anders Wilhelmsen Co> crude carrier chartered-in minimum period six month various extension option purchase option. The company anticipates purchase option exercise joint venture summer. Reuter 

Permian Corp subsidiary National Intergroup raise crude oil posting 50 ct barrel effective June 17. company post price West Texas Intermediate West Texas Sour 19 dlrs barrel Light Louisiana Sweet 19.35. The price hike follow increase industrywide. Reuter 

Primerica Corp common stock list London Stock Exchange. Reuter 

Ogden Corp conclude sale outside United States Salomon Bros International Inc> Allen Co Inc> 85 mln dlrs six pct convertible subordinate debenture mature 2002. The company debenture convertible Ogden common stock 79.75 dlrs share give effect 2-for-1 stock split distributable July three. A portion proceeds redeem 50 mln dlrs outstanding senior subordinate debt currently bear rate eight pct company said. The balance proceeds expect financing project corporate purpose company said. Ogden potential conversion debenture adversely affect current earnings cash flow expectations. The debenture register U.S. Securities Act 1933 offer sell U.S. citizen resident U.S. company said. Reuter 

Two major steel company study price increase announce yesterday USX Corp's USS steelmaking division. Spokesman Armco Inc Bethlehem Steel Corp propose price hike study. Yesterday USS plan raise base price plate product 20 dlrs short ton five pct effective shipment October 4. A spokesman LTV Steel Co unit LTV Corp decline comment add company heavy plate make plate products. Reuter 

qtr end March 31 Shr 74 ct v 79 ct Net 4069000 v 3458000 Revs 173.2 mln v 120.8 mln Year Shr 2.65 dlrs v 2.73 dlrs Net 13.3 mln v 11.9 mln Revs 618.4 mln v 520.7 mln NOTE: Full name Standard Commercial Tobacco Co. Latest qtr include tax loss carryforwards 771000 dlrs 1042000 dlrs respectively loss 613000 dlrs discontinue operation. Prev qtr include tax loss carryforwards 469000 dlrs 1902000 dlrs respectively. Reuter 

Capital expenditure U.K. Manufacturing construction distribution financial sector rise slightly quarter 4.75 billion stg 4.74 billion fourth 1986 quarter remain below 4.86 billion stg spent quarter 1986 Department Trade Industry said. Manufacturing share spending rise 1.64 billion stg quarter 1.57 billion final 1986 quarter 1.78 billion stg register quarter 1986. Expenditure level seasonally adjust measure 1980 price Department said. REUTER 

Petro-Canada state-owned oil company raise post price sweet sour crude oil 32 ct Canadian barrel effective company said. The change brings price sweet crude 26.50 dlrs Canadian barrel price sour crude 23.77 dlrs Canadian barrel. The crude oil Edmonton/Swann Hills. Reuter 

The U.K. High Court dismiss appeal Rio Tinto-Zinc Corp Plc's RTZL.L> RTZ Oil Gas Ltd unit rule financial provision company make future cost abandon oil field tax deductible Press Association reported. The company appeal decision Tax Commissioners provision capital expenditure revenue expenditure deductible. The court told 1976 company annual provision 750000 stg eventual cost abandon rig. An RTZ spokesman ruling worry subsidiary assume provision deductible corporation tax payable. It bonus company won budgeting assumption said. Oil analyst RTZ's assumption liability share industry whole. The ruling appear mean tax relief expensive process abandon rig apply expense occur provision future expense built account analyst added. Reuter 

The Securities Exchange Commission proceeding consider allow option trading exchange-listed security option market. In three-nil decision SEC vote seek comment propose rule remove restriction prevent option trade market. Exclusive trading right option exchange-listed stock determine lottery option exchanges. The SEC vote ask New York American Chicago Board Options Pacific Philadelphia Exchanges voluntarily postpone option allocation lottery schedule June 22 matter consideration. Richard Ketchum SEC's division market regulation exchange require adhere request. Reuter 

Indonesia expect recent years' rise debt service ratio peak current level 41 pct Development Supervision Minister Ali Wardhana told journalists. He speak news conference follow annual meeting aid donor grouped Inter-Governmental Group Indonesia (IGGI) 3.15 billion dlrs fresh fund pledge come year. "The current debt service ratio 41 pct top" Wardhana note debt service ratio rise level 37 pct year. Indonesia's debt total 37 billion dlrs. "The current debt burden manageable concessionary loan attracted" said. He international organisation World Bank pledge unchanged 1.68 billion dlrs fresh fund Indonesia year's overall total year's 2.6 billion reflect high pledge donor countries. He Japan raise pledge 88 billion yen 80 billion year. Britain treble contribution 130 mln stg 45 mln. The United States raise contribution 190 mln dlrs 86 mln Netherlands raise figure 232 mln guilder 180 mln. Commenting increase fund pledge Indonesia hard hit export revenue due oil price collapse Wardhana "I be happily surprised view seriousness balance payment situation amount need cope." He note donor pledge increase local cost financing aid package. Some 900 mln dlrs package programme aid local cost financing Indonesian Central Bank Governor Arifin Siregar said. Trade Minister Rachmat Saleh Indonesia continue reform economy bring far liberalisations. "Indonesia undertaken reform meet external problems" Saleh said. "It's continue deregulation trade industry licensing businesses." Asked whether question private capital export Indonesia discuss central bank governor Arifin Siregar express confidence drain capital abroad temporary. He note turnaround recent fall foreign exchange reserve day ago. REUTER 

Security Pacific National Bank unit Security Pacific Corp Securities Exchange Commission declare effective shelf registration statement cover 1.2 billion dlrs mortgage related securities. The bank file registration statement April. This bank's shelf registration file connection Security Pacific Merchant Bank's effort securitize mortgage originate Security Pacific National said. Reuter 

Southmark Corp acquire Berg Ventures Inc manages 84 apartment complex 18000 unit 12 shopping center stretch New Jersey Florida control affiliate Berg Harmon Associates. Terms disclosed. Southmark acquisition make nation's large apartment management firm 100000 unit wing. Southmark manage partner Berg Harmon Associates. Over 3000 Berg Harmon Limited partner capital investment 300 mln dlrs property manage Southmark. Reuter 

General Motors Corp's Chevrolet Oldsmobile division extend cash rebate discount financing car truck line summer. Chevrolet August 3 customer choose cash rebate 300 dlrs 1000 dlrs depend model loan rate begin 3.9 pct 9.9 pct depend length contract. The cover six car line S-10 Blazer pickup trucks. Oldsmobile separately cash rebate discount financing package rate begin 3.9 pct 24-month loan continued retroactively June 16 Delta 88 98 Regency models. It give expiration incentive program. Chevrolet continue cover newly introduce Corsica Beretta compact cars. Through June 10 Chevrolet's car sale 14.1 pct below year's level Oldsmobile's retail delivery car 31.9 pct. Reuter 

The rate increase palm oil likely slow season despite expect 800000 tonne production rise 8.13 mln tonne Siegfried Mielke editor Hamburg-based newsletter Oil World said. He told 8th Antwerp Oils Fats Contact Days Oct/Sept 1987/88 season palm oil rise 8.25 mln tonne 7.71 mln below five-year average increase 550000 tonnes. Opening stock start October expect 1.4 mln tonne 300000 tonne below year-earlier level bring total supply 9.5 mln tonne said. The anticipate total supply 500000 tonne above season's available amount Mielke said. The increase mature palm tree area Malaysia slow offset expansion Indonesia said. He estimate combine rise Malaysian Indonesian mature 8.7 pct 9.5 pct 6.7 pct 1989 5.0 pct 1990. Malaysia shift planting Sabah Sarawak rate expansion high Peninsula yield low said. The stocks/usage ratio seven major oil expect decline Mielke said. The oil soybean cottonseed sunflowerseed coconut rapeseed palmkernel palm. At start October 1986 stock oil unusually represent 6.8 week current season's prospective demand compare six week ago 5.4 week 1984 said. Mielke expect ratio fall 5.9 week start October unusually low level 5.4 week season. The stocks/usage ratio palm oil 11.4 week October likely 8.7 week October 7.7 season Mielke said. World oilseed stock expect fall course season big reduction see soybean stock Mielke expect decline 5.0 mln tonne fifth. Almost decline expect occur U.S. estimate end stock season 10.7 mln tonne 393 mln bushel anticipate end stock 15 mln tonne 551 mln bushel season. Reuter 

Pan-Alberta Gas Ltd 1986 propose settlement United Gas Pipe Line Co Houston receive unconditional approval U.S. Federal Energy Regulator Commission. Pan-Alberta approve deal authorize term two-year interim contract amendment cash payment transportation credit Pan-Alberta's customer minimum yearly natural gas take United two-year commodity price. United pay Pan-Alberta producer 50 mln dlrs interim period average 40 mln cubic foot gas Pan-Alberta said. Reuter 

May Department Stores Co terminate agreement Allied Stores Corp buy Allied Dey Brothers Stores Syracuse N.Y. May Allied condition necessary closing met. May plan acquisition expansion Sibley's Department Store Co operates Syracuse Rochester Buffalo N.Y. Reuter 

Valero Natural Gas Partners LP board declare initial quarterly dividend 67.3611 cent unit payable August 14 record July 1. The partnership distribution cover full quarter operation end June 30 plus period inception operation March 25. Future dividend 62.5 ct quarterly said. Reuter 

Duff Phelps lower rating outstanding note debenture Transco Energy Company subsidiary Transcontinental Gas Pipe Line Company affect 887 mln dlrs debt securities. Transco Energy cumulative convertible prefer stock lower DP-12 (middle BB) DP-10 (low BBB) Transcontinental Gas Pipe Line note debenture lower DP-10 DP-8 (high BBB) prefer stock DP-11 (high BB) DP-9 (middle BBB). Duff Phelps downgrade reflect increase Transco's estimate payment require settle take-or-pay liability 550 mln dlrs 900 mln dlrs. Transco already 400 mln dlrs cash payments. In addition natural gas remains excess supply ability Transcontinental keep pipeline full subject increase competition. Reuter 

Storage Technology Corp U.S. Bankruptcy Court approve plan reorganization emergence Chapter 11 bankruptcy. Under term plan company approve creditor claim paid full cash equity notes. It settle 800 mln dlrs liability payment 132.5 mln dlrs cash 285 mln dlrs 10-year 13.5 pct note 192 mln additional common shares. The company exist common shareholder hold 15 pct company's share distribution. The company distribution cash equity note creditor start July. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp affirm Marine Midland Banks Inc's 500 mln dlrs debt. S P cite 400 mln dlr provision reserve develop country credits. The provision brings Marine's reserve 29 pct enhance flexibility actively manage portfolio. S P Marine's earnings asset quality show steady improvement. Affirmed bank's A-plus senior debt A-rated subordinate debt A-minus prefer stock A-1-plus commercial paper. Also affirm lead bank Marine Midland Bank NA's A-plus/A-1-plus certificate deposit. Reuter 

Quaker Oats Co response query corporate development account decline stock trading 54-3/8 2-1/8. Reuter 

Virtusonics Corp cut exercise price warrant 1.5 ct share 2.5 ct June 22 July 22. Reuter 

France's lead farmer's union FNSEA worried negotiation 1987/88 farm price package tackle European Community leader agricultural situation. The leader specialise knowledge farm dossier tendency sign compromise "too broad" union leader Raymond Lacombe said. But add French Farm Minister Francois Guillaume reason reject compromise negative farm sector. EC minister end talk morning have fail agreement agricultural price 1987/88 farm start April 1 products. Lacombe French government guarantee farmers' income agreement reached. Reuter 

Zenith Laboratories Inc discuss Squibb Corp's SquibbMark division three-year agreement supply product Squibb sell SquibbMark label. Zenith deal include product already market pending marketing approval U.S. Food Drug Administration. Zenith propose agreement negotiation subject approval senior management Squibb Zenith. Reuter 

Baxter Travenol Laboratories Inc hold press conference June 29 introduce information system product "dramatically improve hospital efficiency." No detail disclosed. Baxter currently offer computerize information system link hospital medical department doctors' offices. Reuter 

Holder Communications Corp stockholder approve reorganization plan General Masonry Group> Nashville Tenn. The company approve name change GMX Communications Inc increase authorize share 100 mln 20 mln. Included reorganization schedule closing June 30 installation sla e five directors. Holder own eight radio station General Masonry engage masonry construction. Reuter 

Unocal raise posting crude oil 50 ct barrel effective June 17. The company post West Texas Intermediate West Texas Sour 19 dlrs barrel. Unocal Light Louisiana Sweet post price 19.35 dlrs barrel. price move follow wave increase initiate Sun Co yesterday. Reuter 

FW Woolworth Co's chairman chief executive officer Harold Sells company remains commmitted merchandise division despite grow importance specialty stores. The company sale quarter end May 2 1.53 billion dlrs 1.41 billion dlrs period year. Sells company's specialty store contribute 65 pct total operating profit profit merchandise sector improving. He company plan turn Woolworth stores. "We've spent alot money refurbish remodel merchandise store continue so" said. Sells merchandise store increasing. But company stratagies increase core department merchandise store specialty store said. He include framescene cosmetic unit. He company continue look merger acquisitions. But stress acquisition strategy standpoint. "We're primarily look emerge growth store concept that's expand scale" said. Sells company look initial experiment video sales. He Woolworth involve summer J.C. Penny Co Inc's JCP> Tele-Action retailers. Sells Tele-Action due air Chicago summer feature product Woolworth's Foot Locker unit. Reuter 

The World Bank loan Mexico 400 mln dlrs support agricultural credit project. The project hope increase agricultural productivity export real farm income provide credit private farmer rancher agro-industries bank said. The loan lending mainly commercial bank National Rural Credit Bank Mexico's large agricultural credit lender bank said. It project hope aid reduce government's rate credit subsidies. The project support improvement agricultural credit reduction subsidy credit crop insurance increase domestic resource mobilization bank said. The loan guaranteed government 15 include grace variable rate - currently 7.92 pct bank said. Reuter 

Ecuador post trade surplus 10.6 mln dlrs month 1987 compare surplus 271.7 mln period 1986 central bank Ecuador late monthly report. Ecuador suspend sale crude oil principal export product March earthquake destroyed oil-producing infrastructure. Exports month 1987 639 mln dlrs import 628.3 mln compare 771 mln 500 mln respectively period year. Exports crude product month 256.1 mln dlrs compare 403.3 mln period 1986. The central bank January May Ecuador sell 16.1 mln barrel crude 2.3 mln barrel product compare 32 mln 2.7 mln respectively period year. Ecuador's international reserve May 120.9 mln dlrs compare 118.6 mln April 141.3 mln May 1986 central bank said. gold reserve 165.7 mln dlrs May compare 124.3 mln April. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp affirm 600 mln dlrs debt Republic Bank NY Corp. Affirmed Republic's AA senior debt AA-minus subordinate debt A-plus prefer stock A-1-plus commercial paper A/A-1-plus certificate deposit. S P cite bank's decision join grow U.S. bank aside reserve develop country credits. Republic strengthed reserve 100 mln dlrs. Despite expect quarter loss firm remains capitalize bank U.S. S P said. Reuter 

Ensource Inc agree sell mln share convertible prefer stock closely-held United Meridian Corp 25 dlrs share grant United warrant buy 550000 common shares. Ensource United chairman Ralph E. Bailey recenty retire chairman Du Pont Co's DD> Conoco Inc vice chairman Du Pont United president Joseph D. Mahaffey name board. It United designate 10-member board. The company United arrange modification Ensource's senior bank credit agreement. It United hold 41 pct voting Ensource receipt prefer carry annual dividend 2.125 dlrs share. Each share convertible 2.315 common shares. The company dividend prefer paid convertible prefer shares. It transaction subject United's approval bank debt restructuring document Federal Trade Commission approval. Reuter 

Pan American World Airways delivery 12 A310-300 aircraft June 17 become U.S. airline receive engine developed European consortium Airbus Industrie. The airline United Technologies Corp's UTX> Pratt Whitney PW4000 engines. Pan American intiially aircraft domestic route international service. Each aircraf seat 12 class passenger 30 class 162 coach. Reuter 

Par Pharmaceutical Inc begin marketing generic form Eli Lilly Co's Keflex widely antibiotic whose patent expire April 21 six weeks. Generic drug cheaper copy brand name drug lose patents. Par generic form Keflex call Cephalexin overseas supplier Par substantial investment separate facility require product. Reuter 

A joint House-Senate committee formally approve 1988 budget plan touch battle President Reagan tax defense. The budget compromise earlier House Senate budget negotiate yesterday House Senate Democratic leaders. The plan slat House action Tuesday reduce year's estimate 171-billion-dlr deficit 134 billion dlrs. It proposes 19 billion dlrs tax cut Reagan's defense mark. Reuter 

Acton Corp shareholder annaul meeting approve one-for-five reverse split take effect June 25. It holder approve limitation directors' liability indemnity agreement company officer directors. Reuter 

Reichhold Chemicals Inc Reichhold Ltd subsidiary raise price seven U.S. cent pound powder phenolic waferboard resin effective July 1 due sharp increase cost phenol. Reuter 

Enzon Inc Eastman Kodak Co's Eastman Pharmaceuticals division Food Drug Administration approve application allow clinical test PEG-uricase drug proceed. Kodak own 18.7 pct Enzon own marketing right PEG-uricase drug Enzon developing. The company PEG-uricase intend reduce uric acid level patient undergo chemotherapy suffer gout. A build uric acid bloodstream common effect chemotherapy lead kidney failure. Enzon FDA's rule allow patient life-threatening disease investigational drug uric acid level extremely ill patient decrease normal level 48 hour drug injected. Separately FDA grant permission include unlimited patient trial PEG-ADA drug treat rare usually fatal disease child call severe combine immuodeficiency. It five child treat drug hope file drug application PEG-ADA late 1987. When NDA approve drug marketed. Reuter 

Bank New England Corp special quarter loan loss provision 107 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Diamond Shamrock R M raise crude oil contract price 50 ct barrel effective June 17. The company post West Texas Intermediate crude 19 dlrs barrel. The price increase follow similar move companies. Reuter 

Xerox Corp's affiliate Rank Xerox Ltd sign definitive agreement sell Rank Xerox South Africa Pty Ltd affiliate Altron Group ALRN.O> undisclosed terms. Xerox preliminary agreement sell affiliate Fintech Altron unit reach March. Xerox completion sale awaits approval Fintech shareholder review Johannesburg Stock Exchange. Rank Xerox South Africa found 1964 wholly own unit Rank Xerox Xerox affiliate manufacture market Xerox product Eastern Hemisphere. Rank Xerox 800-man workforce Rank Xerox South Africa 40 pct black color Asian. The company wholly own unit Altron. Reuter 

Qtly div 11 ct v 10 ct prior Pay July 15 Record July 1 Reuter 

Everex Systems Inc file initial offering 5950000 common share include 4950000 sell U.S. mln overseas. Lead underwriter Goldman Sachs Co Shearson Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc SHE>. The company sell mln share shareholder rest initial offering price expect 10 12 dlrs share. Company proceeds financing account receivable inventory repay bank debt. Everex make personal computer peripheral equipment. Reuter 

Doskocil Cos Inc repurchase 310000 common share five pct undisclosed term board authorize far repurchase 200000 shares. Reuter 

Lead underwriter Salomon Inc SB> PaineWebber Group Inc PWJ> Shearson Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc SHE> initial offering seven mln common share Scudder New Asia Fund Inc underway 12 dlrs each. Underwriters grant option buy 1050000 share cover overallotments. Reuter 

Qtr end June 7 Shr six ct v 17 ct Net 1332000 v 3658000 Sales 58.3 mln v 51.6 mln Nine mths Shr 40 ct v 25 ct net 8875000 v 5034000 Sales 158.4 mln v 133.6 mln Reuter 

Doskocil Companies Inc bought 310000 share five pct common stock board authorize repurchase additional 200000 common shares. If complete total purchase represent 8.5 pct Doskocil's outstanding common stock. Reuter 

Qtly div 15 ct v 12 ct prior Pay July 24 Record July One Reuter 

ISFA Corp Thomas A. Cooper recently resign president BankAmerica Corp name chairman chief executive officer ISFA. ISFA operates Invest full-service brokerage bank Insure retail insurance program. Reuter 

Ask Corp receive approximately 1.3 mln dlrs settlement claim joint litigation Allied Signal Corp ALD> private placement Houston base venture capital firm. Ask receive approximately 800000 dlrs litigation reflect company's fourth quarter end July 31 1987. The company raise 500000 dlrs private placment convertible debt Cerrito Partners>. Ask Certito grant warrant acquire 500000 dlrs restrict stock years. Reuter 

Monsanto Co's G.D. Searle Co pharmaceutical division researcher conclude articifical sweetener include aspartame found Searle's NutraSweet pose significant health problem diabetic patients. The researcher conduct survey 100 diabetic patient use sweetener six month 20 years. Only five pct use aspartame health problem discomfort saccharine drew complaint sorbitol sweetener cause minor problem diarrhea upset stomach 25 pct patient Searle said. Reuter 

Qtly div 25 ct v 20 ct prior Pay Aug 10 Record July Three Reuter 

Salomon Inc reduction trading revenue April May manage director Robert Salomon response questions. Analysts believe low quarter profit predict Salomon Inc partially result trading loss low revenue low trading volume. They believe firm Wall Street suffer turbulent week bond market April. Robert Salomon comment whether firm actual trading loss "quarrel" New York Times article firm's loss amount 100 mln dlrs. "We haven't acknowledge trading loss April difficult month presume anything that. don't quarrel york time article" Salomon said. "There cleary reduction amount revenue generate April May little bit better" said. The New York time attribute figure analyst unnamed Wall Street official familiar firm's activities. Salomon Chairman John Gutfreund statement reiterate firm expect profit quarter see low earnings year's quarter. Analysts lower estimate yesterday half year's 75 ct share. "We believe show satisfactory framework exist market conditions" Gutfreund statement. Reuter 

General Automation Inc sign definitive agreement pay 4.5 mln dlrs Internal Revenue Service tax penalty 1972 1981. It initial payment June 30 500000 dlrs ongoing quarterly payment years. General Automation conjunction IRS agreement place mln dlrs five-year eight pct unsecured note private investors. The note accompany five-year warrant buy 110000 share common stock 6.38 dlrs share. Reuter 

Hydro Optics Inc Kenneth S. Roth resign president chairman. No reason given. It director Melvin L. Gold name chairman chief executive officer vice president-sales Barry Kay name president chief operating officer. Reuter 

McDonnell Douglas Corp receive authorization build large solid rocket booster U.S. Air Force originally planned. McDonnell Douglas subcontract order solid rocket booster 42 foot increase original 36-foot type. The company additional size cost Air Force 10.3 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Qtr end May 2 Oper shr profit ct v loss five ct Oper net profit 115000 dlrs v loss 152000 Revs 7652000 v 4279000 Six mths Oper shr profit ten ct v loss 34 ct Oper net profit 342000 v loss 1149000 Revs 14.0 mln v 7398000 Note: oper data include extraordinary gain 28000 dlrs ct shr 2nd qtr 1987 118000 dlrs ct shr six mths. Reuter 

Shr 44 ct v 23 ct Net 3050000 v 1555000 Sales 21.0 mln v 19.2 mln 1st half Shr 72 ct v 36 ct Net 4948000 v 2447000 Sales 37.8 mln v 34.5 mln Reuter 

March 31 Shr profit 14 ct v loss ct Net profit 345544 v loss 48097 Sales 1032224 v 514656 Avg shrs 2420925 v 2289925 1st half Shr profit 21 ct v profit nil Net profit 496714 v profit 5602 Sales 1649860 v 1099379 Avg shrs 2407334 v 2222591 NOTE: Prior half net include 1849 dlr tax credit. Reuter 

Bell South Corp's Southern Bell American Telephone Telegraph Co's T> network system Hayes Microcomputer Products> integrate service digital network service product launch March 1988. Reuter 

Shr loss ct v loss ct Net loss 78456 v loss 95812 Sales 513607 v 283043 Avg shrs 3106000 v 2933333 Reuter 

Qtly div 30 ct v 30 ct prior Pay July 31 Record July Six Reuter 

First Wisconsin Corp director First Wisconsin National Bank Milwaukee approve 96 mln dlr increase bank's loan loss reserve response uncertainty impact third debt repayment problems. It reserve increase result quarter loss corporation estimate 55 mln dlrs 2.80 dlrs share. However company expect report profit year. It consolidated 1987 earnings project 35 mln dlrs 45 mln dlrs compare 55 mln dlrs 1986. It dividend affected increase loan losses. In April company place 59.7 mln dlrs loan Brazil Ecuador non-accrual. First Wisconsin cite "a grow realization repayment program developed country continue renegotiate foreseeable future." It total loan loss reserve stand 160 mln dlrs 3.5 pct outstanding loans. Reuter 

The European Community (EC) accuse United States violate political commitment free trade practice include tax import gasoline custom user fee. EC ambassador Tran Van-Thinh formal charge surveillance body General Agreement Tariffs Trade (GATT) GATT spokesman David Woods told reporters. Woods EC join United States criticise Brazil extend list product import license temporarily suspend improve balance payments. The United States charge Japan violate GATT rule restrict import agricultural product import licensing system. The United States consultation Tokyo issue. Tran charge trade measure contravene political commitment halt reverse trade barrier pledge minister Punta del Este September. When minister establish Uruguay round negotiate freer trade 13 area GATT surveillance body monitor commitment know GATT jargon "standstill rollback." Tran criticise Washington "superfund" tax oil import custom user fee removal special machine tool (known category FSC34) government procurement list reason security. Warren Lavorel U.S. Trade official defend policy say violate GATT trade rules. The surveillance body send record today's talk Trade Negotiating Committee oversees round decide far action charges. The oil tax custom user fee already subject formal GATT dispute panel outside Uruguay Round rule legality practices. The ruling GATT Council yesterday adopt dispute panel's report rule U.S. Superfund tax oil import breach trade rules. It call Washington modify legislation. Mexico Canada European Community brought dispute GATT year. Reuter 

MerchantsBank Boston receive 8400000 dlr dividend Co-Operative Central Bank Share Insurance Fund amount include revenue quarter. The fund liquidate cooperative bank Massachusetts obtain federal insurance. Reuter 

Ferro Corp expect report quarter earnings seven mln dlrs 1.02 dlrs share sale 220.0 mln dlrs In ago quarter maker industrial specialty material earn 5.1 mln dlrs 75 ct share sale 185.1 mln dlrs. Based current quarter estimate Ferro earn 11.7 mln dlrs dlrs share sale 425 mln dlrs six month end June 30. In year-ago six-month period Ferro earn 9.7 mln dlrs 1.43 dlrs share sale 359.7 mln dlrs. Reuter 

California Energy Co Inc 10th geothermal production COSO Project China Lake Calif. test mln pound geothermal steam hour 420 degree Fahrenheit depth 3000 feet. The company geothermal resrves COSO sufficient produce 30 megawatt 30 years. It plan drill 20 well China Lake 1987. Reuter 

Conoco Inc subsidiary duPont deNemours DD> raise contract price pay grade crude oil 50 ct barrel effective yesterday. The increase brings Conoco's post price West Texas Intermediate 19.00 dlrs barrel. The West Texas Sour grade 34 API stand 18.10 dlrs barrel. Light Louisiana raise 50 ct 19.35 dlrs barrel. Conoco change crude posting May 21. Reuter 

LM Ericsson Telephone Co> Sweden Ericsson unit U.S. introduce cellular cellular telephone markets. The company CMS 8800/S incorporates Ericsson hardware software. It extra base station voice channel add modular blocks. Reuter 

Allegheny International Inc sell Chemetron Railway Products Inc True Temper Railway Appliances Inc Allegheny Axle Co unit newly-formed Chemetron Railway Products Inc undisclosed terms. It company form senior management railway product unit Kleinwort Benson Group London. Reuter 

Commitments Argentina's external financing 1987 1988 reach 91 pct 1.95 billion dlrs loan bank provide Citibank Argentina joint statement. This percentage close "critical mass" commitment International Monetary Fund request condition release loan country. Senior Citibank executive William Rhodes encourage banks' response telexed commitment continue arrive. The response Argentina's 350 foreign bank creditor eagerly await package market U.S. bank lead Citibank decide second-quarter loss boost reserve exist loan develop countries. Some banker fear bank refuse lend money soon take "hit" loan today's news delivers decisive rebuff skeptics. The strong response package partly result inducement 3/8 pct early-participation fee bank agree sign June 17 banker said. Reuter 

Pacific First Financial Corp president Jerry Pohlman appoint chairman chief executive officer replace James Anderson resigned. Reuter 

Qtly div five ct v five ct prior Pay July 15 Record June 26 Reuter 

Qtly div 32 ct v 32 ct prior qtr Pay 29 July Record 2 July Reuter 

AmVestors Financial Corp underwriter Smith Barney Harris Upham Co Inc Morgan Keegan Inc MOR> exercise overallotment option additional 10000 common share 9.50 dlrs connection recent offering 100000 AmVestors shares. It realize net proceeds 886000 dlrs. Reuter 

Qtly div ct v ct prior Pay July 15 Record July One NOTE: Scott Stringfellow Financial Inc Reuter 

Zambia's copper mining industry hop achieve maintain production 500000 tonne despite low price deteriorate ore shortage mine input industry official said. But Zambia's decision abandon May 1 tough International Monetary Fund (IMF) economic recovery introduce element uncertainty plan restructure ail industry boost profitability said. Copper production government-controlled Zambia Consolidated Copper Mines (ZCCM) 1987 financial end March 31 improve slightly 471000 tonne record 1986 low 463354 tonnes. "We convince 1988 financial copper production 500000 tonne due great availability spare equipment" ZCCM official said. ZCCM official production cobalt strategic income earner tailor meet demand. Finished production 1986 4565 tonne 911 tonne high previous production achieve date. Protracted low metal price badly hit copper industry Zambia world's fifth big producer. Mining monopolise ZCCM account 90 pct country's foreign exchange earnings. Production seriously affected recent equipment breakdown deteriorate ore shortage spare part fuel lubricants. The 463354 tonne output compare peak 1975 output 700000 tonnes. A five-year production investment plan launch 1984 ZCCM fund European Community African Development Bank World Bank. The plan foresees shutdown seven mining metallurgical unit ground unprofitable. ZCCM large employer government intend lay 20000 60000 workforce plan. More 250 mln dlrs channel industry bid improve efficiency profitability five-year restructuring plan. Company official reserve deplete Zambia continue produce copper beyond century low level production. Industry source ZCCM's project pre-tax profit financial end March 31 500 mln kwacha. But current mineral export tax level levy net loss likely registered. ZCCM record net loss 718 mln kwacha 1986 compare net profit 19 mln kwacha before. Under foreign exchange auction introduce 1985 ZCCM's profit foreign exchange earnings rise value kwacha fell 21 dollar dollar. But May 1 President Kenneth Kaunda abolish auction inspire International Monetary Fund announce Zambia pursue go-it-alone economic strategy base resources. ZCCM official cautious effect break IMF industry's plans. "We consult measure affect shall fare situation" Peter Hansen director operation third ZCCM hierarchy told Reuters. Some analyst believe officially-fixed exchange rate eight kwacha dollar hit ZCCM's export profits. "Most specialist I talk tell break-even ZCCM rate 10 kwacha dollar" Frederick Chiluba leader Zambian Congress Trade Unions said. High production cost continue bedevil Zambian industry. Zambia mine copper relatively expensive rate 69 cent pound compare 55 cent United States 40 cent Chile. The industry face transport problem due Zambia landlocked. The government confirm stop sBending copper south South Africa. Over 80 pct shipment 35000 tonne month sent rail Tanzanian port Dar-es-Salaam 5000 tonne via Zimbabwe Mozambique port Beira. Transport hit shortage wagon spare fuel. Reuter 

Qtly div nine ct v nine ct prior Pay July 20 Record July 6 Reuter 

Rio de Janeiro's 3500 dockworker strike indefinite period demand wage increase spokesman docker said. The Rio docker support colleague Santos Brazil's main port spokesman return unless demand met. Earlier week 65000 dockworker cancel schedule strike pressure port official wage increase benefits. A Rio port spokesman halt cause daily loss 100000 U.S. dlrs. Reuter 

Fluor Corp won contract General Electric design construct deliver module methyl chloride process addition. The value contract disclosed. Fluor Applied Engineering Co unit construct 28 modular section deliver GE's Waterford N.Y. Silicone Products division plant. Methyl chloride integral silicone production. Reuter 

Shawmut Corp repurchase 400000 common share place treasury. The company 16.1 mln share outstanding. Reuter 

Little Prince Productions Ltd settle litigation Nederlander Group receive mln dlrs pay Nederlander 38000 dlrs. Reuter 

Continental Illinois Corp know reason stock trading high heavy volume. The stock 1/2 5-3/8 turnover 1386000 share make actively trade NYSE issues. Traders earlier Goldman Sachs Co trading stock. However Goldman Sachs banking analyst Robert Albertson place stock recommend list office told Reuters. Reuter 

Kelley Oil Gas Partners Ltd agree purchase CF Industries Inc's oil natural gas property 5500000 dlrs effective July 1. It Louisiana property proven reserve year-end 11 billion cubic foot natural gas 85000 barrel oil condensate natural gas liquids. Kelley currently own work interest properties. Reuter 

The Tanzanian government annual budget embark economic recovery inspire International Monetary Fund announce increase fuel price sale tax high levy government services. Finance Minister Cleopa Msuya government expect spend 77.33 billion shilling financial 1987/8 39 pct year's estimate. Revenue provide 48.84 billion shilling leave deficit 28.49 billion finance domestic foreign loans. This year's budget initially project deficit 3.35 billion shilling mid-year government impose tax keep deficit roughly target. No figure final deficit avaialble. The budget give civil servant 20 pct pay rise effect July 1 compensate inflation 30 pct. Msuya regular petrol 52 pct similar increase cost premium kerosene. Diesel rise 75 pct. The high levy affect official transaction road toll vehicle transfer various licence fee added. REUTER 

Leaseway Transportation Corp complete previously-announced sale Leaseway Puerto Rico Inc subsidiary Caguas Central Federal Savings Bank undisclosed terms. The company sale satisfied condition propose acquisition investor lead Citicorp CCI>. Reuter 

The Brazilian Coffee Institute IBC give detail plan pay 18 company bought 630000 bag robusta coffee London market behalf September. An IBC spokesman told Reuters 15 mln dlr loan Banco Brasil pay five mln dlrs month June July August creditors. He auction coffee raise additional money add Reuter report June 16 give wrong impression auction necessary raise 15 mln dlrs. No date yet auction. Reuter 

Magellan Corp> shareholder approve merger Magellan Balzec Investments Inc> privately held company base Dallas. Magellan company operation form acquire operating entity plan engage development marketing battery charger product own Balzac. Magellan disclose term agreement. Following merger Balzac shareholder hold 80 pct outstanding stock Magellan company said. Magellan survive corporation follow merger. The company expect merger occur declaration effectiveness amendment Magellan's registration statement relate common stock purchase warrant underlie shares. Reuter 

A World Bank mission held talk senior Finance Ministry official discus Brazil's request loan ministry official said. They Brazil bank's big customer ask billion dlrs financial start July include 500 mln dlrs energy sector. The mission head Gabin Ran Kankani Bank's Brazil division met Finance Ministry secretary Nailson Nobrega. Officials provide World Bank information economic plan drawn Finance Minister Luiz Carlos Bresser Pereira. The government invite IMF study plan Monday. Bresser Pereira plan basis negotiation creditor month attempt reschedule country's 111 billion dollar debt. Reuter 

GenCorp agreement sell RKO Pictures subsidiary management terminate raise necessary financing. The company seek buyer unit library 750 films. Reuter 

Elbit Computers Ltd Israel receive 6300000 dlr contract buyer name DASHJ helmet-mounted sight allows pilot aim weapon look targets. The company delivery expect start 18 month complete 12 month later. Reuter 

Rio de Janeiro's 3500 dockworker strike indefinite period demand wage increase spokesman docker said. The Rio docker support colleague Santos Brazil's main port spokesman return unless demand met. Earlier week 65000 dockworker cancel schedule strike pressure port official wage increase benefits. A Rio port spokesman halt cause daily loss 100000 U.S. Dlrs. Reuter 

The Federal Trade Commission charge Kraft Inc false mislead advertising overstate calcuim content Kraft Singles cheese product. In administrative complaint FTC charge Glenview Ill. food consumer product company claim slice Kraft Singles American Pasteurized Process Cheese Food (Kraft Singles) contains amount calcium five ounce milk not. The company falsely advertised Kraft Singles contain calcium imitation cheese slice FTC charged. The FTC complaint charge Kraft substantiate claim not. "Nutritional information consumer difficult verify." FTC Bureau Consumer Protection Director William MacLeod statement. "That seek maintain accuracy nutritional claims." The FTC vote 4-1 favor issue complaint generally take action reason believe law violate apears commission proceed interest. The filing administrative complaint mark begin proceed take allegation rule formal hearing. If commission's allegation upheld Kraft prohibit misrepresent calcium nutrient content cheese-type product include comparative ads. The company prohibit make claim have competent reliable scientific evidence. Reuter 

Britain's Defence Minister George Younger U.S. Was unfairly protect defence industry lead British firm demand counter-measures. Younger told U.S. Chamber Commerce meeting U.S. Legislators fail realise "the true nature two-way street term idea technology equipment. A British parliamentary report March British firm award 34 mln dlrs worth contract Strategic Defence Initiative compare 1.5 billion dlrs Britain hop secure. The committee U.S. Technology export restriction "selectiveness" towards foreign contractor deny British competitor lucrative order largely exclude technological research SDI. Younger London U.S. Companies contract condition fair competition. "All ask company similar opportunities" added. If American legislation aim curb unfair subsidy exclude foreign supplier surprising British firm press retaliatory measure Younger said. REUTER 

Canada Post present strike letter carrier contract offer side little indication offer strike. The crown agency held government restraint policy little move manoeuvre union expect post office demand contract concession already rejected. The rotate walkout spread Atlantic province part Quebec employee Montreal Calgary return work. Reuter 

United Building Services Corp file registration statement Securities Exchange Commission cover propose initial offering 820000 common shares. Proceeds offering repay debt develop market additional specialty construction service corporate purposes. United Building provide specialty construction service commercial residential governmental construction project principally Arizona Colorado California. Reuter 

Shr 36 ct v 28 ct Net 2002000 v 1518000 Sales 166.0 mln v 159.5 mln Reuter 

Qtly div 45 ct v 45 ct prior Pay October Record September Reuter 

Pinnacle West Capital Corp Malapai Resources Co unit bought mineral right uranium mining 21000 acre northern Wyoming Westinghouns Electric Corp WX>. The property adjacent 34000-acre site company already owns. Both facility expect full operation 1990s annual production mln lb uranium concentrate company said. The site expect produce 250000 lb uranium full production 1988. The adjacent property expect begin 1989. Reuter 

The West Texas cotton crop largely unscathed isolated thunderstorm region packed hurricane-force wind crop weather expert said. "There isolated storm certainly damaging" Charles Stichler extension agronomist Agricultural Extension Service West Texas. Rumors damage storm West Texas help New York cotton future market rally sharply morning. Cotton December delivery 1.35 cent high 70.95 cent lb midsession peak morning 71.25 cents. "What happen storm hit Lubbock airport happens everybody see it" Dale Mohler senior meteorologist Accu-Weather Inc. Lubbock heart West Texas cotton region produce 80 pct state's crop. The storm produce wind 75 mph. "That's hurricane force. But isolated portion West Texas probably five pct" Mohler said. "No doubt damage. But hit July August (when fruit underway) worse" Mohler said. About 60 pct West Texas cotton crop plant remainder weekend weather remains hot dry Stichler said. The temperature West Texas mid-week 95 degrees. But hot spell sorely need heavier normal rainfall week said. Reuter 

Mthly div 1.2827 ct v 3.3974 ct prior Pay July 31 Record June 30 Reuter 

Second quarter end May 31. Shr 27 ct v NA Net 3560 mln v 2389000 Six mths Shr 57 ct v NA Net 7881000 v 5415000 NOTE: Year-ago shr figure available bank convert stock ownership April 29 1986. 1987 2nd quarter six mth net excludes 2288000 dlrs 17 ct share 4648000 dlrs 33 ct share respectively tax carryforwards. 1986 2nd qtr six mth net excludes 667000 dlrs 3043000 dlrs respectively tax carryforwards. Reuter 

Lexitech International Documentation Network Inc sign agreement Far East affiliate Yamamoto Industries handle Lexitech's Asian language translation documentation requirements. Reuter 

California Credit Card Trust 1987-B unit BankAmerica Corp's Bank America subsidiary offering 300 mln dlrs certificate back credit card receivables lead manager Salomon Brothers Inc. The certificate 8.20 pct coupon price 99.89 yield 8.21 pct 85 basis point comparable Treasuries. The debt average 1.8 matures 1992 rat Aaa Moody's. Bank America Capital Markets co-managed deal California Credit Card. In February sell 400 mln dlrs credit card debt via First Boston. Reuter 

The White House call compromise budget hammer congressional Democratic leader "pickpocket" spending plan bar negotiation change budget reform place. Noting trillion dollar budget raise tax 65 billion dlrs scale President Reagan's military spending proposal spokesman Marlin Fitzwater "The president isn't buying neither American people. "The Democrats refer tax increase deficit reduction -- pickpocket lift wallet pay dinner" Fitzwater said. The White House official apparent retreat earlier administration stance negotiation budget acceptable Reagan Democratic-led Congress begin budget reform adopted. The White House previously negotiate budget congressional Democrats able agree themselves. Democratic leader call "summit" conference White House budget. "If budget reform package ensure sound enforceable negotiate process interested pursue Fitzwater said. Reuter 

Life Group Inc expand activity broker/dealer unit Life Planning Inc include investment banking involve underwriting corporate finance. The company Lawrence Zaslow Joseph Broder agree join unit operation purchase Life Group stock option Life Group president David Altschuler. Reuter 

Hollinger Inc purchase Saturday Night Canadian general-interest magazine. Financial term disclose Hollinger immediate plan change senior editorial personnel. Saturday Night publishes feature analysis current event celebrate 100th anniversary circulation 120000 accord magazine spokesman. Hollinger own 58 pct Daily Telegraph PLC> complete acquisition Unimedia Inc Quebec-based publisher. Reuter 

Triton Group Ltd John Stiska resign president. He replace Triton Chairman Charles Scott. Stiska return private law practice continue serve special counsel Triton Intermark Inc IMI>. Intermark own 41 pct Triton's common stock control company March 1986. Reuter 

Pennwalt corp agree principle acquire line fungicide insecticide herbicidesand related manufacturing facility Le Raffineries de Soufre Reunies Marseilles undisclosed term subject approval bothe board government authorities. The company acquire product sell mostly FRance grapevine wheat sugar beet sale 40 mln dlrs annually. Reuter 

Belgium start negotiation consortium share major modernise country's telecommunication network government spokesman said. The consortium Bell Telephone Manufacturing Co NV subsidiary ITT Corp ITT> together Acec SA  Siemens AG SIEG.F> ATEA SA subsidiary GTE Corp  NV Philips Gloeilampenfabrieken PGLO.AS> American Telephone Telegraph Co T>. The deal estimate worth 50 billion franc government spokeswoman decline confirm this. The cover telephone exchange cable terminals. The go-ahead talk follow outline agreement centre-right government coalition today. The accord month discussion complicate demand share fairly French Dutch speak part Belgium. Government official decline detail outline agreement divide consortia. Reuter 

Total Energy Resources Inc wholly own bysdisiary French energy company TOTAL Compagne Francaise de Petroles relocate office Houston Denver TOTAL's plan expand U.S. operations. Reuter 

The World Bank extend Pakistan 220 mln dlrs loan support project education energy conservation modernization small-scale industry development. The education project support 145 mln dlr loan International Development Association bank's concessionary lending affiliate bank said. The bank note Pakistan's low educational attainment particularly woman obstacle country's development. It education project aim increase literacy enrollment rate curriculum reform teacher training parental participation construction. A small-scale industry development project support 54 mln dlr loan bank said. The project hope aid small-scale industry encourage bank lending develop export market support technology transfer bank said. The third project improve refinery efficiency reduce energy consumption increase crude oil processing capacity support 21 mln dlr loan. Reuter 

Ford Motor Credit Co unit Ford Motor Co raise 150 mln dlrs offering note due 1990 yield 8.275 pct sole manager Bear Stearns Co. The note 8-1/4 pct coupon price 99.931 yield 62.5 basis point comparable Treasury securities. Non-callable maturity issue rat Aa-2 Moody's AA-minus Standard Poor's. The gross spread 3.50 dlrs sell concession dlrs reallowance 1.25 dlrs. Reuter 

Jordan receive loan total 96.4 mln dlrs support project aim increase country's electrical production improve housing slum squatter area World Bank said. The bank make 70 mln dlr loan fund 257.8 mln dlr project design meet future needs. It loan 26.4 mln dlrs support project provide affordable housing urban infrastructure service low-income family slum squatter areas. Reuter 

A South African trade union dispute subsidiary Britain's Johnson Matthey Plc company's proposal move platinum refinery near Johannesburg black tribal homeland. The 30000-member mainly black Chemical Workers Industrial Union fear plan move Bophuthatswana homeland South African union recognise lead job loss affect wages. A mass dismissal Impala Platinum Holdings Ltd IPLA.J> mine tribal homeland sent platinum price rocketing. The union talk management propose move broken down. It earlier ballot refinery worker show favour strike move add final decision take strike action. The refinery process platinum metal Rustenburg Platinum Holdings Ltd world's large platinum producer. It own Matthey Rustenburg Ltd joint-subsidiary Johnson Matthey Rustenburg turn own mining Johannesburg Consolidated Investment Co Ltd. Reuter 

A compromise reach Gulf Canada Corp debenture holder annual meeting cost company major shareholder "a couple million" dollar chairman Marshall Cohen said. After half-hour discussion debenture holder meeting Cohen Gulf lawyer agree compensate six month lose corporate reorganization plan take effect July one. The holder withdrew propose amendment sought delay plan's closing July 16 collect due paid July 15. "We sort mechanic we're this" Cohen told reporter later. "It principal shareholder absorb interest" refer Reichmann family's Olympia York Developments Ltd own 79 pct Gulf Canada. Cohen want ensure Gulf Canada revise reorganization proposal already file Revenue Canada U.S. Securities Exchange Commission. "If Gulf can't pay (the interest) upset applecart Olympia York pay" said. The reorganization Gulf Canada Corp rename Gulf Canada Resources Ltd. Shareholders offer share separate publicly trade company Gulf Canada Resources Abitibi-Price Inc A.TO> GW Utilities Ltd. Newly form GW Utilities hold Gulf Canada's interest Consumers' Gas Co Ltd CGT.TO> Hiram Walker-Gooderham Worts Ltd Interprovincial Pipe Line Ltd IPL.TO>. Cohen Olympia York's Gulf Canada Resources slip 68 69 pct result previously announce plan sell 450 mln dlrs stock. In answer reporter's question Cohen possibility size offering increased. "There seem pretty strong interest" add depend market condition pricing. The issue price month accord company official. Reuter 

Calton Inc begin building 242-home community Newtown Bucks County Northampton Township Pa sometime late July August. Calton community name "The Homes Tapestry Northampton" locate near Newtown Pa. Calton build two- three-bedroom townhomes garden-style condominium duplex condominiums. The company negotiate right build community near New Jersey border. Reuter 

Qtly dividend nine ct v eight ct Pay July six Record June 29 Reuter 

National Commerce Bancorp agree operate sublicense branch bank facility supermarket Florida Virginia Kroger Co supermarkets. It initially 20 location available Florida 10 Virginia. Reuter 

Leader Development Corp shareholder annual meeting approve acquisition privately-held Clinton American Corp related partnership 3450000 common share transaction account pool interests. The company Clinton president F. Daniel Ryan president Leader. Reuter 

Cheyenne Resources Inc purchase interest produce oil gas property 2240000 share company's restrict stock. The large 25 pct oil gas Weld County Colo company said. Cheyenne five pct properties. Cheyenne realize 10000 dlrs net income monthly properties' current production levels. Reuter 

Qtly div 45 ct v 45 ct prior Pay Oct 1 Record Sept 4 Reuter 

Crane Co acquire asset Chicago Heater Co Inc wholly own subsidiary Marley Co>. The term transaction disclosed. Chicago Heater intergrated Crane's Cochrane Environment Systems division company said. Reuter 

The European Community (EC) increase size special export tender British West German feed wheat held intervention store include South Korea acceptable destination trader said. The tender originally 120000 tonne British 120000 tonne West German feed wheat shipment Poland. But tranche increase 50000 tonne 170000 tonne South Korea add destination. Both tender June 24. Reuter 

The Supreme Court Cyprus reject plea offshore security trading company Central Bank decision revoke licence. Central Bank officer Eleftherios Ioannou told Reuters court dismiss appeal York International (Cyprus) Ltd register offshore company October. The Bank February withdrew York's licence froze bank account investigate sale eight mln dlrs worth securites telephone 3000 investor abroad. Reuter 

Colgate-Palmolive Co plan file Securities Exchange Commission shelf registration cover 300 mln dlrs unsecured debt securities. Reuben Mark chairman president company told meeting New York Society Security Analysts Colgate-Palmolive release. Proceeds corporate purposes. Reuter 

The Tanzanian government annual budget embark economic recovery inspire International Monetary Fund announce increase fuel price sale tax high levy government services. Finance Minister Cleopa Msuya regular petrol 52 pct similar increase cost premium kerosene. Diesel rise 75 pct. Msuya government expect spend 77.33 billion shilling financial 1987/8 39 pct year's estimate. Revenue provide 48.84 billion shilling leave deficit 28.49 billion finance domestic foreign loans. Reuter 

General Electric sign 21 mln contract build 12.5 megawatt plant fuel agricultural waste El Nido Biomass Power Plant Associates. GE Pacific Gas Electric Co purchase net electric output El Nido Calif. plant schedule completion mid-1989. GE fuel capable fire six type agricultural waste primarily burn almond pruning cotton stalk rice straw otehr alternate agricultural waste. Reuter 

Canada's bank rate rise marginally 8.59 pct 8.58 pct week Bank Canada said. The bank rate one-quarter percentage above average yield weekly issue 91-day treasury bills. This week's yield 8.34 pct compare previous week's 8.33 pct. Tenders accepted 2.20 billion dlrs 91-day bill average price 97.963 dlrs 97.965 dlrs week. The 1.20 billion dlrs 182-day bill price average 95.852 dlrs 95.779 dlrs week yield average 8.68 pct 8.84 pct week. The 500 mln dlrs 364-day bill price average 91.712 dlrs 91.529 dlrs week yield average 9.06 pct 9.28 pct week. Tenders receive week 2.20 billion dlrs 91-day bill 1.20 billion dlrs 182-day bill 500 mln dlrs 364-day bills. Reuter 

North American Biologicals Inc receive 10 mln dlr credit facility Manufacturers Traders Trust Co Buffalo N.Y. It credit replace exist 4.4 mln dlr line Barclays PLC BCS.L> due favorable rate borrowing cost significantly reduced. The company half credit designate acquisitions. It expect conclude acquisition possibly outside plasma serum field year-end. Reuter 

Pengo Industries Inc agree sell Wireline Products Manufacturing Division Fort Worth Texas Wireline Services Division operation location Pengo International Inc subsidiary John Wood Group PLC undisclosed terms. The company Wireline Services operation sell Lafayette Houma Harvey La. Alvin Odessa Longview Texas Moore Okla. Pengo Kuykenball Slickline operation Moore surplus wireline equipment operation fort Worth Cleburne Texas sell separately. Reuter 

The EC Commission cereal management committee reject bid licence export free market Spanish barley non-EC country trade source said. The licence request 35000 tonne 143 145 European Currency Units (ECUs) said. This tender special tender 500000 tonne Spanish barley. The source bid licence free market soft wheat non-Spanish barley export non-EC countries. Reuter 

Senate Banking committee chairman William Proxmire D-Wis date Alan Greenspan's confirmation hearing Federal Reserve chairman White House formally sent nomination Senate. Proxmire interview soon White House complete clearence procedure sent Greenspan's name Senate schedule hearing replacement Paul Volcker. The committee full Senate confirm Greenspan. Volcker's term expires August. Reuter 

Magic Years Child Care Learning Centers Inc sign letter intent acquire profitable care center south central Pennsylvania total price 350000 dlrs. The privately own center aggregate revenue 474000 dlrs 1986 profit six thousand dlrs company said. The transaction schedule close July company said. Reuter 

A trade-led boom U.S. unlikely growth net export merely offset dramatic slowdown consumer spending sector economy Bank America late economic report. Although net export add 0.7 pct GNP reduce 1.2 pct 1986 consumer spending contribute 1.4 pct GNP year. As result GNP likely expand modest 2.5 pct rate accord Daniel Van Dyke Bank America economist write report. "Growth consumer spending United States drop dramatically jump inflation cause falloff growth disposable income" Van Dyke said. Growth U.S. consumer spending likely slow 1.8 pct 4.1 pct 1986 predicted. The report release Commerce Department report personal income rise 0.2 pct May increase 0.4 pct April personal consumption expenditure risen 0.1 pct compare 0.6 pct increase month before. The rise cost energy import likely boost consumer price average 3.7 pct 1.9 pct 1986 Bank America forecast. This rise inflation reduce real disposable income growth 1.3 pct 1987 2.9 pct 1986. As result Van Dyke calculate purchasing average increase modest 540 dlrs compare surge 1210 dlrs 1986. The slowdown income growth likely cause housing start drop 4.2 pct far six pct 1988 annual rate 1.63 mln units. "For recession 1988 1989 remote possibility" Van Dyke said. Currently U.S. growth fragile depends heavily improvement trade. "However protectionist attitude rise country source growth risk" added. Reuter 

Hadron Inc receive mln dlr two-year contract Martin Marietta Corp information logistical support service provide U.S. Navy's electronic warfare programs. Reuter 

Everex Systems Inc file Securities Exchange Commission initial offering 5950000 share common stock. Of share sell 4950000 wil offer U.S. mln issue sell company balance sell shareholders. In addition mln share sell outside U.S. An underwriting co-managed Goldman Sachs Co Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc offer shares. Reuter 

World Bank loan Portugal 50 mln dlrs improve highway system. The bank loan 400.4 mln dlr three-year government finance project rehabilitate improve 3410 mile highway bank said. It project hope increase road safety improve sign aid enforcement axle-load legislation add patrol car communication equipment. The loan 15 include grace standard variable rate currently 7.92 pct bank said. Reuter 

Vsevolod Murakhovsky Soviet Agriculture Ministry observe trading morning Winnipeg Commodity Exchange exchange spokesman said. Murakhovsky lead delegation 17 Soviet visitor exchange current cross-Canada tour. The party include Phylipp Popov member Supreme Soviet. Murakhovsky deputy chairman Council Ministers USSR chairman Gosagroprom Ministry Agriculture. The delegation accompany Harold Bjarnason assistant deputy minister Agriculture Canada. Reuter 

Opto Mechanik Inc designer manufacturer military optical electro-optical system receive 7.2 mln contract domestic foreign customers. Opto Mechanik series contract include 3.8 mln dlr contract U.S. Army Missle Command produce sight guide TOW anti-tank missle. Reuter 

Brooklyn Union Gas Co New York gas utility gas cost sharply result Transco Energy Co's E> decision close pipeline transport spot gas sale energy industry analyst said. Brooklyn Union fourth large gas utility United States purchase 36 pct supply spot non-contract market 1986 proportion spot supply estimate high five month 1987 analyst said. Texas Eastern pipeline TET> compete pipeline deliver spot gas produce area South close gate station summer Brooklyn Union rely entirely Transco spot supplies. In month May Brooklyn Union paid dlrs mln British Thermal Unit spot gas contract gas cost five dlrs mln BTU industry source said. Transco announce yesterday longer provide access transport spot natural gas customer fear accumulate take-or-pay liabilities. Take-or-pay contract oblige pipeline pay producer gas delivery take customers. Brooklyn Union continue receive amount supply minor field grandfather clause Brooklyn Union official said. Foster Corwith gas analyst Dean Witter Reynolds rise cost Booklyn Union pass rate payers. While net effect company know month lag defer earnings end-users especially residential commercial customer pay gas said. Because closure take summer month gas demand seasonal low impact cash flow Curt Launer natural gas analyst Donaldson Lufkin Jenrette said. If situation persists winter heating season cost gas cut company's profit said. Gas utility eastern seaboard rely Transco spot gas North Carolina Natural Gas Co NCNG> Piedmont Natural Gas Co PNY> cost factor Brooklyn Union Steve Richards supply manager user supply Houston base natural gas brokering firm said. "But company unwitting victim take-or-pay dispute Transco producers" said. Distributors deaf ear Transco's request inventory charge reserve pipeline facility spot gas deliver company said. Without spot supply cost gas threaten drive customer capable shift alternative fuel said. In absence guideline inventory charge Federal Energy Regulatory Commission matter negotiate pipeline customer Richards said. Now Transco refuse transport cheap spot gas distributor likely conciliatory inventory charge said. "Cool head prevail" DLJ's Launer " while." Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc upgraded Ohio Edison Co's 2.7 billion dlrs debt securities. Raised Baa-2 Baa-3 utility's mortgage bond prefer stock secure pollution control issue guaranteed Euronotes Ohio Edison Finance NV. Moody's upgraded Ohio Edison's unsecured issue preference stock Baa-3 Ba-1. The likely approval 152 mln dlr 10 pct rate hike Ohio Public Utilities Commission significantly reduces key component financial risk. It implement Perry Unit One's expect Fall in-service date Moody's said. Reuter 

Qtly div 18 ct v 15 ct prior Pay July 30 Record July 10 Reuter 

Reynolds Metals co plan restart idle potuction line Troutdale Ore. primary aluminum plant. With restart 22700-metric-tonne-per-year line Reynolds operating 100 pct consolidated primary aluminum capacity 695000 tonne year. Reynolds commence potline restart near future expect actual metal production begin September one. The company start necessitate continue strong demand aluminum dwindle worldwide inventory metal need supply Reynolds' various fabricate businesses. Reuter 

CBC Bancorp Inc> acquire Memphis-based Union Planters Corp UPCM.O> merger agreement. Details disclosed. CBC hold company own Cookeville's Citizens Bank sign agreement merge CBC Union 2.2 billion dlrs assets. According CBC Union report shareholder equity nearly 190 mln dlrs period end March 31. CBC merger affect Citizens Banks' name management board director employees. Reuter 

TIE/Communications Inc renew agreement sell GTE Corp GTE> Bell Atlantic Corp BEL> NYNEX Corp NYN> US West Inc USW> years. The company provide mid-siezed key telephone system GTE key system hybrid DATA STAR PABX system others. Reuter 

Shares Glaxo Holdings PLC fell follow report today's New England Journal Medicine antibiotic able treat ulcer threaten Glaxo's billion dlr antiulcer drug Zantac analyst said. Glaxo's trading 27-7/8 1/2 volume 1786800 shares. Shares SmithKline Beckman SKB> maker popular anti-ulcer drug Tagamet fell 7/8 60-1/4. "Anything raise possiblity entirely therapy ulcer attack core Glaxo's worldwide Zantac" David MacCallum analyst follow Glaxo Hambrecht Quist. Zantac world's prescribed drug annual sale billion dollar accounting 75 pct Glaxo's earnings MacCallum. "If perception Zantac therapy choice ulcer Glaxo's sale profit decline" Tina Rizopuolos analyst Alexanders Laing Or'kshnk. Rizopuolos New England Journal article lead University Toronto researcher concludes study 71 child gastric disease bacteria cause gastritis ulcers. In editorial issue medical journal Richard Hornick University Rochester School Medicine review study use antibiotic treat ulcers. Rizopuolos Hornick concludes bacteria ulcer relationship "exciting intriguing" far study need show direct causal effect. Ulcers happen stomach's protective line erodes expose underlie inflame tissue unknown actually cause process. It know stomach acid exacerbate ulcer therefore antacid commonly alleviate ulcer Tagamet Zantac along. Both drug prevent release hormone histamine stomach trigger acid secretion. "I don't run sell Glaxo" analyst Rizopuolos. "It displace Tagamet Zantac...those drug prescribed physician time" added. Reuter 

The International Tin Council ITC intervene High Court hearing attempt prevent presentation internal Council document evidence. The intervention Shearson Lehman's action London Metal Exchange "ring out" tin contract 1986 likely implication case Council involve follow collapse buffer stock operation October 1985 ITC delegate said. The ITC's present Professor Rosalyn Higgins expect far day week. Court sit tomorrow. In essence Council claim status similar foreign embassy archive therefore English court law. The Council end quarterly session ahead schedule. The meeting expect tomorrow European Community's legal adviser due attend delegate review progress various legal action today. Otherwise meeting occupy internal administrative matter delegate said. The ITC continue operate reduce staff June 30 follow extension sixth International Tin Agreement. As deal ongoing litigation Council continue statistical carry research study staff research department cut previously. At week's session Council elect Philip Sparkes Australia vice-chairman produce Heinz Hofer Switzerland vice-chairman consumer July 1. Future quarterly session schedule October 5/7 December 14/16. Reuter 

American Cyanamid Co plan construct multimillion-dollar addition agricultural flagship plant Hannibal Mo. The company facility produce Assert herbicide third company's series imidazolinone herbicides. Cyanamid biotechnology chemical research company Hannibal plant principal agricultural product manufacturing facility. Assert wild oat broadleaf weed herbicide grain sunflower company said. Reuter 

First Wisconsin Corp agree sell First Wisconsin Center Milwaukee adjacent property Trammell Crow Co 195 mln dlrs result gain 77 mln dlrs tax. It 36 mln dlrs amount include 1987 earnings remainder account 10 years. First Wisconsin transaction value 195 mln dlrs. First Wisconsin Trammell Crow official plan build high-rise tower 42-story center First Wisconsin continut headquarters. In addition center First Wisconsin property sell include building directly east center. First Wisconsin continue occupy lease space Trammell Crow. Reuter 

North Hills Electronics Inc North Hills Israel Ltd unit close 1500000 dlr loan Overseas Private Investment Corporation agency U.S. government. North Hills unit loan connection construction equip 16000-square-foot manufacturing facility Israel produce component electrical control systems. Reuter 

The World Bank approve 97.4 mln dlr loan China boost fertilizer output increase agricultural production. The 20-year loan support project aim improve efficiency medium-scale fertilizer plant technical renovation energy conservation bank said. It project seek reduce agricultural nutrient imbalance building capacity phosphate fertilizer production improve institutional efficiency introduce modern economic financial operational system techniques. Reuter 

Qtly div 2-1/2 ct v 2-1/2 ct prior Pay Oct One Record Sept Three Reuter 

Reynolds Metals Co plan restart idle potline Troutdale Ore. primary aluminum plant. With restart 22700 tonne production line Reynolds operating 100 pct consolidated primary aluminum capacity 695000 tonne year. Reynolds restart begin near future expect actual metal production begin September 1. The company start-up necessitate continue strong demand aluminum dwindle worldwide inventory metal need supply Reynolds' various fabricate businesses. Reuter 

Fingermatrix Inc 2368253 2649387 right purchase common share issue shareholder exercise Hallwood Group Inc HWG> purchase 165000 common share option buy share right exercised. In addition receive oversubscription request 1400000 share distribute 116134 share pro rata basis. The company proceeds underwriting discount commission 12.6 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Allegheny Western Energy Corp form subsidiary market gas small user West Virginia. The company complete negotiation sell 10 12 mln cubic foot gas unspecified East Coast utility. Interstate market subsidiary's operation company said. Reuter 

Senate Banking committee chairman William Proxmire D-Wis conference held House Banking committee week bill refinance Federal Savings Loan Insurance Corp. The Senate pass 7.5 billion dlr FSLIC refinance House approve five billion dlrs funds. The Senate bill bar bank service March ban so-called non-bank bank provision House opposes. FSLIC virtually money ail thrift institution accord Federal Home Loan Bank Board. Reuter 

O'Brien Energy Systems Inc expect net income end June 30 12 15 ct share eight ct year. The company earnings aid substantially agreement sign Trafalgar House PLC THSL.L>. Under agreement Trafalgar provide turnkey construction operation maintenance service construction financing O'Brien cogeneration plant built New Jersey California. Total installation cost 190 mln dlrs construction start year-end. Reuter 

PPG Industries sign agreement Formosa Plastics Group build operate continuous strand fiber glass manufacturing plant Taiwan. The 50-50 joint venture PPG Nan Ya Plastics corporation Formosa Plastics Group subject approval Taiwan governmental agencies. PPG plant schedule begin operating 1989 initial annual capacity 20000 metric tons. Reuter 

Consumers Power Co raise 250 mln dlrs two-tranche offering mortgage bond lead manager Morgan Stanley Co Inc. A 150 mln dlr offering due 1992 nine pct coupon par pricing yield 112.5 basis point comparable Treasuries. This tranche non-callable life. A companion 100 mln dlr issue mature 1997 assign 9-5/8 pct coupon price 98.50 yield 9.703 pct 143 basis point Treasuries. These bond non-callable five years. The debt rat Baa-3 Moody's BBB-minus S P. Reuter 

Qtly div 95 ct v 95 ct prior Pay August Record June 30 Reuter 

Ronald Perelman Revlon Group Inc REV> try ignite bidding Gillette Co draw international player process lot money Wall Street analyst said. Several hour regularly schedule board director meeting Gillette disclose Perelman request consent board offer 40.50 dlrs share. Perelman need consent agree November buy stock 10 permission. "I Ronald Perelman interested Gillette interested put Gillette play stand ton money" Andrew Shore analyst Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc. "In play" term Wall Street describe happens company becomes unwiling takeover target. Shore note accord 1986 agreement Revlon get paid acquisition Gillette November price high 29.75 dlrs share. Gillette rise 40 follow gain yesterday. The agreement calculate basis Perelman's previous hold 18.4 mln share adjust split. For example deal Gillette company 44 dlrs share Revlon richer 262 mln dlrs formula. Neither Perelman nor spokesman return telephone call seek comment. "Revlon stand substantial amount money someone else take Gillette" Analyst Deepak Raj Merrill Lynch Co. "I'm say happen Gillette undervalue stock breakup value 45 dlrs share." Shore Shearson Lehman couple reason Perelman really interested acquire Gillette. He Perelman process take Revlon private acquire control cosmetic company ago probably want concentrate improve Revlon's operations. "He's try overhaul improve image dearptment store business." Another reason Revlon recently acquisitions. Under circumstance Shore surprised company Unilever plc UN.AS> Procter Gamble Co PG> decide look Gillette. Shore mention half dozen potential buyer Gillette include Sir James Goldsmith Hanson Trust plc HAN> RJR Nabisco Inc RJR> American Brands Inc AMB> Ralston Purina Co RAL>. "Perelman try company play" Wall Street arbitrageur. "He get share upside company sold." Another arbitrageur expect Gillette resist Perelman's overture. "I can't board consent change November now" said. Another arbitrageur sure on. "Perelman anything fair amount calculation" said. But add "The Gillette board careful. They can't they'll sue shareholders." Gillette's board meeting 1700 EDT one-half hour schedule start time. According copy Perelman's letter release Gillette prepared sign defnitive merger agreement financing condition. He Citibank N.A. lead lender First Boston Inc financial adviser. Reuter 

The World Bank approve 97.4 mln dlr loan China boost fertilizer output increase agricultural production. The 20-year loan support project aim improve efficiency medium-scale fertilizer plant technical renovation energy conservation bank said. It project seek reduce agricultural nutrient imbalance building capacity phosphate fertilizer production improve institutional efficiency introduce modern economic financial operational system techniques. Reuter 

PNC Financial Corp raise loan loss reserve 110 mln dlrs 386 mln dlrs reduce quarter result 66 mln dlrs 92 ct share fully dilute basis. The company charge expect report quarter profit expect half profit 100 mln dlrs. It add expect normal operating earnings half. The company earn 68.5 mln dlrs 1986 quarter 121.6 mln dlrs prior half. It increase loss reserve due appraisal worldwide economy particularly developed country experience payment problems. The company loss reserve allocate country 35 pct loan countries. It move result change current dividend policy. Reuter 

A.H. Robins Co face suit Dalkon Shield birth control device Federal Court Appeals approve company notify potential victim liability. The notification potential claimant january 1986 end month challenged claimant committee company's inadequate. A company spokesman A.H. Robins pleased ruling note unfavorable decision "set quite time." The ruling U.S. Court Appeals fourth circuit upheld low court "the notification Robins ... reasonable. "The evidence indicates news outlet receive information. Simiarly strong evidence news broadly disseminate worldwide. "Women unlikely location Kenya Botswana Pakistan Bangladesh ultimately file claims. A battery health welfare organization disseminate information. It appear Court extensive notification success." Reuter 

Aluminum Co America offering purchase outstanding 150 mln dlrs 12 pct sinking fund debenture 2012. It buy debenture 1105 dlrs 1000 dlr principal amount plus accrue include payment. The offer 1700 EDT (2100 GMT) June 30 unless extended. Payment July eight. The buyback offer co-managed Merrill Lynch Capital Markets Salomon Brothers Inc Alcoa said. Reuter 

TRW Inc's TRW Componenets International Inc unit pact Tektronix Inc's TriQuint Semiconductor unit jointly supply gallium arsenide device space applications. As agreement companyies work together establish procedure produce class "S" (a stringent military specification space use) gallium arsenide components. TriQuint make gallilum arsenide integrate circuits. Reuter 

Peru's mineral marketing arm Minero Peru Comercial SA (Minpeco) lift force majeure zinc ingot shipment country's big zinc refinery Cajamarquilla spokesman said. The spokesman problem affect sulphuric acid roaster plant halt production May 4 resolved. However production zinc ingot expect fall 86000 tonne Cajamarquilla 94000 tonne 1986 stoppage. The refinery optimum annual production capacity 100000 tonne high production 96000 tonne refine zinc ingot 1985 spokesman said. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc downgrade Crazy Eddie Inc's 65 mln dlrs B-1 convertible subordinate debentures. Moody's cite Crazy Eddie's reduce profitability recent acquisition proposal company increase debt leverage uncertain earnings outlook. The agency review consider company's concentration highly competitive New York marketplace Crazy Eddie's ability maintain adequate bank financing. Reuter 

Mexico sign reschedule accord cover 120 mln dlrs official debt Britain 1.8 billion dlr restructuring agree Paris club creditor finance ministry said. The reschedule 10 five grace carry margin 1/2 pct libor. Finance minister Gustavo Petricioli sign accord Mexico agreement reflect strengthen economic financial trade relation countries. The Paris Club restructuring form 12 billion dlr financial package agree Mexico's creditor year. The reschedule cover sector trade debt come due september 1986 march 1988. Reuter 

CNS Inc complete initial offering 1035000 share common stock 3.75 dlrs share underwriting head Engler-Budd Co Inc. Concurrent offering company exchange offer issue 277127 common share exchange 935333 dlrs outstanding promissory note rate 3.375 dlrs share. This represent 93 pct acceptance exchange offer company said. Reuter 

USX Corp USS division available comprehensive sheet steel selection pricing detail company's full line products. The company complete update 25 years. The price book effective Oct One 1987 company said. Reuter 

Inspiration Consolidated Copper Co subsidiary Inspiration Resources Corp lower base price full-plate copper cathode 0.50 cent 74.0 cent lb effective immediately. Reuter 

Shr 58 ct v 38 ct Net 4628650 v 3041407 Revs 45.0 mln v 28.1 mln Reuter 

China add 30000 tonne U.S. corn previous commitment accord U.S. Agriculture Department's late Export Sales report. The report cover transaction week June 11 additional corn result change destinations. Total corn commitment delivery 1986/87 season amount 1083400 tonnes. Reuter 

Period end May 31 Shr loss five ct v loss 11 ct Net loss 306007 v loss 102420 Sales 110522 v 10105 NOTE: Full name Data Med Clinical Support Services Inc Per-share data adjust three-for-one stock split payable June 30 1987 The sale reflect fiscal 1987 period sale record subsequent May 22 1986 acquisition asset predecessor company Data Med Reuter 

Alexander Alexander Services Inc form insurance unit know Environmental Protection Insurance Co-Risk Retention Group specialize environmental liability coverage. The company unit start preliminary underwriting activity provide environmental impairment coverage company pollution liability exposures. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp downgrade Southland Corp's 156 mln dlrs debt security 125 mln dlrs (liquidation value) prefer stock. The agency cite Southland's announcement study various restructuring alternatives. S P company rumor takeover target restructuring probably defensive move thwart unfriendly bid. Southland currently carry BBB senior debt A-2 commercial paper. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc downgrade Crazy Eddie Inc's 81 mln dlrs B-1 convertible subordinate debentures. Moody's cite Crazy Eddie's reduce profitability recent acquisition proposal company increase debt leverage uncertain earnings outlook. The agency review consider company's concentration highly competitive New York marketplace Crazy's ability maintain adequate bank financing. Moody's corrects amount debt 65 mln dlrs. Reuter 

McDonnell Douglas Corp Siemens AG SIEG.F> sign memorandum understand deal AH-64 Apache helicopter. They memorandum deal depot maintenance U.S. Army's helicopter base West Germany joint study potential development production helicopter West German Army. Reuter 

British company largely frozen President Reagan's "Star Wars" project despite earlier hope lucrative contract research bonanza accord report Members Parliament (MPs). Funding project formally know Strategic Defence Initiative (SDI) amount 7.5 billion dlrs parliament's Defence Committee said. But British contractor won 34 mln dlrs -- 20 mln dlrs government-to-government basis rest secure directly U.K. Firms institutions. In December 1985 Britain United States sign Memorandum Understanding (MoU) relate cooperative research Strategic Defence Initiative. At hope express U.K. Industrial participation lead significant spin-off technology defence area civil sector. But all-party committee report "the debate merit U.K. Participation SDI conduct context MoU negotiated.... It evident SDI participation bonanza thought." British Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher President Reagan's staunch supporter plan development anti-ballistic missile defence screen. But government source angry bureaucratic barrier British company try break lucrative American defence market generally -- view voiced defence minister George Younger. He told gathering British American businessmen "We Europe greatly welcome emphasis U.S. Have place cooperation collaboration defence equipment sphere." He add "But I worry failure influential individual Congress elsewhere realise true nature two-way street term idea technology equipment lead erection artificial barriers." "I be afraid danger signal visible form legislative proposal seem arise increase frequency (Capitol) Hill regulation U.S. Administration" Younger said. "The defence balance trade U.K. ally markedly favour U.S." Thatcher visit Washington month talk President Reagan. U.K. Government official probably raise subject defence trade meet. The report Parliament's Defence Committee British position towards SDI base point agree Thatcher Reagan December 1984 that: - The aim superiority maintain balance - SDI-related deploymewnt matter negotiation - The overall aim enhance undercut deterence - East-West negotiation aim achieve security reduce level offensive system sides. The committee report "we support government's view SDI research proceed framework Camp David "four points" particular entire conformity provision ABM (Anti-Ballistic Missile) Treaty." "We note envisage SDI undertaken UK contractor fall "narrow" interpretation treaty (and) recommend government take appropriate step ensure continue case." That definition prohibits U.S. And Soviet Union develop test deploy ABM system expert said. That recommendation course change add "it clear Soviet Union take lead renounce constraint narrow interpretation." Regarding possibility technology spin-off committee report "the predominance "paper studies" SDI contract award British firm institution militates achievement." Reuter 

Carter Hawley Hale Stores Inc June 29 record date shareholder voting company's propose restructuring annual meeting. The company yet date meeting held August. Under proposal Carter Hawley split specialty store company department store company. Shareholders 17-dlrs cash share company exist common share hold. The restructuring announce December Carter Hawley reject buy-out offer Retail Partners. Reuter 

Allegheny International Inc sell industrial unit serve railroad industry Chemetron Railway Products Inc> senior management Allegheny. Terms transaction disclosed. Included sale Chemetron Railway Products True Temper Railway Appliances Inc Allegheny Axle Co company said. The unit include 12 plant throughout U.S. company said. Reuter 

Qtly div 30.1 ct v 30.1 ct prior Pay July 15 Record June 30 Reuter 

Qtly div 26 ct v 26 ct prior Pay July 15 Record June 29 Note:the company's full name One Valley Bancorp West Virginia Inc Reuter 

Phillips Petroleum Co Provesta Corp unit build semi-commercial fermentation product plant capacity 3 mln lb Provesteen yeast. The company construction plant begin August completion due April-May 1988. It plant built Jacobs Engineering Group Inc JEC>. The company purpose plant demonstrate scale-up Phillips Provesta's fermentation technology. Reuter 

Ram Industries Inc unit Cortez International Ltd. agreement reach Treasure Valley Foods> Nampa Idaho lease Treasure's building equipment. The company joint venture Ram unit Multiple Resources Inc operation retain key Treasure management employees. Ram operation begin August involve processing onion addition frozen food product initial project. Ram expect sale exceed 12 mln dlrs 24 month net income exceed 1.8 mln dlrs. The company negotiation purchase yet undisclosed facility Mississippi process 1.4 mln pound frozen okra monthly. Reuter 

Qtly div 13 ct v 11-1/3 ct prior Pay Aug 3 Record July 15 Reuter 

Qtly div 15 ct v 15 ct prior Pay July 28 Record July Reuter 

The New York Stock Exchange connection triple expiration stock index future option individual option disclose imbalance 50 major stock tomorrow 0900 EDT 1530 EDT. The information disclose via financial news services. Reuter 

Qtly div 59.5 ct v 57 ct Pay July 31 Record July 2 Reuter 

Sen. Tom Harkin D-Iowa defend controversial mandatory supply control farm bill U.S. farmer allow vote referendum whether approve proposal. The Harkin proposal loan rate 5.17 dlrs bushel wheat 3.77 dlrs corn 9.32 dlrs soybean effect strict control plant acreage reductions. Present loan rate 2.28 dlrs wheat 1.92 corn effectively 4.56 soybeans. Also plan U.S. seek market share cartel European Community export nation share-out export market Harkin Senate Agriculture subcommittee hearing examine farm programs. Harkin follow claim testimony "Family Farm Act." -- The mandatory control bill increase farm income reduce government spending agriculture. -- Harkin policy price support ruin U.S. agricultural export critic claim increase overall revenue exports. This seek agreement major export country include European Community market share agree prices. Sen. Christopher Bond R-Mo. counter hearing grain export cartel workable. -- Harkin acknowledge high commodity price support pass onto consumer food price stem "gouging" food processing company farm product prices. Harkin cite term "excessive" net return equity five 33.4 pct Kellogg 31.9 pct Monfort 22.8 pct Nabisco 22.8 pct ConAgra 21.2 pct H.J. Heinz 19.1 pct Ralston Purina 17.2 pct Pillsbury 16.7 pct Quaker Oats. -- Harkin "legitimate" concern bill impact high price livestock producers. He transition high price allow livestock producer purchase Commodity Credit Corp. grain stock years. Thereafter livestock farmer benefit "predictable stable" grain price said. -- Harkin policy approach farm participation "mandatory" current farm program. He farmer participate farm program receive credit plant protect farm income. Reuter 

Nova Corp consider takeover bid Dome Petroleum Ltd either alone consortium Nova chairman Bob Blair said. "We think make offer Dome Amoco (Canada Petroleum Co Ltd) creditors" Blair told reporter annual meeting. Amoco Canada unit Amoco Corp AN> 5.2 billion-dlr acquisition offer Dome. "There ongoing serious apply Dome Nova Husky decision substance future action take either company" Blair said. Nova own 43 pct Husky Oil Ltd HYO.TO>. Blair Nova decision whether lead partner joint purchase Dome. He add discussion party Dome include TransCanada PipeLines Ltd TRP> refuse name participants. Reuter 

Red Lion Inns Limited Partnership declare initial cash distribution 43 ct unit proration 50 ct quarter. The distribution payable August 14 unitholders record June 30. The payout adjust reflect actual day partnership own hotel calendar quarter end June 30 1987. Reuter 

Qtly div 95 ct v 95 ct prior Pay Aug 3 Record June 30 Reuter 

Qtly div 12 ct v 12 ct prior Pay Aug 10 Record July 10 Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp place creditwatch negative implication Gillette Co's A-2 commercial paper pending outcome takeover Revlon Group Inc REV>. Revlon currently bound standstill agreement follow earlier bid company Gillette's board permission 40.50 dlr share bid firm. Should Revlon successful Gillette's rating reflect weaker credit quality aggressive nature Revlon whose senior debt rat B agency said. Reuter 

Kraft Inc strongly disagreed complaint file Federal Trade Commission false mislead claim Kraft Singles cheese product fight charge. "Kraft commit informative truthful advertising compaign clearly meet criteria" Kraft prepared statement. "We believe integreity advertising establish litigation process" Kraft said. Company spokesman Scott Horne elaborate statement litigated. The FTC charge Kraft make false mislead claim advertising overstate calcuim content Kraft Singles American Pasteurized Process Cheese Food. In administrative complaint FTC charge Glenview Ill. food consumer product company falsely claim slice Kraft Singles contains amount calcium five ounce milk. The company falsely advertised Kraft Singles contain calcium slice imitation cheese substantiate claim FTC charged. Reuter 

The Federal Deposit Insurance Corp First Midwest Bank base Maryville Mo. close regulator become 91st federally insured bank fail year. The FDIC First Midwest's 25.1 mln dlrs deposit assume First Bank Maryville newly charter subsidiary (Citizens Bancshares Co) Chillicothe Mo. It fail bank's office asset 25.2 mln dlrs reopen June 19 branch First Bank. Reuter 

First Wachovia Corp add 50 mln dlrs loan loss reserve. It 35 mln dlrs cover bad loan develop country balance domestic international loans. First Wachovia report quarter capital gain 14.3 mln dlrs sale equity securities. It effect transaction reduce quarter earnings 20 mln dlrs 37 ct share net income quarter. In year-ago quarter bank earn 45 mln dlrs 83 ct share. First Wachovia exclude quarter special item expect report "good operating earnings performance" compare year-ago quarter. Reuter 

A White House associate personnel director Mark Sullivan emerge candidate replace Susan Phillips chairman Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC). Commodity industry government source Sullivan know commodity industry emerge week surprise candidate post. Sullivan attorney charge Reagan administration personnel appointment legal financial affair area July 1986. Phillips resign month assume post vice president finance University Iowa. Following Phillips' resignation CFTC commissioner Kalo Hineman Kansas farmer commissioner Robert Davis consider strong candidate agency temporarily. However industry source strong speculation Sullivan suggests lead candidate. Sullivan's name float recently Reagan administration financial regulatory positions. He rumor April consideration position board Federal Home Loan Bank Board regulates Savings Loan Associations. Reuter 

West German economic growth slow 1.5 pct 2.4 pct 1986 due weak domestic demand tougher competition abroad Organisation Economic Cooperation Development (OECD) semi-annual review economy. This view favourable West German government's forecast growth rate pct line forecast independent economic institute growth range 1.5 pct. The OECD economy pick gross product rise pct real terms. The OECD assume German economy passing period temporary weakness recovery confidence near future. But warn key improvement economy high domestic demand forecast rise 2.5 pct 2.75 pct 1988 below 1986's 3.7 pct. While note government bring forward five billion mark tax reform January 1988 OECD "the medium longer-term performance West German economy improve reduction subsidy - allow relatively low tax rates." Since OECD report compile West German Federal Statistics Office release figure show GNP actually fell 0.5 pct real term quarter compare final month 1986. Diplomatic source West Germany appear likely finish low growth rate Group Seven lead industrial nations. West Germany's current account surplus target considerable criticism Reagan administration expect rise slightly 37 billion dlrs 35.8 billion 1986 decline 29 billion dlrs 1988. REUTER 

WEDGE Group Inc Houston investment firm raise stake TVX Broadcast Group Inc 682419 share 15.1 pct total outstanding common stock 559219 share 12.4 pct. In filing Securities Exchange Commission WEDGE bought 123200 TVX common share price range 8.00 10.625 dlrs share. Reuter 

France's growth rate expect strengthen half poor half unemployment worsen Organisation Economic Cooperation Development (OECD) said. In semi-annual review economy OECD forecast growth French Gross Domestic Product (GDP) run pct six months. It rate line 1986 trend significantly high half year. The OECD France's economic situation deteriorate somewhat month 1987. Activity slow primarily reflect inventory adjustment unemployment risen rapidly inflation reaccelerated OECD said. Unemployment likely reach 12 pct workforce 1988. The report inflation slow domestic demand pick half year. But data likely bad record 1986 added. The OECD forecast 2.75 pct rise consumer price half pct drop six months. The slowdown bring inflation rate 3.25 pct sharply year's 2.2 pct. REUTER 

A include Sobey Nova Scotia Empire Company Ltd raise stake Nash Finch Co 442498 share 8.6 pct total outstanding 374498 share 7.3 pct. In filing Securities Exchange Commission bought 68000 Nash Finch common share April 7 June 17. Reuter 

Italy's economic outlook 1987 1988 likely favourable slightly low growth high unemployment increase trade deficit Organisation Economic Cooperation Development (OECD) said. But OECD half-yearly report forecast slightly low inflation rate years. Last Italy ranked OECD's fast grow economy Gross Domestic Product (GDP) growth 2.7 pct. The OECD Italy's GDP grow pct 1987 fall 2.5 pct 1988. The inflation rate probably stabilise five pct projection period result turnaround import price particularly oil acceleration labour cost effect domestic demand pressure report said. This lesser degree 1988 domestic demand stimulate buoyant growth household consumption wage increase follow pay negotiations. Domestic demand pressure couple deterioration Italian competitiveness likely stimulate import adversely affect export 1987 1988. This result sharp negative contribution currrent account. REUTER 

Japan's trade surplus likely continue grow 1987 sale Japanese good abroad increase domestic demand remains sluggish Organization Economic Cooperation Development (OECD) said. In late half-yearly review economy OECD Japan manage considerably reduce surplus domestic demand grow pct 1986 export market rise pct. But differential growth domestic foreign demand reverse 1987 1988 "thus weaken international adjustment process." It forecast slow domestic growth little pct rise export 3.3 pct 1987 3.6 pct 1988. As result current account surplus 1987 rise 95 billion dlrs 86 billion 1986 1988 fall 87 billion dlrs. The OECD outlook account 6000 billion yen package announce month stimulate domestic demand increase import Japan. However OECD official measure significantly strengthen domestic demand quite possibly exceed pct GNP full effect work provide stimulus imports. The OECD outlook "Continued current account surplus far build-up already-substantial net external asset position lead upward pressure yen." It far appreciation lead manufacturer postpone investment plan weaken domestic growth. The OECD Japan's Gross National Product likely gorw annual pct 1987 1988 below 1986's 2.5 pct growth. But Japan continue performance inflation zero figure expect 1987 compare 0.6 pct rise consumer price year. Reuter 

U.S.-Canadian tie worsen nation unable reach free trade pact accord study publish nonpartisan policy research groups. The Cato Institute Washington Fraser Institute Vancouver remove remain tariff cross border trade benefit countries. But Cato chairman William Niskanen add "the nations' generally harmonious trade relation probably sustainable agreement." The United States Canada whose cross-border trade total 125 billion dlrs hold talk June pact trade barrier remain countries. The U.S. deadline talk October 1 side agreement likely despite tough bargaining remained. Niskanen pact reach bilateral trade tie deteriorate Congressional pressure President Reagan implement trade law aggressively hit Canadian trade practices. He note Canada seek foreign investment auto industry strain considerable bilateral free trade U.S. Canadian auto parts. Niskanen Canadian government vulnerable resurgence economic nationalism restrict U.S. export Canada. A free trade pact back President Reagan Prime Minister Brian Mulroney market Canada enable industry achieve economy scale widen export worldwide said. It increase gross product countries. Niskanen goal pact tariff 10 low subsidy export rule trade service investment curb government procurement agree way resolve trade disputes. Reuter 

Economic growth remain sluggish Netherlands Belgium unemployment rise Organisation Economic Cooperation Development forecast. Belgium's GDP growth slow 1.5 pct bring rise jobless OECD semi-annual survey. Belgian inflation stabilise 1.5 2.0 pct current account surplus probably remain pct GDP. While Belgian government progress trim borrowing requirement "it probably insufficient check self-sustaining nature deficit" OECD said. In Netherlands real GDP growth slip 1.5 pct pct 1988 Dutch export become competitive import rising. "Employment forecast decelerate reflect sluggish growth private sector budgetary cuts" report said. Dutch consumer price fall 0.5 pct 1987 stay stable 1988 partly result decline domestic gas prices. Luxembourg's economy contrast slightly faster growth GDP result upward movement wages. But real growth consumption ease year. REUTER 

Strong growth domestic demand key feature economy southern European country 1986 growth see slow Organisation Economic Cooperation Development said. In semi-annual report OECD Portugal's total domestic demand growth decline 7.6 pct five pct 1987 3.75 pct 1988 slow wage growth restrain private consumption. Turkey's economy grow faster expect 1986 domestic demand surge 10.5 pct growth expect halve five pct year. In Spain buoyant domestic demand lead fix investment drive force behind rapid growth Gross Domestic Product. Both fix investment private consumption expect ease 1988 remain strong. The OECD forecast Spanish import rise sharply reflect strong demand entry European Community decline competitiveness. In Greece inflation forecast turn downwards follow increase link introduction Value Added Tax surge food price due cold weather. REUTER 

High wage settlement Nordic country threaten cut export reduce international competitiveness industry Organisation Economic Cooperation Development (OECD) said. In Denmark OECD wage settlement conclude 1987 likely contribute marked deterioration competitiveness. Sweden's competitive position see risk accelerate wages. The OECD predict domestic demand pressure tight fiscal policy Denmark Norway Sweden Finland. Overall economic growth vary country 1986 1988 OECD semi-annual report said. After strong rise 7.8 pct 1986 total domestic demand Norway see fall 1.5 pct 1987 pct follow year. Denmark expect slump domestic demand. The report growth Gross Domestic Product (GDP) likely speed slightly Sweden Finland 1987 1988 decline Denmark Norway. Iceland need try harder implement economic strategy progress towards sustain balance non-inflationary growth OECD said. REUTER 

The United States urgent action cut cripple budget deficit include reduction non-defense spending high tax curb growth defense budget Organization Economic Cooperation Development said. The OECD semi-annual review economy failure Reagan Administration Congress quickly agree measure cut deficit "could seriously affect confidence United States elsewhere." It predict federal deficit fiscal 1987 run September 30 substantially overshoot Balanced Budget Act's target 144 billion dlrs official U.S. Estimates February 175 billion. "The OECD projection base assumption slow growth high rate actual data half financial deficit 190 billion dollars" said. While 30 billion low year's deficit improvement due corporate tax increase introduce income tax cut effect. The U.S. Economic growth rate expect edge 2.75 pct 2.5 pct last. In contrast competitive export boost fall dollar GNP growth. Unemployment continue fall slowly service sector continue create jobs. But inflation appear head high partly due low dollar consumer price forecast rise pct 4.5 pct 2.1 pct 1986. "Monetary fiscal policy appear key factor behind avoidance recession" report said. The current account balance payment deficit expect 125 billion dlrs hit project record 147.25 billion said. In Canada economic growth expect pick slightly 2.75 pct 1988 2.5 pct below level see recent years. Inflation expect slow 3.5 pct 3.75 pct unemployment edge nine pct 1988 9.25 pct year. Canada's current account deficit project shrink billion U.S. Dlrs remain level 1988. Reuter 

Period end May 2 Shr loss ct v loss ct Net loss 397000 v loss 330000 Revs 32.1 mln v 30.4 mln Note: Full name Mark's Work Wearhouse Ltd. Reuter 

Playboy Enterprises Inc Playboy Licensing unit enter agreement Fashionport Private Ltd India market Playboy Playmate fashion accessory India Middle East Eastern bloc countries. Fashionport produce men's women's apparel leather garment footwear leather good accessory said. Fashionport base Bombay India. No detail available. Reuter 

Prospects economic growth remain sluggish coordinate action western government urgently need restore confidence stabilize currency encourage investment Organization Economic Cooperation Development (OECD) here. "The economic situation deteriorate recent month ... Slow growth unemployment payment imbalance likely persist" gloomiest review economy recent years. The gross product (GNP) 24-nation bloc western industrialise country forecast grow 2.25 pct slow year's 2.5 pct growth rate. "We aggregate OECD comfortably exceed pct" David Henderson OECD's economics statistic department said. The OECD dollar fall lead rise inflation expectation high rate U.S. Combining trade imbalance huge third debt increase risk economic downturn. "At condition faster growth remain favorable" cite low inflation major country healthy corporate finance generally low rate improvement budget position flexible labor markets. But private sector confidence undermined uncertainty exchange rate warn "for confidence restore government swiftly implement internationally-agreed commitments." This clear reference February's Louvre accord Group Five nation plus Canada analyst said. The OECD apparent disagreement major country implementation Louvre accord help undermine confidence call active fiscal policy U.S. West Germany Japan slow demand U.S. And raise countries. Henderson 6000 billion yen package announce recently Japanese government encourage work cut tax significant contribution process estimate precise impact. He measure strengthen Japan's domestic demand significantly quite possibly exceed pct GNP. The inflation outlook broadly satisfactory worsen recent month OECD consumer price forecast rise 3.5 pct 3.75 pct 1988 2.8 pct increase 1986. There prospect significant improvement unemployment situation 18 month average rate expect stabilize 8.25 pct similar year. The OECD call effort liberalize agricultural market switch farm subsidy price guarantee measure link production towards direct income support farmers. Reuter 